VOL. I. 2
THE AUTHOR.
WORTHY READER!
In
again taking pen in hand I would fain
make a few observations at the outset, by way
of bespeaking a right understanding. The
volumes
which I have already published have met
with a reception far beyond my most sanguine
expectations. I would willingly attribute this to
their intrinsic merits; but, in spite of the vanity
of authorship, I cannot but be sensible that
their success has, in a great measure, been
owing to a less flattering cause. It has been a
matter of marvel, at least to the European part
of my readers, that a man from the wilds of
America should express himself in tolerable
English. I was looked upon as something new
and strange in literature; a kind of demi-savage,
with a feather in his hand instead of on his head,
and there was a curiosity to hear what such a
being had to say about civilized society.
This novelty is now at an end, and with it, in
all probability, the feeling of indulgence which
it produced. I must now expect to bear the
scrutiny
of sterner criticism, and to be measured by
the same standard with contemporary writers;
and the very indulgence that has been shown to
my previous writings, will cause these to be
treated with the greater rigour.
I am aware that I often travel over a beaten
ground, and treat of subjects that have been
already
discussed by abler pens. Indeed, various
authors have been mentioned as my models, to
whom I should feel flattered if I thought I bore
the slightest resemblance. I write after no
model
that I am conscious of; and I write with no
idea of imitation or competition. In venturing
occasionally on subjects that have already been
almost exhausted by English authors, I do it,
not with the presumption of challenging a
comparison
,
but because I trust there will be some
new interest given to them, when discussed by
the pen of a stranger. If, therefore, I should
occasionally be found dwelling with fondness on
topics that are trite and commonplaced with
the reader, I beg the circumstances under which
I write may be kept in recollection. I have
been born and brought up in a new country;
yet educated from infancy in the literature of an
old one. My mind has gradually been filled
with historical and poetical associations, which
were connected with places, and manners, and
customs of Europe, but could rarely be applied
to those of my own country. With a mind thus
peculiarly prepared, the most trivial and
commonplaced
objects and scenes, on first landing
in Europe, were full of interest and novelty.
Indeed, it is difficult to describe the
whimsical
medley of ideas that rush at once upon a
stranger in such peculiar predicament. He
for the first time sees a world about which he
has been thinking in every stage of his
existence
.
The recollections of infancy, youth, and
manhood; of the nursery, the school, and the
study, come swarming upon him; distracting
his attention between great and little objects,
and each perhaps producing equal delight.
Such, for instance, was the odd confusion of
associations that kept breaking upon me as I
first approached London. One of my earliest
wishes had been to see it; I had heard so much
of it in childhood; I had read so much about
it in the earliest books that had been put in my
infant hands; I was familiar with the names of
its streets, and squares, and public places, before
I knew those of my native city. It was, to
me, the great centre of the world, round which
every thing seemed to revolve. I recollect
contemplating
so wistfully, when a boy, a paltry
little print of the Thames, and London Bridge,
and St. Paul's, that was in front of a magazine;
even the venerable wood-cut of St. John's
gate, that has stood time out of mind on the
title page of the Gentleman's Magazine, was
not without its charms for me.
How my bosom thrilled when the towers of
Westminster Abbey were pointed out to me,
rising above the rich groves of St. James'
Park, with a thin blue haze about their gray
pinnacles.
I could not behold this great mausoleum of
what is most illustrious in our paternal history
without feeling all my enthusiasm in a glow;
nor can I forbear to mention, on the other hand,
the delightful, yet childish interest with which I
first peeped into Mr. Newberry's shop in St.
Paul's church yard; that fountain head of
literature
.
Mr. Newberry was the first that ever
filled my infant mind with the idea of a great
and good man. He published all the picture
books of the day, Tom Thumb's Folio, Giles
Gingerbread, and Jack the Giant Killer; and
out of his abundant love for children, he
demanded
nothing for the paper and print, and
only a penny halfpenny for the binding!
But what have most especially attracted my
attention, and have afforded a continually
recurring
source of pleasure, have been those
peculiarities which distinguish an old country
and an old state of society from a new one.
I have never yet grown so familiar with the
crumbling monuments of foregone ages, as to
blunt the intense interest with which I at first
beheld them. Accustomed always to scenes
where history was in a manner in anticipation;
where every thing in art was new and
progressive
,
and where the works of man gave no
ideas but those of young existence and
prospective
improvement, there was something
inexpressibly touching in these enormous piles,
gray with antiquity, and sinking to decay. I
cannot describe the mute but deepfelt
enjoyment
with which I have contemplated a vast
monastic ruin, like Fentern Abbey, buried in
the bosom of a quiet valley, as though it had
existed merely for itself. Or a warrior pile,
like Conway Castle, standing in stern
loneliness
on its rocky promontory, a mere hollow,
yet threatening phantom of departed power.
They spread a grand and melancholy, and, to
me, an unusual charm over the landscape,
giving proofs of the transient and perishing
glories of art, among the ever springing and
reviving fertility of nature.
In like manner have I been affected by every
thing antique and obsolete in manners and
customs
;
and I mention these circumstances as an
apology for often recurring to such themes; and
betraying, occasionally, a provincial ignorance
and delight respecting them, which must
provoke
a smile from my wiser and more
experienced
reader. Having been brought up, also, in
the comparative simplicity of a republic, I am
apt to be struck with even the ordinary
circumstances
attendant on an aristocratical state of
society. I have amused myself occasionally,
therefore, by pointing out some of the
eccentricities
,
and some of the poetical characteristics
of the latter, without pretending to decide on its
merits, compared with any other form of
government
.
My only aim is to paint manners and
characters, such as I see them. I am no
politician
.
The more I have considered politics,
the more I have found it full of perplexity; and
as in religion, I have contented myself with the
faith in which I have been brought up;
regulating
my own conduct by its precepts; but
leaving to abler heads the task of making
converts
.
I shall continue on, therefore, in the course I
have hitherto pursued; looking at things
poetically
rather than politically, describing them as
they are, rather than pretending to point out
how they should be, and endeavouring to see the
world in as pleasant a light, as circumstances
will permit.
I have always had an opinion that much good
might be done by keeping mankind in good
humour with one another. I may be wrong
in my philosophy, but I shall continue to
practise
it until convinced of its fallacy. When I
discover the world to be all that it has been
represented by sneering cynics and whining
poets, I will turn to and abuse it also; in the
mean while, worthy reader, I hope you will not
think lightly of me, because I cannot believe
this to be so very bad a world as it is
represented
.
Thine truly,
GEOFFREY CRAYON.
VOL. I. 3
THE HALL.
The ancientest house, and the best for housekeeping in this county
or the next: and though the master of it write but 'Squire, I know no
lord like him.
Merry Beggars
.
The
reader, if he has perused the volumes of
the Sketch Book, will probably recollect
something
of the Bracebridge family, with which
I once passed a Christmas. I am now on
another visit to the Hall, having been invited
to a wedding, which is shortly to take place.
The Squire's second son, Guy, a fine spirited
young captain in the army, is about to be
married
to his father's ward, the fair Julia
Templeton
.
A gathering of relatives and friends has
already commenced to celebrate the joyful
occasion
;
for the old gentleman is an enemy to
quiet, private weddings. There is nothing,
he says, like launching a young couple gaily,
and cheering them from the shore: a good
outset
is half the voyage.
Before proceeding any farther, I would beg
that the Squire might not be confounded with
that class of hard riding, fox hunting
gentlemen
,
so often described, and, in fact, so nearly
extinct in England. I use this rural title partly
because it is his universal appellation
throughout
the neighbourhood, and partly because it
saves me the frequent repetition of his name;
which is one of those rough old English names,
at which Frenchmen exclaim in despair.
The Squire is, in fact, a lingering specimen
of the old English country gentleman,
rusticated
a little by living almost entirely on his
estate; and something of a humourist, as
Englishmen
are apt to become, when they have an
opportunity of living in their own way. I like
his hobby passing well, however, which is a
bigotted devotion to old English manners and
customs; it jumps a little with my own
humour
,
having as yet a lively and unsated
curiosity
about the ancient and genuine
characteristics
of my father land.
There are some traits about this family, also,
which appear to me to be national. It is one of
those old aristocratical families which I believe
are peculiar to England, and scarcely
understood
in other countries; that is to say, families
of the ancient gentry, who, though destitute of
titled rank, maintain a high ancestral pride,
who look down upon all nobility of recent
creation, and would consider it a sacrifice of
dignity to merge the venerable name of their
house in a modern title.
This feeling is very much fostered by the
importance which they enjoy in their hereditary
domains. The family mansion is an old manor
house, standing in a retired and beautiful part of
Yorkshire. Its inhabitants have been regarded
through the surrounding country as the great
ones of the earth, and the little village near
the Hall, looks up to the Squire with almost
feudal homage. I am again quartered in the
pannelled chamber, in the antique wing of the
house. The prospect from my window,
however
,
has quite a different aspect from that it
wore on my winter visit. Though early in the
month of April, yet a few warm sunshiny days
have drawn forth the early beauties of the spring.
The parterres of the old fashioned garden are
already gay with flowers, and the gardener has
brought out his exotics and placed them along
the stone ballustrades. The trees are clothed
with green buds and tender leaves; when I open
my window I smell the odour of mignonette,
and hear the hum of the bees from the flowers
against the sunny wall; with the varied song of
the throstle and the notes of the tuneful little
wren.
While sojourning in this strong hold of old
fashions, I shall be tempted to make some
occasional
sketches of the scenes and characters
before
me; mingled with anecdotes and remarks
of what I have seen and thought and felt, in the
course of my ramblings. In a word, I shall
make use of the leisure which is now afforded
me, to clear off the motley contents which are
apt to accumulate in a traveller's portfolio.
THE BUSY MAN.
A decayed gentleman, lives most upon his own mirth and my
master's means, and much good do him with it; he is the finest
companion
of all; he does hold my master up with his stories and songs
and catches, and such tricks and jigs, you would admirehe is
with him now.
Jovial Crew
.
By
no one has my return to the Hall been
more heartily greeted than by Mr. Simon
Bracebridge
,
or Master Simon, as the Squire most
commonly calls him. I encountered him just as
I entered the park, where he was breaking a
pointer, and he received me with all the
hospitable
cordiality with which a man welcomes a
friend to another one's house. I have already
introduced him to the reader, as a brisk old
bachelor looking little man; the wit and
superannuated
beau of a large family connexion, and
the Squire's factotum. I found him, as usual,
full of bustle, with a thousand petty things to
do, and persons to attend to; and in chirping
good humour; for there are few happier beings
than a busy idler; that is to say, a man who is
eternally busy about nothing.
I visited him the morning after my arrival,
in his chamber, which is in a remote corner of
the mansion; as he says he likes to be to
himself
,
and out of the way. He has fitted it up
in his own taste; so that it is a perfect epitome
of an old bachelor's notions of convenience and
arrangements. The furniture is made up of
odd pieces from all parts of the house, chosen
on account of their suiting his notions, or fitting
some corner of his apartment, and he is very
eloquent in praise of an ancient elbow chair;
from which he takes occasion to digress into a
censure on modern chairs, as having degenerated
from the dignity and comfort of high backed
antiquity.
Adjoining to his room is a small cabinet,
which he calls his study. Here are some
hanging
shelves, of his own construction, on which
are several old works on hawking, hunting, and
farriery, and a collection or two of poems and
songs of the reign of Elizabeth, which he studies
out of compliment to the Squire; together with
the novellist's magazine, the sporting magazine,
the racing kalender, a volume or two of the
Newgate kalender, a book of peerage, and
another
of heraldry.
His sporting dresses hang on pegs in a small
closet; and about the walls of his apartment are
hooks to hold his fishing tackle, whips, spurs,
and a favourite fowling piece, curiously wrought
and inlaid, which he inherits from his
grandfather
.
He has also a couple of old single
keyed flutes, and a fiddle, which he has
repeatedly
patched and mended himself: affirming it
to be a veritable cremona, though I have never
heard him extract a single note from it that was
not enough to make one's blood run cold.
From this little nest his fiddle will often be
heard, in the stillness of mid-day, drowsily
sawing
some long forgotten tune; for he prides
himself
on having a choice collection of good old
English
music, and will scarcely have any thing to
do with modern composers. The time, however,
at which his musical powers are of most use,
is now and then of an evening, when he plays
for the children to dance in the Hall; and he
passes among them and the servants for a
perfect
Orpheus.
His chamber also bears evidence of his
various
avocations; there are half copied sheets
of music; designs for needlework; sketches of
landscapes, very indifferently executed; a
camera
lucida; a magic lanthorn, for which he is
endeavouring to paint glasses; in a word, it is
the cabinet of a man of many accomplishments,
who knows a little of every thing, and does
nothing well.
After I had spent some time in his
apartment
,
admiring the ingenuity of his small
inventions, he took me about the
establishment
to visit the stables, dog kennel, and other
dependencies; in which he appeared like a
general visiting the different quarters of his
camp; as the Squire leaves the control of all
these matters to him, when he is at the Hall.
VOL. I. 4
He inquired into the state of the horses;
examined their feet; prescribed a drench for
one and bleeding for another; and then took
me to look at his own horse, on the merits of
which he dwelt with great prolixity, and which
I noticed had the best stall in the stable.
After this I was taken to what he termed the
falconry, to see a famous hawk which he was
training; for he told me he would show me,
in a few days, some rare sport of the good old
fashioned kind. In the course of our round I
remarked that the grooms, gamekeeper,
whippers-in
,
and other retainers, seemed all to be on
somewhat of a familiar footing with Master
Simon, and fond of having their joke with
him; though it was evident they had great
deference for his opinion in matters relating to
their functions.
There was one exception, however, in old
Christy, a testy old huntsman as hot as a
pepper-corn
,
a meagre wiry old fellow that seemed
made of buckram and whalebone. He wore a
threadbare velvet jockey cap, and a pair of
leather breeches, that, from much wear, shone
as though they had been japanned. He was
very contradictory and pragmatical, and apt,
as I thought, to differ from Master Simon
now and then out of mere captiousness. This
was particularly the case with respect to the
treatment of the hawk, which Master Simon
insisted he would ruin if he went on as he
was doing. The latter made a most pedantic
clatter about
casting
, and
imping
, and
gleaming
,
and
enseaming
, and giving her the
rangle
,
about all which I saw old Christy knew as
little as I did myself; but, notwithstanding, he
maintained his point most doggedly; and I was
surprised to see the good nature with which
Master Simon gave up to him.
Master Simon explained the matter to me
afterwards. Old Christy is the most ancient
servant on the place, having lived among dogs
and horses the greater part of a century, and
been in the service of Mr. Bracebridge's father.
He knows the pedigree of every horse on the
place, and has bestrode the great great
grand-sires
of most of them. He can give a
circumstantial
detail of every fox hunt for the last sixty
or seventy years; and has a history for every
stag's head about the house, and every hunting
trophy nailed to the door of the dog kennel.
All the present race have grown up under
his eye, and humour him in his old age. He
once attended the Squire to Oxford when he
was a student there, and enlightened the whole
university with his hunting lore. All this is
enough to make the old man opinionated, since
he finds on all these matters of first rate
importance
he knows more than the rest of the
world.
Indeed, Master Simon had been his pupil,
and acknowledges that he derived his first
knowledge in hunting from the instructions of
old Christy: and I much question whether the
old man does not still look upon him as rather
a green horn.
On our return, just as we were crossing the
lawn in front of the Hall, we heard the porter's
bell ring at the lodge; and shortly after a kind
of cavalcade advanced slowly up the avenue.
On sight of it Master Simon paused and
considered
it for a moment, and then, making a
sudden exclamation, hurried away to meet it.
As it approached I discerned a fair, fresh
looking
,
elderly lady, dressed in an old fashioned
riding habit, and a large white beaver hat,
with a very broad brim. She was riding on
a white pony, followed by a fat footman in rich
livery, mounted on an over-fed hunter. At a
little distance in the rear was an ancient
cumbrous
chariot, drawn by two very corpulent
horses, and driven by as corpulent a coachman,
beside whom sat a page dressed in fanciful
green livery. Inside of the chariot was a
starched prim figure, with a look somewhat
between a lady's companion and a lady's maid;
and a pampered cur was perched at each
window
.
There was a general turning out of the
garrison
at the Hall to receive this new comer.
The Squire assisted her to alight; and saluted
her affectionately on each cheek; the fair Julia
flew into her arms, and they embraced with the
romantic fervour of boarding school friends; she
was escorted into the house by Julia's lover,
towards
whom she showed distinguished favour;
and a line of the old servants who had collected
in the Hall, bowed most profoundly as she
passed
.
I observed that Master Simon was
extremely
assiduous in his attentions upon this old lady.
He walked by the side of her pony up the
avenue
;
and while she was receiving the salutations
of the rest of the family, he took occasion to
notice the fat old coachman; to pat the sleek
carriage horses, and above all, to say a civil
word to my lady's gentlewoman, the prim, sour
looking vestal in the chariot. I had no more
of his company for the rest of the morning.
He was swept off in the vortex that followed
in the wake of this lady. Once indeed he
paused for a moment as he was hurrying by
me, on some errand of the good lady's, to let me
know that this was Lady Lillycraft, a sister of
the Squire's; of large fortune, which the
captain
would inherit, and that her estate lay in
one of the best hunting countries in all England!
FAMILY SERVANTS.
Varify old servants are the vouchers of worthy housekeeping.
They are like rats in a mansion, or mites in a cheese, bespeaking the
antiquity and fatness of their abode.
In
my casual anecdotes of the Hall I may
often be tempted to dwell on circumstances of
a trite and trivial nature, from their appearing
to me illustrative of genuine national character.
It seems to be the study of the Squire to adhere,
as much as possible, to what he considers the old
landmarks of English manners. His servants
all understand his ways, and for the most part
have been accustomed to them from infancy;
so that, upon the whole, his household presents
one of the few tolerable specimens that can now
be met with, of the establishment of an English
country gentleman of the old school.
By the bye, the servants are not the least
characteristic part of the household. The
housekeeper, for instance, has been born and
brought up at the Hall, and has never been
twenty miles from it; yet she has a stately air,
that would not disgrace a lady that had figured
at the Court of Queen Elizabeth.
I am half inclined to think that she has caught
it from living so much among the old family
pictures. It may, however, be owing to a
consciousness
of her importance in the sphere in
which she has always moved; for she is greatly
respected in the neighbouring village and among
the farmer's wives; and has high authority in
the household; ruling over the servants with
quiet, but undisputed sway.
She is a thin old lady, with blue eyes and
pointed nose and chin. Her dress is always
the same as to fashion. She wears a small,
well starched ruff, a laced stomacher, full
petticoats
,
and a gown festooned and open in
front; which on particular occasions is of
ancient
silk; the legacy of some former dame of
the family, or an inheritance from her mother,
who was housekeeper before her. I have a
reverence for these old garments, as I make no
doubt they have figured about these apartments
in days long past, when they have set off the
charms of some peerless family beauty; and I
have sometimes looked from the old
housekeeper
to the neighbouring portraits, to see
whether I could not recognize her antiquated
brocade in the dress of some one of those long
waisted dames that smile on me from the walls.
Her hair, which is quite white, is frizzed out
in front, and she wears over it a small cap, nicely
plaited, and brought down under the chin. Her
manners are simple and primitive; heightened a
little by a proper dignity of station. The Hall
is her world, and the history of the family the
only history she knows; excepting that which
she has read in the bible. She can give a
biography
of every portrait in the picture gallery,
and is a complete family chronicle.
She is treated with great consideration by the
Squire. Indeed, Master Simon tells me that
there is a traditional anecdote current among the
servants, of the Squire's having been seen
kissing
her in the picture gallery, when they were
VOL. I. 5
both young. As, however, nothing farther was
ever noticed between them, the circumstance
caused no great scandal; only she was observed
to take to reading Pamela shortly afterwards,
and refused the hand of the village inn keeper,
whom she had previously smiled on.
The old butler, who was formerly footman,
and a rejected admirer of her's, used to tell the
anecdote now and then, at those little cabals
that will occasionally take place among the most
orderly servants, arising from the common
propensity
of the governed to talk against
administration
;
but he has left it off of late years, since
he has risen into place, and shakes his head
rebukingly
when it is mentioned. It is certain
that the old lady will to this day dwell on the
looks of the Squire when he was a young man
at college; and she maintains that none of his
sons can compare with their father when he was
of their age, and was dressed out in his full suit
of scarlet; with his hair craped and powdered,
and his three cornered hat.
She has an orphan niece, a pretty, soft hearted
baggage, named Phoebe Wilkins, who has been
transplanted to the Hall within a year or two,
and been nearly spoiled for any condition of life.
She is a kind of attendant and companion of the
fair Julia; and from loitering about the young
lady's apartments, reading scraps of novels, and
inheriting second hand finery, has become
something
between a waiting maid and a slipshod
fine lady.
She is considered a kind of heiress among
the servants; as she will inherit all her aunt's
property; which, if report be true, must be a
round sum of good golden guineas, the
accumulated
wealth of two housekeeper's savings;
not to mention the hereditary wardrobe, and
the many little valuables and knick-knacks
treasured
up in the housekeeper's room. Indeed
the old housekeeper has the reputation among
the servants and the villages of being passing
rich; and there is a japanned chest of drawers
and a large iron-bound coffer in her room,
which are supposed by the housemaids to hold
treasures of wealth.
The old lady is a great friend of Master
Simon's
;
who indeed pays a little court to her, as
to a person high in authority; and they have
many discussions on points of family history,
in which, notwithstanding his extensive
information
,
and pride of knowledge, he commonly
admits her superior accuracy. He seldom
returns
to the Hall after one of his visits to the
other branches of his family, without bringing
Mistress Wilkins some remembrance from the
ladies of the house where he has been staying.
Indeed, all the children of the house look up
to the old lady with habitual respect and
attachment
,
and she seems almost to consider
them as her own from their having grown up
under her eye. The Oxonian, however, is her
favourite, probably from being the youngest;
though he is the most mischievous, and has been
apt to play tricks upon her from boyhood.
I cannot help mentioning one little ceremony,
which I believe is peculiar to the Hall. After
the cloth is removed at dinner, the old
housekeeper
sails into the room and stands behind the
Squire's chair; when he fills her a glass of wine
with his own hands, in which she drinks the
health of the company in a truly respectful yet
dignified manner, and then retires. The Squire
received the custom from his father, and has
always
continued it.
There is a peculiar character about the servants
of old English families that reside principally in
the country.
They have a quiet, orderly, respectful mode
of doing their duties. They are always neat in
their persons, and appropriately, and, if I may
use the phrase, technically dressed. They move
about the house without hurry or noise; there is
nothing of the bustle of employment, or the voice
of command; nothing of that obtrusive
house-wifery
that amounts to a torment. You are not
persecuted by the process of making you
comfortable
.
Yet every thing is done, and is done
well. The work of the house is performed as if
by magic, but it is the magic of system.
Nothing
is done by fits and starts, nor at awkward
seasons; the whole goes on like well-oiled
clock-work
,
where there is no noise nor jarring in its
operations.
English servants, in general, are not treated
with great indulgence, nor rewarded by many
commendations; for the English are laconic and
reserved towards their domestics; but an
approving
nod and a kind word from master or mistress
goes as far here, as an excess of praise or
indulgence
elsewhere.
Neither do servants often exhibit any animated
marks of affection to their employers; yet though
quiet they are strong in their attachments; and the
reciprocal regard of masters and servants, though
not ardently expressed, is powerful and lasting in
old English families.
The title of an old family servant carries
with it a thousand kind associations in all parts
of the world; and there is no claim upon the
homebred charities of the heart more
irresistible
than that of having been born in the
house. It is common to see gray-headed
domestics
of this kind attached to an English
family of the old school, who continue in it
to the day of their death, in the enjoyment of
steady unaffected kindness, and the performance
of faithful unofficious duty. I think such
instances
of attachment speak well for both
master
and servant, and the frequency of them
speaks well for national character.
I have met with several instances of epitaphs
on the grave stones of such valuable domestics,
recorded with the simple truth of natural
feeling
.
I have two before me at this moment;
one copied from a tomb-stone of a church-yard
in Warwickshire:
Here lieth the body of Joseph Batte,
confidential
servant to George Birch, Esq. of
Hamstead Hall. His grateful friend and
master
caused this inscription to be written in
memory
of his discretion, fidelity, diligence, and
continence. He died (a bachelor) aged 84,
having lived 44 years in the same family.
The other was taken from a tomb-stone in
Eltham Church-yard:
Here lie the remains of Mr. James Tappy,
who departed this life on the 8th of September,
1818, aged 84, after a faithful service of 60 years
in one family, by each individual of which he
lived respected, and died lamented by the sole
survivor.
Few monuments, even of the illustrious, have
given me the glow about the heart that I felt
while copying this honest epitaph in the
church-yard
of Eltham. I sympathised with this sole
survivor of a family mourning over the grave of
this faithful follower of his race, who had been,
no doubt, a living memento of times and friends
that had passed away; and in considering this
record of long and devoted service, I called to
mind the touching speech of old Adam, in As
you like it, when tottering after the youthful son
of his ancient master:
Master go on and I will follow thee
To the last gasp, with truth and loyalty!
THE LOVERS.
Rise up my love, my fair one, and come away. For lo! the
winter
is past, the rain is over and gone, the flowers appear on the earth,
the time of the singing of birds is come, and the voice of the turtle is
heard in the land.
Song of Solomon
.
To a man who is a little of a philosopher,
and a bachelor to boot; and who, by dint of some
experience in the follies of life, begins to look
with a learned eye upon the ways of man and
eke of woman; to such a man, I say, there is
something very entertaining in noticing the
conduct
of a pair of young lovers. It may not be as
grave and scientific a study as the loves of the
plants; but it is certainly as interesting.
I have therefore derived much pleasure since
my arrival at the Hall, from observing the fair
Julia and her lover. She has all the delightful
blushing consciousness of an artless girl,
inexperienced
VOL. I. 6
in coquetry, who has made her first
conquest; while the captain regards her with
that mixture of fondness and exultation, with
which a youthful lover is apt to contemplate so
beauteous a prize. I observed them yesterday
in the garden advancing along one of the retired
walks. The sun was shining with delicious
warmth, making great masses of bright verdure
and deep blue shade. The cuckoo, that
harbinger
of spring, was faintly heard from a
distance
;
the thrush piped from the hawthorn, and
the yellow butterflies sported and toyed and
coquetted
in the air.
The fair Julia was leaning on her lover's arm,
listening to his conversation, with her eyes cast
down, a soft blush on her cheek, and a quiet smile
on her lips; while in the hand that hung
negligently
by her side was a bunch of flowers. In
this way they were sauntering slowly along, and
when I considered them, and the scene in which
they were moving, I could not but think it a
thousand pities that the season should ever
change; or that young people should ever grow
older; or that blossoms should give way to fruit;
or that lovers should ever get married.
From what I have gathered of family anecdote,
I understand that the fair Julia is the daughter
of a favourite college friend of the Squire's, who
after leaving Oxford had entered the army and
served for many years in India, where he was
mortally wounded in a skirmish with the natives.
In his last moments he had, with a faltering pen,
recommended his wife and daughter to the
kindness
of his early friend.
The widow and her child returned to England,
helpless and almost hopeless. When Mr.
Bracebridge
received accounts of their situation, he
hastened to their relief. He reached them just
in time to soothe the last moments of the
mother, who was dying of a consumption, and
to make her happy in the assurance that her child
should never want a protector.
The good Squire returned with his prattling
charge to his strong hold, where he had brought
her up with a tenderness truly paternal. As he
has taken some pains to superintend her
education
and form her taste, she has grown up with
many of his notions, and considers him the wisest
as well as the best of men. Much of her time
too has been passed with Lady Lillycraft, who
has instructed her in the manners of the old school,
and enriched her mind with all kinds of novels
and romances. Indeed, her ladyship has had a
great hand in promoting the match between Julia
and the captain, having had them together at
her country seat, the moment she found there
was an attachment growing up between them;
the good lady being never so happy as when she
has a pair of turtles cooing about her.
I have been pleased to see the fondness with
which the fair Julia is regarded by the old
servants
at the Hall. She has been a pet with them
from childhood, and every one seems to lay some
claim to her education; so that it is no wonder
that she should be extremely accomplished.
The gardener taught her to rear flowers, of
which she is extremely fond. Old Christy, the
pragmatical huntsman, softens when she
approaches
,
and as she sits lightly and gracefully
in her saddle, claims the merit of having taught
her to ride; while the housekeeper, who almost
looks upon her as a daughter, intimates that she
first gave her an insight into the mysteries of
the toilette; having been dressing maid in her
young days to the late Mrs. Bracebridge. I am
inclined to credit this last claim, as I have
noticed
that the dress of the young lady had an
air of the old school, though managed with
native
taste; and that her hair was put up very
much in the style of Sir Peter Lely's portraits
in the picture gallery.
Her very musical attainments partake of this
old fashioned character, and most of her songs
are such as are not at the present day to be
found on the piano of a modern performer. I
have, however, seen so much of modern fashions,
modern accomplishments, and modern fine
ladies
,
that I relish this tinge of antiquated style,
in so young and lovely a girl; and I have had as
much pleasure in hearing her warble one of the
old songs of Herrick, or Carew, or Suckling,
adapted to some simple old melody, as I have had
from listening to a lady amateur sky lark it, up
and down, through the finest bravura of Rossini
or Mozart.
We have very pretty music in the evenings,
occasionally, between her and the captain;
assisted
sometimes by Master Simon, who scrapes
dubiously on his violin; being very apt to get
out, and to halt a note or two in the rear.
Sometimes he even thrums a little on the piano,
or takes a part in a trio, in which his voice can
generally be distinguished by a certain quavering
tone and an occasional false note.
I was praising the fair Julia's performance
to him after one of her songs, when I found he
took the whole credit of having formed her
musical taste; assuring me that she was very
apt; and indeed, summing up her whole
character
,
in his knowing way, by adding that she
was a very nice girl, and had no nonsense about
her.
THE WIDOW.
She was so charitable and piteous
She would weep if that she saw a mouse
Caught in a trap, if it were dead or bled;
Of small houndes had she, that she fed,
With rost flesh, milke and wastel bread,
But sore wept she, if any of them were dead,
Or if men smote them with a yard smart.
Chaucer
.
I AM much better pleased with Lady
Lillycraft
than I fancied I should have been.
Notwithstanding
the little parade of her arrival, she
has none of the petty stateliness that I imagined;
but, on the contrary, she has a degree of navet
and simpleheartedness, if I may use the phrase,
that mingles well with her old fashioned
manners
and harmless ostentation. She dresses in
rich silks, with long waist; she rouges
considerably
,
and her hair, which is nearly white, is
frizzed
out, and put up with pins. Her face is
pitted
with the small pox, but the delicacy of her
features shows that she once may have been
beautiful, and she has a very fair and well
proportioned
hand and arm, of which, if I mistake
not, the good lady is still a little vain. I have had
the curiosity to gather a few particulars
concerning
her. She was a great belle in town, between
thirty and forty years since, and reigned for two
seasons with all the insolence of beauty;
refusing
several excellent offers, when she was
unfortunately
robbed of her charms and her lovers
by an attack of the small pox. She retired
immediately
into the country; where she some
time after inherited an estate, and married a
Baronet, a former admirer, whose passion had
suddenly revived; having, as he said,
always
loved her mind rather than her person.
The Baronet did not enjoy her mind and
fortune
above six months, and had scarcely grown
very tired of her, when he broke his neck in a
fox chase, and left her free, rich, and
disconsolate
.
She has remained on her estate in the
country ever since, and has never shown any
desire to return to town, and revisit the scene of
her early triumphs and fatal malady. All her
favourite recollections, however, revert to that
short period of her youthful beauty.
She has no idea of town, but as it was at that
time, and continually forgets that the place and
people must have changed materially in half a
century. She will often speak of the toasts of
those days, as if still reigning; and until very
recently, used to talk with delight of the royal
family, and the beauty of the young princes and
princesses. She cannot be brought to think of
the present king, other than as an elegant young
man, rather wild; but who danced a minuet
divinely
:
and, before he came to the crown,
would often mention him as the sweet young
prince.
She talks of the walks in Kensington
gardens
,
where the gentlemen appeared in
gold-lace
coats and cocked hats, and the ladies in
hoops, and swept so proudly along the grassy
avenues; and she thinks the ladies let themselves
sadly down in their dignity, when they gave up
VOL. I. 7
cushioned head dresses and high heeled shoes.
She has much to say too of the officers who
were in the train of her admirers; and speaks
familiarly of many wild young blades, that are
now perhaps hobbling about watering places
with crutches and gouty shoes.
Whether the taste the good lady had of
matrimony
discouraged her or not I cannot say,
but, though her merits and her riches have
attracted
many suitors, she has never been tempted
to venture again into the happy state. This is
singular too, for she seems to have a most soft
and susceptible heart; is always talking of love
and connubial felicity, and is a great stickler for
old fashioned gallantry; devoted attentions and
eternal constancy on the part of the gentlemen.
She lives after her own taste. Her house, I
am told, must have been built and furnished
about the time of Sir Charles Grandison. Every
thing about it is somewhat formal and stately;
but has been softened down into a degree of
voluptuousness
,
characteristic of an old lady very
tender hearted and romantic, and that loves her
ease. The cushions of the great arm chairs and
wide sofas almost bury you when you sit down
on them. Flowers of the most rare and delicate
kind are stood about the room on little
japanned
stands, and sweet bays lie about the tables
and mantle pieces. The house is full of pet
dogs, Angola cats, and singing birds, who are
as carefully waited upon as she is herself.
She is dainty in her living, and a little of an
epicure, living on white meats, and little
ladylike
dishes; though her servants have
substantial
old English fare, as their looks bear
witness
.
Indeed, they are so indulged that they
are all spoiled, and when they lose their present
places they will be fit for no other. Her
ladyship
is one of those easy tempered beings that
are always doomed to be much liked and ill
served by their domestics, and cheated by all
the world.
Much of her time is passed in reading novels,
of which she has a most extensive library, and
has a constant supply from the publishers in town.
Her erudition in this line of literature is immense;
she has kept pace with the press for half a
century
.
Her mind is stuffed with love tales of all
kinds, from the stately amours of the old books of
chivalry down to the last blue covered romance
reeking from the printers: though she evidently
gives the preference to those that came out in
the days of her youth, when she was first in love.
She maintains that there are no novels written
now-a-days equal to Pamela, and Sir Charles
Grandison; and she places the Castle of Otranto
at the head of all the romances.
She does a vast deal of good in her
neighbourhood
,
and is imposed on by every beggar in the
country. She is the benefactress of a village
adjoining her estate; and takes an especial
interest
in all its love affairs. She knows of every
courtship that is going on; every love-lorn
damsel
is sure to find a patient listener and a sage
adviser in her ladyship. She takes great pains
to reconcile all love quarrels; and should any
faithless swain persist in his inconstancy, he is
sure to draw on himself the good lady's violent
indignation.
I have learned these particulars partly from
Frank Bracebridge, and partly from Master
Simon
.
I am now able to account for the
assiduous
attention of the latter to her ladyship. Her
house is one of his favourite resorts, where he is
a very important personage. He makes her a
visit of business once a year, when he looks into
all her affairs, which, as she is no manager, are
apt to get into confusion. He examines the
books of the overseer, and shoots about the
estate
,
which he says is well stocked with game,
notwithstanding that it is poached by all the
vagabonds
in the neighbourhood.
It is thought, as I before hinted, that the
captain
will inherit the greater part of her property,
having always been her chief favourite; for in
fact she is partial to a red coat. She has now
come to the Hall to be present at his nuptials,
having a great disposition to interest herself in
all matters of love and matrimony.
FAMILY RELIQUES.
My Infelice's face, her brow, her eye,
The dimple on her cheek; and such sweet skill
Hath from the cunning workman's pencil flown:
These lips look fresh and lively as her own.
False colours last after the true be dead.
Of all the roses grafted on her cheeks,
Of all the graces dancing in her eyes,
Of all the music set upon her tongue,
Of all that was past woman's excellence
In her white bosom; look, a painted board
Circumscribes all!
Dekker
.
An
old English family mansion is a fertile
subject
for study. It abounds with illustrations of
former times, and traces of the tastes and
humours
and manners of successive generations.
The alterations and additions in different styles of
architecture, the furniture, plate, pictures,
hangings
;
the warlike and sporting implements of
different ages and fancies, all furnish food for
curious and amusing speculation. As the Squire
is very careful in collecting and preserving all
family reliques, the Hall is full of remembrances
of the kind. In looking about the establishment
I can picture to myself the character and habits
that have prevailed at different eras of the family
history. I have mentioned, on a former
occasion
,
the armour of the Crusader which hangs
up in the Hall. There are, also, several
jackboots
,
with enormously thick soles and high
heels, that belonged to a set of cavaliers, who
filled the Hall with the din and stir of arms
during
the time of the covenanters. A number of
enormous drinking vessels of antique fashion,
with huge Venice glasses, and green hock glasses,
with the apostles in relief on them, remain as
monuments of a generation or two of hard livers,
that led a life of roaring revelry, and first
introduced
the gout into the family.
I shall pass over several more such indications
of temporary tastes of the Squire's
predecessors
;
but I cannot forbear to notice a pair of
antlers in the great Hall, which is one of the
trophies of a hard-riding Squire of former times,
who was the Nimrod of these parts. There are
many traditions of his wonderful feats in
hunting
still existing, which are related by Old
Christy, the huntsman, who gets into a terrible
passion if they are in the least doubted.
Indeed
,
there is a frightful chasm a few miles from
the Hall, which goes by the name of the Squire's
leap, from his having cleared it in the ardour of
the chase; there can be no doubt of the fact, for
Old Christy shows the very dents of the horse's
hoofs on the rocks on each side of the chasm.
Master Simon holds the memory of this
squire in great veneration, and has a number of
extraordinary stories to tell concerning him,
which he repeats at all hunting dinners; and I
am told that they wax more and more
marvellous
,
the older they grow. He has also a pair
of Rippon spurs, which belonged to this mighty
hunter of yore, and which he only wears on
particular
occasions.
The place, however, which abounds most
with mementos of past times, is the picture
gallery
;
and there is something strangely pleasing,
though melancholy, in considering the long rows
of portraits which compose the greater part of
the collection. They furnish a kind of
narrative
of the lives of the family worthies, which I
am enabled to read, with the assistance of the
venerable housekeeper, who is the family
chronicler
,
prompted occasionally by Master Simon.
There is the progress of a fine lady, for instance,
through a variety of portraits:one represents
her as a little girl, with a long waist and hoop,
holding a kitten in her arms, and ogling the
spectator out of the corners of her eyes, as if
she could not turn her head. In another, we
find her in the freshness of youthful beauty,
when she was a celebrated belle, and so hard
hearted as to cause several unfortunate
gentlemen
to run desperate and write bad poetry. In
another, she is depicted as a stately dame, in the
maturity of her charms, next to the portrait of
her husband, a gallant colonel in full-bottomed
wig and gold laced hat, who was killed abroad;
and finally, her monument is in the church, the
spire of which may be seen from the window;
VOL. I. 8
where her effigy is carved in marble, and
represents
her as a venerable dame of seventy-six.
In like manner I have followed some of the
family great men through a series of pictures,
from early boyhood to the robe of dignity or
truncheon of command, and so on by degrees,
until they were garnered up in the common
repository
,
the neighbouring church.
There is one group that particularly interested
me. It consisted of four sisters of nearly the
same age, who flourished about a century since,
and, if I may judge from their portraits, were
extremely beautiful. I can imagine what a
scene of gayety and romance this old mansion
must have been, when they were in the heyday
of their charms; when they passed like
beautiful
visions through its halls, or stepped daintily
to music in the revels and dances of the cedar
gallery; or printed with delicate feet the velvet
verdure of these lawns. How must they have
been looked up to with mingled love, and pride,
and reverence, by the old family servants; and
followed with almost painful admiration by the
aching eyes of rival admirers. How must
melody
and song, and tender serenade have
breathed
about these courts, and their echoes whispered
to the loitering tread of lovers. How must these
very turrets have made the hearts of the young
galliards thrill as they first discerned them from
afar, rising from among the trees; and pictured
to themselves the beauties casketted like gems
within these walls. Indeed, I have discovered
about the place several faint records of this reign
of love and romance, when the Hall was a kind
of court of beauty.
Several of the old romances in the library have
marginal notes expressing sympathy and
approbation
,
where there are long speeches extolling
ladies' charms, or protesting eternal fidelity, or
bewailing the cruelty of some tyrannical fair one.
The interviews, and declarations, and parting
scenes of tender lovers, also bear the marks of
having been frequently read, and are scored, and
marked with notes of admiration, and have
initials
written on the margins; most of which
annotations have the day of the month and year
annexed to them. Several of the windows too,
have scraps of poetry engraved on them with
diamonds taken from the writings of the fair
Mrs. Philips, the once celebrated Orinda. Some
of these seem to have been inscribed by lovers;
and others, in a delicate and unsteady hand, and
a little inaccurate in the spelling, have evidently
been written by the young ladies themselves, or
by female friends who have been on visits to the
Hall. Mrs. Philips seems to have been their
favourite author, and they have distributed the
names of her heroes and heroines among their
circle of intimacy. Sometimes, in a male hand,
the verse bewails the cruelty of beauty, and the
sufferings of constant love; while, in a female
hand, it prudishly confines itself to lamenting the
parting of female friends. The bow window
of my bed room, which has doubtless been
inhabited
by one of these beauties, has several of
these inscriptions. I have one at this moment
before my eyes, called,
CAMILLA PARTING WITH LEONORA.
How perished is the joy that's past,
The present how unsteady,
What comfort can be great and last,
When this is gone already.
And close by it is another, written, perhaps, by
some adventurous lover who had stolen into the
lady's chamber during her absence:
THEODOSIUS TO CAMILLA.
I'd rather in your favour live,
Than in a lasting name;
And much a greater rate would give
For happiness than fame.
Theodosius
. 1700.'
When I look at these faint records of gallantry
and tenderness; when I contemplate the fading
portraits of these beautiful girls, and think too
that they have long since bloomed, reigned,
grown old, died and passed away, and with them
all their graces, their triumphs, their rivalries,
their admirers; the whole empire of love and
pleasure in which they ruledall dead, all
buried
,
all forgotten, I find a cloud of melancholy
stealing over the present gayeties around me.
I was gazing, in a musing mood, this very
morning, at the portrait of the lady whose
husband
was killed abroad; when the fair Julia
entered
the gallery, leaning on the arm of the
captain
.
The sun shone through the row of
windows
on her as she passed along, and she seemed
to beam out each time into brightness, and
relapse
into shade, until the door at the bottom of
the gallery closed after her. I felt a sadness at
heart, at the idea that this was an emblem of her
lot. A few more years of sunshine and shade,
and all this life, and loveliness, and enjoyment,
shall have ceased, and nothing shall be left to
commemorate this beautiful being but one more
perishable portrait; to awaken, perhaps, the trite
speculations of some future loiterer, like myself,
when I and my scribblings shall have lived
through our brief existence, and been forgotten.
AN OLD SOLDIER.
I've worn some leather out abroad; let out a heathen soul or
two; fed this good sword with the black blood of pagan Christians;
converted a few infidels with it. But let that pass.
The Ordinary
.
The
Hall was thrown into some little
agitation
a few days since, by the arrival of General
Harbottle. He had been expected for several
days; and had been looked for rather
impatiently
,
by several of the family. Master
Simon
assured me that I would like the general
hugely, for he was a blade of the old school,
and an excellent table companion. Lady
Lillycraft
also appeared to be somewhat fluttered
on the morning of the General's arrival, for he
had been one of her early admirers; and she
recollected him only as a dashing young
ensign
,
just come upon the town. She actually
spent an hour longer at her toilette, and made
her appearance with her hair uncommonly
frizzed
and powdered, and an additional quantity of
rouge on her face. She was evidently a little
surprised and shocked, therefore, at finding the
little dashing ensign transformed into a
corpulent
old general, with a double chin; though it
was a perfect picture to witness their
salutations
:
the graciousness of her profound curtsey,
and the air of the old school, with which the
general took off his hat, swayed it gently in his
hand, and bowed his powdered head.
All this bustle and anticipation has caused
me to study the general with a little more
attention
than, perhaps, I should otherwise have
done; and the few days that he has already
passed at the Hall have enabled me, I think, to
furnish a tolerable likeness of him to the reader.
He is, as Master Simon observed, a soldier of
the old school, with powdered head, side locks,
and pig tail. His face is shaped like the stern
of a Dutch man of war, narrow at top and wide
at bottom; with full rosy cheeks and a double
chin; so that, to use the cant of the day, his
organs of eating may be said to be powerfully
developed. The general, though a veteran, has
seen very little active service, except the taking
of Seringapatam, which forms an era in his
history
.
He wears a large emerald in his bosom,
and a diamond on his finger, which he got on
that occasion, and whosoever is unlucky enough
to notice either, is sure to involve himself in the
whole history of the siege. To judge from the
general's conversation, the taking of
Seringapatam
is the most important affair that has
occurred
for the last century.
On the approach of warlike times on the
continent
he was rapidly promoted to get him out
of the way of younger officers of merit, until
having been hoisted to the rank of general, he
was quietly laid on the shelf. Since that time
his campaigns have been principally confined to
watering places, where he drinks the waters for a
slight touch of the liver, which he got in India;
and plays whist with old dowagers, with whom
he has flirted in his younger days. Indeed he talks
of all the fine women of the last half century;
VOL. I. 9
and, according to hints which he now and then
drops, has enjoyed the particular smiles of
many of them.
He has seen considerable garrison duty, and
can speak of almost every place famous for
good quarters, and where the inhabitants give
good dinners. He is a diner out of first rate
currency, when in town; being invited to one
place because he has been seen at another. In
the same way he is invited about to country
seats, and can describe half the seats in the
kingdom, from actual observation; nor is any
one better versed in court gossip, and the
pedigrees
and intermarriages of the nobility.
As the general is an old bachelor, and an old
beau, and there are several ladies at the Hall,
especially his quondam flame, Lady Jocelyne,
he is put rather upon his gallantry. He
commonly
passes some time, therefore, at his
toilette
,
and takes the field at a late hour every
morning, with his hair dressed out and
powdered
,
and a rose in his button hole. After he
has breakfasted he walks up and down the
terrace
in the sunshine; humming an air, and
hemming between every stave; carrying one
hand behind his back, and with the other
touching
his cane to the ground, and then raising it
up to his shoulder. Should he, in these
morning
promenades, meet any of the elder ladies of
the family, as he frequently does Lady Jocelyne,
his hat is immediately in his hand, and it is
enough to remind one of those courtly groups
of ladies and gentlemen, in old prints of
Windsor
terrace or Kensington Garden.
He talks frequently about the service, and
is fond of humming the old song,
Why, soldiers, why,
Should we be melancholy, boys?
Why, soldiers, why,
Whose business 'tis to die!
I cannot discover, however, that the general has
ever run any great risk of dying, except from
an apoplexy or an indigestion. He criticises all
the battles on the continent, and discusses the
merits of the commanders, but never fails to
bring the conversation ultimately to Tippoo
Saib and Seringapatam. He insists that
Bonaparte
was no general; and that he was a great
coward for running away from the army after
the battle of Leipsick, and for not putting
himself
in the way of being shot on the field of
Waterloo. I am told that the general was a
perfect
champion at drawing rooms, parades, and
watering places, during the late war, and was
looked to with hope and confidence by many an
old lady, when labouring under the terror of
Bonaparte's invasion.
He is thoroughly loyal, and attends
punctually
on levees when in town. He has
treasured
up many sayings of the late king's;
particularly
one which the king made to him on a
field day, complimenting him on the excellence
of his horse. He extols the whole royal family,
but especially the present king, whom he
pronounces
the most perfect gentleman and best
whist player in Europe.
The general swears rather more than is the
fashion of the present day; but it was the mode
in the old school. He is, however, very strict
in religious matters; and a staunch churchman.
He repeats the responses very loud in church,
and is emphatical in praying for the king and
royal family.
The general is amazingly well contented
with the present state of things, and with every
thing about him. He goes about from dinner
to dinner and country seat to country seat, and
wonders how people can be dissatisfied in a
country where a man has nothing to do but to
dine out at other people's expense and to loll on
sofas. He is a thorough disbeliever in all
tales about national ruin and public distresses;
which, he insists upon it, are all got up by the
radicals; and as to the poor, he swears they all
starve out of mere idleness, or to bring the
ministry
into disgrace.
His loyalty waxes more fervent with his
second
bottle; and the song of God Save the
King puts him into an ecstacy.
His heart brimmed over with patriotism and
good feeding this very day, at dinner, as he cast
his eyes about the ample board loaded with
luxuries.
They talk of public distress, said the
general
to me, as he smacked a glass of rich
Burgundy
,
but where do we find it, sir? I see
none, I see no reason any one has to complain.
Take my word for it, sir, this talk about public
distress is all humbug!
THE WIDOW'S RETINUE.
Little dogs and all!
Lear
.
In
giving an account of the arrival of Lady
Lillycraft at the Hall, I ought to have
mentioned
the entertainment which I derived from
witnessing
the unpacking of her carriage, and the
disposing of her retinue. There is something
extremely amusing to me in the number of
faetitious
wants; the loads of imaginary
conveniencies
,
but real incumbrances, with which the
luxurious are apt to burthen themselves. I like
to watch the whimsical stir and display about
one of these petty progresses. The number of
robustious footmen and retainers of all kinds
bustling about, with looks of infinite gravity and
importance, to do almost nothing. The number
of heavy trunks and parcels, and band-boxes,
belonging to my lady; and the solicitude
exhibited
about some odd looking box, by my lady's
maid. The cushions piled in the carriage to
make a soft seat still softer, and to prevent the
dreaded possibility of a jolt. The smelling
bottles
;
the cordials; the baskets of biscuit and
fruit; the new publications; all provided to guard
against hunger, fatigue, or ennui; the led horses
to vary the mode of travelling; and all this
preparation
and parade to move, perhaps, some very
good for nothing personage, about a little space
of earth! It reminds me of the vast bustle and
pains-taking of the redoubtable Belzoni, and his
myrmidons of the Nile, to transport some
Egyptian
mummy; or, perhaps, to trundle off some
mutilated statue at the rate of a few inches in an
hour.
I do not mean to apply the latter part of these
observations to Lady Lillycraft, for whose
simple
kindheartedness I have a very great respect,
and who is really a most amiable and worthy
being. I cannot refrain, however, from
mentioning
some of the motley retinue she has
brought with her; and which, indeed, bespeak
the overflowing kindness of her nature, which
requires her to be surrounded with objects on
which to lavish it.
In the first place, her ladyship has a pampered
coachman, with a red face and cheeks that hang
down like dew-laps. He evidently domineers
over her a little with respect to the fat horses;
and only drives out when he thinks proper, and
when he thinks it will be good for the cattle.
She has a favourite page to attend upon her
persona handsome boy of about twelve years
of age, but a mischievous varlet; very much
spoiled, and in a fair way to be good for nothing.
He is dressed in green, with a profusion of gold
cord and gilt buttons about his clothes. She
always
has one or two attendants of the kind, who
are replaced by others as soon as they grow to
fourteen years of age. She has brought two
dogs with her also, out of a number of pets
which she maintains at home. One is a fat
spaniel
,
called Zephyr, though heaven defend me
VOL. I. 10
from such a zephyr. He is fed out of all shape
and comfort; his eyes are nearly strained out of
his head; he wheezes with corpulency, and
cannot
walk without great difficulty. The other is
a little old gray muzzled curmudgeon, with an
unhappy eye that kindles like a coal if you only
look at him; his nose turns up, his mouth is
drawn into wrinkles, so as to show his teeth;
in short, he has altogether the look of a dog far
gone in misanthropy, and totally sick of the
world. When he walks, he has his tail curled
up so tight that it seems to lift his feet from the
ground; and he seldom makes use of more than
three legs at a time, keeping the other drawn up
as a reserve. This last wretch is called Beauty.
These dogs are full of elegant ailments
unknown
to vulgar dogs; and are petted and
nursed
by Lady Lillycraft with the tenderest
kindness
.
They are pampered and fed with
delicacies
by their fellow minion, the page, but their
stomachs are often weak and out of order, so
that they cannot eat; though I have now and
then seen the page give them a mischievous pinch
or thwack on the head when his mistress was
not by. They have cushions for their express
use, on which they lie before the fire, and yet
are apt to shiver and moan, if there is the least
draught of air. When any one enters the room
they make a most tyrannical barking, that is
absolutely deafening. They are insolent to all
the other dogs of the establishment. There is
a noble stag hound, a great favourite of the
Squire's, who is a privileged visiter to the
parlour
,
but the moment he makes his appearance,
these intruders fly at him with furious rage, and
I have admired the indifference and contempt
with which he seems to look down upon his
puny assailants. When her ladyship drives out,
these dogs are generally carried with her to take
the air; when they look out of each window of
the carriage and bark at all vulgar pedestrian
dogs. These dogs are a continual source of
misery to the household; as they are always in
the way; they every now and then get their
toes trod on, and then there is a yelping on their
part, and a loud lamentation on the part of their
mistress, that fills the room with clamour and
confusion.
Lastly, there is her ladyship's waiting
gentlewoman
,
Mrs. Hannah, a prim pragmatical old
maid; one of the most intolerable and intolerant
virgins that ever lived. She has kept her virtue
by her, until it has turned sour, and now every
word and look smacks of verjuice. She is the
very opposite to her mistress, for one hates and
the other loves all mankind. How they first
came together I cannot imagine; but they have
lived together for many years; and the Abigail's
temper being tart and encroaching, and her
ladyship's
easy and yielding, the former has got the
complete upper hand, and tyrannizes over the
good lady in secret. Lady Lillycraft now and
then complains of it, in great confidence, to her
friends; but hushes up the subject immediately,
if Mrs. Hannah makes her appearance. Indeed,
she has been so accustomed to be attended by her,
that she thinks she could not do without her;
though one great study of her life is to keep
Mrs. Hannah in good humour by little presents
and kindnesses.
Master Simon has a most devout abhorrence,
mingled with awe, for this ancient spinster. He
told me the other day, in a whisper, that she was
a cursed brimstonein fact, he added another
epithet, which I would not repeat for the world.
I have remarked, however, that he is always
extremely civil to her when they meet.
READY MONEY JACK.
My purse, it is my privy wyfe,
This song I dare both syng and say,
It keepeth men from grievous stryfe,
When every man for hymself shall pay.
As I ryde in ryche array
For gold and sylver men wyll me floryshe,
By this matter I dare well saye,
Ever gramercy myne owne purse.
Book of Hunting
.
On
the skirts of the neighbouring village there
lives a kind of small potentate, who, for aught I
know, is a representative of one of the most
ancient
legitimate lines of the present day, for the
empire over which he reigns has belonged to his
family time out of mind. His territories
comprise
a considerable number of good fat acres,
and his seat of power is in an old farm house,
where he enjoys, unmolested, the stout oaken
chair of his ancestors. The personage to whom
I allude is a sturdy old yeoman of the name of
John Tibbets; or rather, Ready Money Jack
Tibbets, as he is called throughout the
neighbourhood
.
The first place where he attracted my
attention
,
was in the church-yard on Sunday; where
he sat on a tomb-stone after the service, with his
hat a little on one side, holding forth to a small
circle of auditors; and, as I presumed,
expounding
the law and the prophets, until, on drawing
a little nearer, I found he was only expatiating
on the merits of a brown horse. He presented
such a picture of a substantial English yeoman,
as he is often described in books, mingled with
some little finery, peculiar to himself, that I
could not but take note of his whole
appearance
.
He was between fifty and sixty, of a strong
muscular frame, and at least six feet high; with
a physiognomy as grave as a lion's, and set off
with short curling iron gray locks. His shirt
collar was turned down, and displayed a neck
covered with the same short, curling hair, and he
wore a coloured silk neck-cloth, tied very
loosely
,
and tucked in at the bosom with a green paste
broach on the knot. His coat was of dark green
cloth with silver buttons, on each of which was
engraved
a stag, with his own name, John Tibbets,
underneath. He had an inner waistcoat of
figured
chintz; between which and his coat was
another
of scarlet cloth, unbuttoned. His breeches
were also left unbuttoned at the knees; not from
any slovenliness, but to show a broad pair of
scarlet
garters. His stockings were blue, with white
clocks; he wore large silver shoe buckles; a
broad paste buckle in his hat band, his sleeve
buttons
were gold seven shilling pieces, and he had
two or three guineas hanging as ornaments to his
watch chain.
On making some inquiries about him, I
gathered
that he was descended from a line of farmers
that had always lived on the same spot, and
owned the same property; and that half of the
church-yard was taken up with the tomb-stones of
his race. He has all his life been an important
character in the place. When a youngster he
was one of the most roaring blades of the
neighbourhood
.
No one could match him at
wrestling
,
pitching the bar, cudgel play, and other
athletic
exercises. Like the renowned Pinner of
Wakefield, he was the village champion, carried
off the prizes at all the fairs, and threw his
gauntlet
at the country round. Even to this day the
old people talk of his prowess, and undervalue
in comparison all heroes of the green that have
succeeded him; nay, they say, that if Ready
Money Jack were to take the field even now,
there is no one could stand before him.
When Jack's father died, the neighbours shook
their heads, and predicted that young hopeful
would soon make way with the old homestead;
but Jack falsified all their predictions. The
moment he succeeded to the paternal farm, he
assumed a new character; took a wife;
attended
resolutely to his affairs, and became an
industrious
thrifty farmer. With the family property
he inherited a set of old family maxims to which
he steadily adhered. He saw to every thing
himself; put his own hand to the plough;
worked
VOL. I. 11
hard; eat heartily; slept soundly; paid for
every thing in cash down; and never danced
except
he could do it to the music of his own
money
in both pockets. He has never been without
a hundred or two pounds in golden guineas by
him, and never allows a debt to stand against
him. This has gained him his current name, of
which, by the bye, he is a little proud; and has
caused him to be looked upon as a very wealthy
man by all the village.
Notwithstanding his thrift, however, he has
never denied himself the amusements of life;
but has taken a share in every passing pleasure.
It is his maxim that he that works hard can
afford to play. He is therefore an attendant
at all the country fairs and wakes, and has
signalized
himself by feats of strength and prowess
on every village green in the shire. He often
makes his appearance at horse races, and sports
his half guinea, and even his guinea at a time;
keeps a good horse for his own riding; and to
this day is fond of following the hounds, and is
generally in at the death. He keeps up the rus
tic revels and hospitalities too, for which his
paternal farm house has always been noted; has
plenty of good cheer and dancing at harvest home,
and above all keeps the merry night,
*
*
Merry night
. A rustic merry making in a farm house about
Christmas. There is abundance of homely fare: tea, cakes, fruit, and
ale; various feats of agility, amusing games, romping, dancing, and
kissing withal. They commonly break up at midnight.
as it is
termed, at Christmas.
With all his love of amusement, Jack is by no
means a boisterous jovial companion. He is
seldom known to laugh in the midst of his gayety;
but maintains the same lion-like demeanour.
He is very slow at comprehending a joke; and
is apt to sit puzzling at it with a perplexed look,
while the rest of the company are in a roar.
This gravity has perhaps grown on him with the
growing weight of his character; for he is
gradually
growing into patriarchal dignity in his
native place. Though he no longer takes an
active part in athletic sports, yet he always
presides
at them, and is appealed to on all occasions
as umpire. He maintains the peace on the
village
green at holyday games; and quells all
brawls and quarrels by collaring the parties and
shaking them heartily, if refractory. No one
ever pretends to raise a hand against him, or to
contend against his decisions; the young men
having grown up in habitual awe of his prowess,
and in implicit deference to him as the champion
and lord of the green.
He is a regular frequenter of the village
tavern
;
the landlady having been a sweetheart of
his in early life; and he having always continued
on kind terms with her. He seldom, however,
drinks any thing but a draught of ale; smokes
his pipe, and pays his reckoning before leaving
the bar room. Here he gives his little senate
laws; decides bets, which are generally referred
to him; determines upon the characters and
qualities of horses, and indeed plays now and
then the part of a judge in settling petty disputes
between neighbours, which otherwise might
have been nursed by country attorneys into
tolerable
lawsuits. Jack is very candid and
impartial
in his decisions, but he has not a head to
carry
a long argument, and is very apt to get
perplexed
and out of patience if there is much
pleading
.
He generally breaks through the argument
with a strong voice, and brings matters to a
summary conclusion, by pronouncing what he
calls the upshot of the business, or, in other
words, the long and the short of the matter.
Jack once made a journey to London a great
many years since, which has furnished him with
topics of conversation ever since. He saw the
old king on the terrace at Windsor, who stopped
and pointed him out to one of the princesses,
being probably struck with Jack's truly
yeoman-like
appearance. This is a favourite anecdote
with him, and has no doubt had a great effect in
making him a most loyal subject ever since, in
spite of taxes and poor's rates. He was, also, at
Bartholomew fair, where he had half the buttons
cut off his coat, and a gang of pickpockets,
attracted
by his external show of gold and silver,
made a regular attempt to hustle him as he was
gazing at a show; but for once they found that
they had caught a tartar; for Jack enacted as
great wonders among the gang, as Samson did
among the Philistines. One of his neighbours,
who had accompanied him to town, and was
with him at the fair, brought back an account
of his exploits, which raised the pride of the
whole village, who considered their champion
as having subdued all London, and eclipsed the
achievements of Friar Tuck, or even the
renowned
Robin Hood himself.
Of late years the old fellow has seemed to
take things more easily; works less; and
indulges
in greater leisure; his son having grown
up and succeeded to him, both in the labours of
the farm, and the exploits of the green. Like
all sons of distinguished men, however, his
father's
renown is a disadvantage to him; he can
never come up to public expectation. Though
a fine active fellow of three-and-twenty, and
quite the cock of the walk, yet the old
people
declare he is nothing like what Ready
Money
Jack was at his time of life. The
youngster
himself acknowledges his inferiority, and
has a wonderful opinion of the old man, who
indeed taught him all his athletic
accomplishments
,
and holds such a sway over him, that I
am told even to this day he would have no
hesitation to take him in hands, if he rebelled
against paternal government.
The squire holds Jack in very high esteem,
and shows him to all his visiters as a specimen
of old English heart of oak. He frequently
calls at his house and tastes some of his
home-brewed
,
which is excellent. He made Jack a
present of old Tusser's Hundredth points of
good Husbandrie, which has furnished him with
reading ever since, and is his text book and
manual
in all agricultural and domestic concerns.
He has made dog's ears at the most favourite
passages, and knows many of the poetical
maxims
by heart.
Tibbets, though not a man to be daunted or
fluttered by high acquaintances, and though he
cherishes a sturdy independence of mind and
manner, yet is evidently gratified by the
attentions
of the Squire, whom he has known from
boyhood, and pronounces a true gentleman
every inch of him. He is, also, on excellent
terms with Master Simon, who is a kind of privy
counsellor to the family; but his great favourite
is the Oxonian, whom he taught to wrestle and
play at quarter-staff when a boy, and considers
the most promising young gentleman in the
whole county.
BACHELORS.
The Bachelor most joyfully
In pleasant plight doth pass his daies;
Good fellowship and companie
He doth maintain and kepe alwaies.
Evans' Old Ballads
.
There
is no character in the comedy of
human
life that is more difficult to play well, than
that of an old bachelor. When a single
gentleman
therefore arrives at that critical period when
he begins to consider it an impertiment question
to be asked his age, I would advise him to look
well to his ways. This period, it is true, is much
later with some men than with others; I have
witnessed more than once the meeting of two
wrinkled old lads of this kind, who had not seen
each other for several years, and have been
amused by the amicable exchange of
compliments
on each other's appearance, that takes
VOL. I. 12
place on such occasions. There is always one
invariable observation. Why, bless my soul!
you look younger than when last I saw you!
Whenever a man's friends begin to compliment
him about looking young, he may be sure that
they think he is growing old.
I am led to make these remarks, by the
conduct
of Master Simon and the general, who have
become great cronies. As the former is the
youngest by many years, he is regarded as quite
a youthful blade by the general, who moreover
looks upon him as a man of great wit and
prodigious
acquirements. I have already hinted
that Master Simon is a family beau, and
considered
rather a young fellow by all the elderly ladies
of the connexion, for an old bachelor in an old
family connexion, is something like an actor in
a regular company; who seems to flourish in
immortal youth, and will continue to play the
Romeos and Rangers for half a century together.
Master Simon, too, is a little of the camelion,
and takes a different hue with every different
companion. He is very attentive and courteous,
and somewhat sentimental with Lady Lillycraft;
copies out little namby pamby ditties and love
songs for her, and draws quivers, and doves, and
darts, and Cupids, to be worked on the corners
of her pocket handkerchiefs. He indulges,
however
,
in very considerable latitude with the other
married ladies of the family, and has many sly
pleasantries to whisper to them, that provoke an
equivocal laugh and a tap of the fan. But when
he gets among the young company, such as
Frank Bracebridge, the Oxonian, and the
general
,
he is apt to put on the mad-wag, and to talk
in a very bachelor-like strain about the sex.
In this he has been encouraged by the
example
of the general, whom he looks up to as a
man of the ton, that has seen the world. The
general, in fact, tells shocking stories after
dinner
,
when the ladies are gone, which he gives as
some of the choice things that are served up at
a knot of
bon vivants
in London, called the
Mulligatawney
Club. He also repeats a great many
fat jokes of old Major Slingsby, the wit of the
club, which the general can hardly relate for
laughing, though they always make the Squire
look grave, who has a great antipathy to a bawdy
jest. In a word, the general is a complete
instance
of that declension in gay life, by which a
young man of pleasure is apt to cool down into
an obscene old gentleman.
I saw him and Master Simon, an evening or
two since, conversing with a buxom milkmaid in
a meadow; and from their elbowing each other
now and then, and the general's shaking his
shoulders, blowing up his cheeks, and breaking
out into a short fit of irrepressible laughter, I had
no doubt that they were playing the mischief
with the girl.
As I looked at them through a hedge, I could
not but think they would have made a tolerable
group for a modern picture of Susannah and the
two elders; it is true, the girl seemed in no wise
alarmed at the force of the enemy, and I
question
,
had either of them been alone, whether she
would not have been more than they would have
ventured to encounter. Such veteran roysters
are daring wags when together, and will put
any female to the blush with their jokes, but they
are as quiet as lambs, when they fall singly into
the clutches of a fine woman.
In spite of the general's years, he evidently
is a little vain of his person, and ambitious of
conquests. I have observed him on Sunday in
church, eying the country girls most suspiciously,
and have even seen him leer upon them, with a
downright amorous look, even when he has been
gallanting Lady Lillycraft with great ceremony
through the church-yard. The general, in fact,
is a veteran in the service of Cupid, rather than
Mars, having signalized himself in all the
garrison
towns and country quarters, and seen service
in every ball room of England. Not a
celebrated
beauty but he has laid siege to; and if his
word may be taken in a matter wherein no man
is apt to be veracious, it is incredible the success
he has had with the fair. At present he is like a
worn-out warrior retired from service, but who
still cocks his beaver with a military air, and
talks stoutly of fighting whenever he comes
within the smell of gunpowder.
I have heard him speak his mind very freely
over his bottle, about the folly of the captain in
taking a wife, as he thinks a young soldier should
care for nothing but his bottle and kind
landlady
;
but, in fact, he says the service on the
continent has played the mischief with the young
men; they have been ruined by light wines and
French quadrilles. They've nothing, he says, of
the spirit of the old service. There are none of
your six-bottle men left, that were the souls of a
mess dinner, and used to play the very deuce
among the women.
As to a bachelor, the general affirms, that he
is a free and easy man, with no baggage to take
care of but his portmanteau; but a married
man, with his wife hanging on his arm, always
puts him in mind of a chamber candlestick, with
its extinguisher hitched to it.
I should not mind all this if it were merely
confined to the general; but I fear he will be
the ruin of my friend Master Simon, who already
begins to echo his heresies, and to talk in the
style of a gentleman that has seen life, and
lived upon the town. Indeed, he seems to have
taken Master Simon in hand, and talks of
showing
him the lions in London next season, and of
introducing him to the Mulligatawney Club. As
he is continually quoting the sayings of this
club, I have been curious to learn something
about it. I find it is composed of a knot of old
nabobs, officers, and other choice spirits that
have seen service in India, and been burnt out
with curry, and touched with the liver complaint.
They meet regularly to eat Mulligatawney soup,
smoke the Hookah, talk about Tippoo Saib
and Seringapatam, and be tediously agreeable
in each others' company.
WIVES.
Believe me man, there is no greater blisse
Than is the quiet joy of loving wife;
Which whoso wants, half of himselfe doth misse,
Friend without change, play-fellow without strife,
Food without fulnesse, counsaile without strife,
Is this sweet doubling of our single life.
Sir P. Sidney
.
It
is a great pity that plays and novels should
always end at the wedding, and should not give
us another act, and another volume, to let us
know how the hero and heroine conducted
themselves
when married. Their main object seems
to be to instruct young ladies how to get
husbands
;
but not how to keep them; now, this last,
it appears to me, is a desideratum in modern
married life. It is appalling to those who have
not yet ventured into the state to see how soon
the flame of romantic love burns out, or is quench
ed in matrimony; and the passionate poetic
lover
,
declines into the phlegmatic prosaic
husband
.
I am inclined to attribute this very much
to the defect I have just mentioned in the plays
and novels which form the principal study of our
young ladies; and which teach them how to be
heroines, but leave them totally at a loss when
they come to be wives. I have lately, however,
met with an exception to this practice, in an old
writer, who has bravely attempted to support
dramatic interest in favour of a woman even
after
she was married! I was looking over an
album of the fair Julia's, when I found a series
of poetical extracts in the Squire's handwriting,
which might have been intended as matrimonial
advice to his ward. I was so much struck with
the beauty of several of them, that I took the
liberty of making a copy. They are from the
old play of The City Nightcap,
*
*
By Thomas Davenport, 1661.
in which is
drawn out and exemplified, in the part of
Abstemia
,
a character of a patient and faithful wife;
VOL. I. 13
which I think might vie with that of the
renowned
Griselda; though I fear it would stand almost
as little chance of being adopted as a model.
The following is a commendation of her to
her husband Lorenzo:
She's modest, but not sullen, and loves silence,
Not that she wants apt words, (for when she speaks,
She inflames love with wonder,) but because
She calls wise silence the soul's harmony.
She's truly chaste; yet such a foe to coyness,
The poorest call her courteous; and which is excellent,
(Though fair and young,) she shuns to expose herself
To the opinion of strange eyes. She either seldom
Or never walks abroad but in your company;
And then with such sweet bashfulness, as if
She were venturing on crack'd ice, and takes delight
To step into the print your foot hath made,
And will follow you whole fields: so she will drive
Tediousness out of time with her sweet character.
Notwithstanding all this excellence, Abstemia
has the misfortune to incur the unmerited
jealousy
of her husband. Instead, however, of
resenting
his harsh treatment with clamorous
upbraidings
,
and the stormy violence of high windy
virtue, by which the sparks of anger are so often
blown into a flame; she endures it with the
meekness of conscious but patient virtue, and
makes a beautiful appeal to a friend who has
witnessed her long suffering:
Hast thou not seen me
Bear all his injuries, as the ocean suffers
The angry bark to plough thorough her bosom,
And yet is presently so smooth, the eye
Cannot perceive where the wide wound was made.
Lorenzo, being wrought on by false
representations
,
at length repudiates her. To the last,
however, she maintains her patient sweetness;
and her love for him in spite of his cruelty. She
deplores his error even more than his unkindness,
and laments the delusion which has turned his
very affection into a source of bitterness. There
is a moving pathos in her parting address to
Lorenzo
after their divorce:
Farewell Lorenzo
Whom my soul doth love; if you e'er marry
May you meet a good wife, so good, that you
May not suspect her, nor may she be worthy
Of your suspicion: and if you hear hereafter
That I am dead, inquire but my last words,
And you shall know that to the last I lov'd you.
And when you walk forth with your second choice,
Into the pleasant fields, and by chance talk of me,
Imagine that you see me lean and pale,
Strewing your path with flowers.
But may she never live to pay my debts: (
weeps
)
If but in thought she wrong you, may she die
In the conception of the injury.
Pray make me wealthy with one kiss; farewell, sir:
Let it not grieve you when you shall remember
That I was innocent: nor this forget,
Though innocence here suffer, sigh, and groan,
She walks but thorow thorns to find a throne.
In a short time Lorenzo discovers his error;
and the innocence of his injured wife. In the
transports of his repentance he calls to mind all
her feminine excellence, her gentle,
uncomplaining
,
womanly fortitude under wrongs and
sorrows
:
Oh Abstemia!
How lovely thou lookest now! now thou appearest
Chaster than is the morning's modesty,
That rises with a blush, over whose bosom
The western wind creeps softly; now I remember,
How, when she sat at table, her obedient eye
Would dwell on mine, as if it were not well,
Unless it looked when I looked: oh how proud
She was, when she could cross herself to please me!
But where now is this fair soul? Like a silver cloud
She hath wept herself, I fear, into the dead sea,
And will be found no more.
It is but doing right by the reader, if
interested
in the fate of Abstemia, by the preceding
extracts, to say that she was restored to the
arms and affections of her husband, rendered
fonder than ever, by that disposition in every
good heart to atone for past injustice, by an
overflowing measure of returning kindness:
The wealth worth more than kingdoms; I am now
Confirmed past all suspicion, thou art far
Sweeter in thy sincere truth, than a sacrifice
Decked up for death with garlands. The Indian winds
That blow from off the coast, and cheer the sailor
With the sweet savour of their spices, want
The delight flows in thee.
I have been more affected and interested by
this little dramatic picture, than by many a
popular love tale; though, as I said before, I do
not think it likely either Abstemia or patient
Grizzle stand much chance of being taken for
a model. Still I like to see poetry now and then
extending its views beyond the wedding day, and
teaching a lady how to make herself attractive
even after marriage.
There is no great need of enforcing on an
unmarried
lady the necessity of being agreeable;
nor is there any great art requisite in a youthful
beauty to enable her to please. Nature has
multiplied
attractions round heryouth is in itself
attractive. The freshness of budding beauty
needs no foreign aid to set it off; it pleases
merely
because it is fresh, and budding, and beautiful.
But it is for the married state that a woman
needs the most instruction, and in which she
should be most on her guard to maintain her
powers of pleasing. No woman can expect
to be to her husband all that he fancied her,
when he was a lover. Men are always doomed
to be duped, not so much by the arts of the sex,
as by their own imaginations. They are always
wooing goddesses, and marrying mere mortals.
A woman should therefore ascertain what was
the charm that rendered her so fascinating when
a girl, and endeavour to keep it up when she has
become a wife. One great thing undoubtedly
was the chairness of herself and her conduct,
which an unmarried female always observes.
She should maintain the same niceness and
reserve
in her person and habits, and endeavour
still to preserve a freshness and virgin delicacy
in the eye of her husband. She should
remember
that the province of woman is to be wooed,
not to wooto be caressed, not to caress. Man
is an ungrateful being in love; bounty loses
instead
of winning him. The secret of a woman's
power does not consist so much in giving, as in
withholding. A woman may give up too much
even to her husband. It is to a thousand little
delicacies of conduct that she must trust to keep
alive passion, and to protect herself from that
dangerous familiarity, that thorough acquaintance
with every weakness and imperfection incident
to matrimony. By these means she may still
maintain her power, though she has surrendered
her person; and may continue the romance of
love, even beyond the honey moon.
She that hath a wise husband, says Jeremy
Taylor, must entice him to an eternal
dearnesse
by the veil of modesty, and the grave robes
of chastity, the ornament of meeknesse, and the
jewels of faith and charity. She must have no
painting but blushings; her brightness must be
purity, and she must shine round about with
sweetnesses and friendship, and she shall be
pleasant while she lives, and desired when she
dies.
I have wandered into a rambling series of
remarks
on a trite subject, and a dangerous one for
a bachelor to meddle with. That I may not,
however, appear to confine my observations
entirely
to the wife, I will conclude with another
quotation from Jeremy Taylor, in which the
duties of both parties are mentioned, while I
would recommend his sermon on the marriage
ring to all those who, wiser than myself, are
about entering the happy state of wedlock.
There is scarce any matter of duty but it
concerns them both alike, and is only
distinguished
by names, and hath its variety by
circumstances
and little accidents; and what in one is
called love, in the other is called reverence; and
what in the wife is obedience, the same in the
man is duty. He provides, and she dispenses;
he gives commandments, and she rules by them;
he rules her by authority, and she rules him by
love; she ought by all means to please him, and
he must by no means displease her.
VOL. I. 14
A LITERARY ANTIQUARY.
Printed books he contemns, as a novelty of this latter age; but a
manuscript he pores on everlastingly: especially if the cover be all
moth-eaten, and the dust make a parenthesis between every syllable.
Mico-cosmographie
. 1628.
In
the account of my Christmas visit to the
Hall I made some mention of the parson, who
is a kind of family chaplain to the Squire; and
was his chum at Oxford. A farther
acquaintance
with the little man has increased my
esteem
for him. He is a scholar without
arrogance
or pedantry; very ignorant of the world,
having lived almost entirely among books; and
those too, old books, so that his mind is as
antiquated
as the Squire's garden, where one
finds formal flower beds and peacocks cut in
yew.
His taste for literary antiquities was first
imbibed
when a student at Oxford, where he
spent the chief of his leisure hours in the
Bodleian
library, foraging among the old
manuscripts
.
In the course of his life he has visited most
of the curious libraries in England, and has
ransacked many of the cathedrals. Though in
general quiet and rather dry, yet, on his
favourite
theme he kindles up and becomes almost
eloquent. No fox hunter, relating his last day's
sport, could be more animated than I have seen
the worthy parson, when relating his search
after a curious document, which he had traced
from library to library until he fairly earthed
it in the dusty chapter house of a cathedral.
When, too, he describes some venerable
manuscript
,
with its rich illuminations; its thick
creamy vellum; its glossy ink, and the odour
of the cloisters that seems to exhale from it,
he rivals the enthusiasm of a Parisian epicure
expatiating on the merits of a
Pat de
Strasbourg
.
He has a great desire, however, to
read works in the old libraries and chapter
houses to which they belong; for he thinks a
black letter volume reads best in one of these
old chambers, where the light struggles through
dusty lancet windows and painted glass; and
that it loses half its zest if taken away from the
neighbourhood of the curiously carved oaken
book case and Gothic reading desk.
The parson, I am told, has been for a long
time meditating a commentary on Strutt, Brand,
and Douce; in which he means to detect them
in sundry dangerous errors with respect to
popular
games and superstitions. He is also a
casual contributor to that long established
repository of national customs and antiquities,
the Gentleman's Magazine, and is one of those
that every now and then make an inquiry
concerning
some obsolete custom or rare legend;
nay, it is said that several of his
communications
have been at least six inches in length.
He frequently receives parcels by coach
from different parts of the kingdom,
containing
mouldy volumes and almost illegible
manuscripts
.
It is singular what an active
correspondence
is kept up among literary antiquaries;
and how soon the fame of any rare volume, or
unique copy, just discovered among the rubbish
of a library, is circulcated among them. The
parson is more busy than common just now,
being a little flurried by an advertisement of a
work preparing for the press on the mythology
of the middle ages. The little man has long
been gathering together all the hobgoblin tales
he could collect, illustrative of the superstitions
of former times, and he is in a complete fever,
lest this formidable rival should take the field
before him. Shortly after my arrival at the
Hall I called at the parsonage, in company
with Mr. Bracebridge and the general. The
parson had not been seen for several days,
which was a matter of some surprise, as he
was an almost daily visiter at the Hall. We
found him in his studya small dusky chamber,
lighted by a lattice window that looked into the
church yard, and was overshadowed by a yew
tree. His chair was surrounded by folios and
quartos, piled upon the floor; and his table was
covered with books and manuscripts. The
cause of his seclusion was a work which he
had recently received, and with which he had
retired in rapture from the world, and shut
himself
up to enjoy a literary honey moon
undisturbed
.
Never did boarding school girl devour
the pages of a sentimental novel, or Don
Quixote
a chivalrous romance, with more intense
delight
,
than did the little man banquet on the
pages of this delicious work. It was Dibdin's
bibliographical tour; a work calculated to have
as powerful an effect on the imaginations of
literary
antiquaries, as the tales of the early
American adventurers had on the Spanish
Dons; filling them with dreams of Mexican
and Peruvian mines, and of the golden realm
of El Dorado.
The good parson had long been looking
forward
to the fruits of this bibliographical crusade;
which had far greater importance in his eyes
than the expeditions to Africa or the north pole.
The work had realized all his anticipations.
He had been transported in idea to the libraries
of the old German convents and universities;
his mind's eye had feasted on vellum manuscripts
and exquisitely illuminated missals; his brain
was haunted with love-sick dreams about
gorgeous
old works in silk linings, triple gold
bands, and tinted leather; locked up in wire
cases, and secured from the vulgar hands of the
mere reader, and, to continue the happy
expressions
of an ingenious writer, dazzling
one's eyes like eastern beauties peering through
their jealousies.
*
*
D'Israeli's Curiosities of Literature.
When the parson had finished a rapturous
eulogy on this most curious and entertaining
work, he drew forth from a little drawer a
manuscript lately received from a correspondent,
which had perplexed him sadly. It was written
in Norman French, in very ancient characters,
and so faded and mouldered away as to be
almost
illegible. It was apparently an old
Norman
drinking song, that might have been brought
over by one of William the Conqueror's
carousing
followers. The writing was just legible
enough to keep a keen antiquity hunter on a
doubtful chace; here and there would be a few
words so plainly written as to put him on the
scent again. In this way he had been led on
for a whole day, until he had found himself
completely
at fault.
The Squire endeavoured to assist him, but
was equally baffled. The old general listened
for some time to the discussion, and then asked
the parson, if he had read Captain Morris', or
George Stevens', or Anacreon Moore's
bacchanalian
songs. On the other's replying in the
negative
,
Oh then, said the general, with
infinite
bon hommie, if you want a drinking song,
I can furnish you with the latest collection.
I did not know you had a turn for those kind of
things, and I can lend you the Encyclopdia
of Wit into the bargain. I never travel without
them; they're excellent reading at an inn.
It would be difficult to describe the odd look
of surprise and perplexity of the parson, on
this proposal; or the difficulty that the Squire
had in making the general comprehend, that
though a jovial song of the present day was
totally abhorrent to the ears of wisdom, and
beneath the notice of a learned man; yet a
trowl, written by a toss-pot several hundred
years since, was a matter worthy of the gravest
research, and enough to set whole colleges by
the ears.
VOL. I. 15
THE FARM HOUSE.
Love and hay
Are thick sown, but come up full of thistles.
Beaumont and Fletcher
.
I was
so much pleased with the anecdotes
which were told me of Ready Money Jack
Tibbets
,
that I got Master Simon a day or two since
to take me to his house. It was an old fashioned
farm house, built of brick, with curiously twisted
chimneys. It stood at a little distance from the
road, with a southern exposure, looking upon a
soft green slope of meadow. There was a small
garden in front, with a row of bee-hives
humming
among beds of sweet herbs and flowers.
Well scoured milking tubs, with bright copper
hoops, hung on the garden paling. Fruit trees
were trained up against the cottage, and pots of
flowers stood in the windows. A fat
superannuated
mastiff lay in the sunshine at the door;
with a sleek cat sleeping peacefully across him.
Tibbets was from home at the time of our
calling; but we were received with hearty and
homely welcome by his wife, a notable motherly
woman, and a complete pattern for wives; since,
according to Master Simon's account, she never
contradicts honest Jack, and yet manages to have
her own way, and to control him in every
thing.
She received us in the main room of the house,
a kind of parlour and hall; with great brown
beams of timber across it, which Tibbets is apt
to point out with some exultation, observing that
they don't put such timber in houses now-a-days.
The furniture was old fashioned, strong, and
highly polished; the walls were hung with
coloured
prints of the story of the prodigal son,
who was represented in a red coat and leather
breeches. Over the fireplace was a blunderbuss,
and a hard favoured likeness of Ready Money
Jack, taken when he was a young man, by the
same artist that painted the tavern sign; his
mother
having taken a notion that the Tibbets' had
as much right to have a gallery of family
portraits
as the folks at the Hall.
The good dame pressed us very much to take
some refreshment, and tempted us with a variety
of household dainties, so that we were glad to
compound by tasting some of her home-made
wines. While we were there the son and heir
apparent came home; a good looking young
fellow
,
and something of a rustic beau. He took
us over the premises, and showed us the whole
establishment. An air of homely but
substantial
plenty prevailed throughout; every thing
was of the best materials, and in the best
condition
.
Nothing was out of place or ill made;
and you saw every where the signs of a man
that took care to have the worth of his money,
and that paid as he went.
The farm yard was well stocked; under a
shed was a taxed cart, in trim order, in which
Ready Money Jack took his wife about the
country
.
His well-fed horse neighed from the
stable
,
and when led into the yard, to use the words
of young Jack, he shone like a bottle, for he
said the old man made it a rule that every thing
about him should fare as well as he did himself.
I was pleased to see the pride which the young
fellow seemed to have of his father. He gave
us several particulars concerning his habits, which
were pretty much to the effect of those I have
already mentioned. He had never suffered an
account to stand in his life; always providing the
money before he purchased any thing; and, if
possible, paying in gold and silver. He had a
great dislike to paper money, and seldom went
without a considerable sum in gold about him.
On my observing that it was a wonder he had
never been waylaid and robbed, the young
fellow
smiled at the idea of any one venturing upon
such an exploit, for I believe he thinks the old
man would be a match for Robin Hood and all
his gang.
I have noticed that Master Simon seldom goes
into any house without having a world of private
talk with some one or other of the family; being
a kind of universal counsellor and confidant.
We had not been long at the farm, before the
old dame got him into a corner of her parlour,
where they had a long whispering conference
together, in which I saw by his shrugs that there
were some dubious matters discussed, and by his
nods that he agreed with every thing she said.
After we had come out, the young man
accompanied
us a little distance, and then drawing
Master Simon aside into a green lane, they
walked
and talked together for nearly half an hour.
Master Simon, who has the usual propensity of
confidants to blab every thing to the next friend
they meet with, let me know that there was a
love affair in question; the young fellow having
been smitten with the charms of Phoebe Wilkins,
the pretty niece of the housekeeper at the Hall.
Like most other love concerns, it had brought
its troubles and perplexities. Dame Tibbets
had long been on intimate gossiping terms with
the housekeeper, who often visited the farm
house. But when the neighbours spoke to her
of the likelihood of a match between her son and
Phoebe Wilkinsmarry come up! she
scouted
the very idea. The girl had acted as lady's
maid; and it was beneath the blood of the
Tibbets'
,
who had lived on their own lands, time out
of mind, and owed reverence and thanks to
nobody
,
to have the heir apparent marry a
servant
!
These vapourings had faithfully been carried
to the housekeeper's ear, by one of their mutual
go-between friends. The old housekeeper's
blood, if not as ancient, was as quick as that of
Dame Tibbets. She had been accustomed to
carry a high head at the Hall, and among the
villagers, and her faded brocade rustled with
indignation at the slight cast upon her alliance
by the wife of a petty farmer. She maintained
that her niece had been a companion rather than
a waiting maid to the young ladies. Thank
heaven, she was not obliged to work for her
living, and was as idle as any young lady in the
land; and when somebody died, would receive
something that would be worth the notice of
some folks with all their ready money.
A bitter feud had thus taken place between
the two worthy dames, and the young people
were forbidden to think of one another. As to
young Jack, he was too much in love to reason
upon the matter; and being a little heady, and
not standing in much awe of his mother, was
ready to sacrifice the whole dignity of the
Tibbets'
to his passion. He had lately, however,
had a violent quarrel with his mistress in
consequence
of some coquetry on her part, and at
present stood aloof. The politic mother was
exerting all her ingenuity to widen this accidental
breach; but, as is most commonly the case, the
more she meddled with this perverse inclination
of her son's, the stronger it grew. In the mean
time old Ready Money was kept completely in
the dark; both parties were in awe and
uncertainty
as to what might be his way of taking the
matter, and dreaded to awaken the sleeping lion.
Between father and son, therefore, the worthy
Mrs. Tibbets was full of business, and at her
wit's end. It is true there was no great danger
of honest Ready Money's finding the thing out
if left to himself, for he was of a most
unsuspicious
temper, and by no means quick of
apprehension
;
but there was daily risk of his attention
being aroused by those cobwebs which his wife
was continually spinning about his nose.
Such is the distracted state of politics in the
domestic empire of Ready Money Jack; which
only shows the intrigues and internal dangers to
which the best regulated governments are liable.
In this perplexed situation of their affairs, both
mother and son have applied to Master Simon
for counsel, and with all his experience in
meddling
with other people's concerns, he finds it an
exceedingly difficult part to play, to agree with
both parties, seeing that their opinions and wishes
are so diametrically opposite.
VOL. I. 16
STORY TELLING.
A favourite
evening pastime at the Hall, and
one which the worthy Squire is fond of
promoting
,
is story tellinga good, old fashioned,
fireside amusement, as he terms it. Indeed, I
believe he promotes it chiefly because it was
one of the choice recreations in those days of
yore, when ladies and gentlemen were not
much in the habit of reading. Be this as it
may, he will often, at supper table, when
conversation
flags, call upon some one or other
of the company for a story, as it was formerly
the custom to call for a song; and it is edifying
to see the exemplary patience and even
satisfaction
with which the good old gentleman will sit
and listen to some hackneyed tale that he has
heard for at least an hundred times.
In this way, one evening the current of
anecdotes and stories ran upon mysterious
personages
that have figured at different times, and
filled the world with doubt and conjecture: such
as the Wandering Jew, the Man with the Iron
Mask, who tormented the curiosity of all
Europe
,
the Invisible Girl, and last, though not
least, the Pig-faced Lady.
At length one of the company was called
upon that had the most unpromising
physiognomy
for a story teller that I had ever seen.
He was a thin, pale, weazen-faced man,
extremely
nervous, that had sat at one corner
of the table, shrunk up, as it were, into himself,
and almost swallowed up in the cape of his
coat, as a turtle in its shell.
The very demand seemed to throw him into
a nervous agitation; yet he did not refuse.
He emerged his head out of his shell; made a
few odd grimaces and gesticulations, before he
could get his muscles into order, or his voice
under command; and then offered to give some
account of a mysterious personage that he had
recently encountered in the course of his travels,
and one whom he thought fully entitled to be
classed with the Man with the Iron Mask.
I was so much struck with his extraordinary
narrative that I have written it out, to the best
of my recollection, for the amusement of the
reader. I think it has in it all the elements
of that mysterious and romantic narrative so
greedily sought after at the present day.
THE STOUT GENTLEMAN,
A TALE OF MYSTERY.
I'll cross it, though it blast me!
Hamlet
.
It
was a rainy Sunday, in the gloomy month
of November. I had been detained in the
course of a journey, by a slight indisposition,
from which I was recovering, but I was still
feverish, and was obliged to keep within doors
all day, in an inn of the small town of Derby.
A wet Sunday in a country inn! whoever has
had the luck to experience one, can alone judge
of my situation. The rain pattered against
the casements; the bells tolled for church
with a melancholy sound. I went to the
windows
in quest of something to amuse the eye;
but it seemed as if I had been placed completely
out of the reach of all amusement. The
windows
of my bed room looked out among tiled
roofs and stacks of chimneys; while those of
my sitting room commanded a full view of the
stable yard. I know of nothing more calculated
to make a man sick of this world than a stable
yard on a rainy day. The place was littered
with wet straw, that had been kicked about
by travellers and stable boys; in one corner
was a stagnant pool of water surrounding
an island of muck; there were several half
drowned fowls, crowded together under a cart,
among which was a miserable, crest-fallen
cock, drenched out of all life and spirit; his
drooping tail matted as it were into a single
feather, along which the water trickled from
his back. Near the cart was a half-dozing
cow, chewing the cud, and standing patiently
to be rained on, with wreaths of vapour
rising from her reeking hide; a wall-eyed horse,
tired of the loneliness of the stable, was poking
his spectral head out of a window, with the rain
dripping on it from the eaves; an unhappy cur,
chained to a dog house, hard by, uttered
something
every now and then, between a bark and
a yelp; a drab of a kitchen wench tramped
backwards and forwards through the yard in
pattens, looking as sulky as the weather itself;
every thing, in short, was comfortless and
forlorn
,
excepting a crew of hard-drinking ducks,
assembled like boon companions round a puddle,
and making a riotous noise over their liquor.
I was lonely and listless, and wanted
amusement
.
My room soon became insupportable. I
abandoned it and sought what is technically
called
the traveller's room. This is a public room
set apart at most inns for the accomodation of
a class of wayfarers called travellers or riders;
a kind of commercial knights errant, who are
incessantly scouring the kingdom in gigs, on
horseback, or by coach. They are the only
successors, that I know of at the present day,
to the knights errant of yore. They lead the
same kind of roving adventurous life, only
changing the lance for a whip, the buckler for
a pattern card, and the coat of mail for an
upper Benjamin. Instead of vindicating the
charms of peerless beauty, they rove about
spreading the fame and standing of some
substantial
tradesman or manufacturer, and are
ready at any time to bargain in his name; it
being the fashion now-a-days to trade instead of
fight with one another. As the room of the
Hostel, in the good old fighting times, would
be hung round at night with the armour of
way-worn warriors, such as coats of mail,
falchions
,
and yawning helmets; so the traveller's
room is garnished with the harnessing of their
successors; with box coats, whips of all kinds,
spurs, gaiters, and oil cloth covered hats.
I was in hopes of finding some of these
worthies to talk with, but was disappointed.
There were, indeed, two or three in the
room; but I could make nothing of them. One
was just finishing his breakfast; quarrelling
with his bread and butter, and huffing the
waiter; another buttoned on a pair of gaiters,
with many execrations at Boots, for not
having cleaned his shoes well; a third sat
drumming on the table with his fingers, and
looking at the rain as it streamed down the
window glass: they all appeared infected by
the weather, and disappeared, one after the
other, without exchanging a word.
I sauntered to the window, and stood gazing
at the people picking their way to church, with
petticoats hoisted midleg high and dripping
umbrellas
.
The bell ceased to toll, and the streets
became silent. I then amused myself with
watching the daughters of a tradesman
opposite
;
who, being confined to the house, for fear
of wetting their Sunday finery, played off their
charms at the front windows to fascinate the
chance tenants of the inn. They at length
were summoned away by a vigilant
vinegar-faced
mother, and I had nothing farther from
without to amuse me.
What was I to do, to pass away the
long-lived
day? I was sadly nervous and lonely;
and every thing about an inn seems calculated to
make a dull day ten times dullar. Old
newspapers
smelling of beer and tobacco smoke, and
VOL. I. 17
which I had already read half a dozen times.
Good for nothing books, that were worse than
the rainy weather. I bored myself to death
with an old volume of the Lady's Magazine.
I read all the common placed names of
ambitious
travellers scrawled on the panes of glass:
the eternal families of the Smiths, and the
Browns, and the Jacksons, and the Johnsons,
and all the other sons; and I decyphered
several
scraps of fatiguing inn-window poetry that
I have met with in all parts of the world.
The day continued lowering and gloomy;
the slovenly, ragged, spongy clouds drifted
heavily along in the air; there was no variety
even in the rain; it was one dull, continued,
monotonous patter, patter, patter; excepting that
now and then I was enlivened by the idea of a
brisk shower, from the rattling of the drops
upon a passing umbrella. It was quite
refreshing
(if I may be allowed a hackneyed phrase
of the day) when in the course of the morning
a horn blew, and a stage coach whirled through
the street, with outside passengers stuck all
over it, cowering under cotton umbrellas; and
seethed together, and reeking with the steams
of wet box coats and upper Benjamins.
The sound brought out from their lurking
places a crew of vagabond boys, and vagabond
dogs, with the carrotty headed hostler and that
non descript animal ycleped Boots, and all the
other vagabond race that infest the purlieus of
an inn; but the bustle was transient; the coach
again whirled on its way; and boy, and dog,
and hostler, and boots, all slunk back again to
their holes; and the street again became silent,
and the rain continued to rain on. In fact there
was no hope of its clearing up; the barometer
pointed to rainy weather; mine hostess'
tortoiseshell
cat sat by the fire washing her face and
rubbing her paws over her ears; and on
referring
to the almanac, I found a direful
prediction
stretching from the top of the page to the
bottom through the whole month,
expect-muchrain-about-this-time
.
I was dreadfully hipped. The hours seemed
as if they would never creep by. The very
ticking of the clock became irksome. At length
the stillness of the house was interrupted by the
ringing of a bell. Shortly after I heard the
voice of a waiter at the bar, The Stout
Gentleman
,
in No. 13, wants his breakfast. Tea
and bread and butter, with ham and eggs; the
eggs not to be too much done.
In such a situation as mine every incident is
of importance. Here was a subject of
speculation
presented to my mind, and ample
exercise
for my imagination. I am prone to paint
pictures to myself, and on this occasion I had
some materials to work upon. Had the guest
up stairs been mentioned as Mr. Smith, or
Mr. Brown, or Mr. Jackson, or Mr. Johnson;
or merely as the gentleman in No. 13, it would
have been a perfect blank to me. I should have
thought nothing of it. But the Stout
Gentleman
!
the very name had something in it
of the picturesque. It at once gave the size, it
embodied the personage to my mind's eye, and
my fancy did the rest. He was stout, or as
some term it, lusty; in all probability therefore
he was advanced in life; some people expanding
as they grow old. By his breakfasting rather
late, and in his own room, he must be a man
accustomed to live at his ease, and above the
necessity of early rising; no doubt a round, rosy,
lusty old gentleman.
There was another violent ringing. The Stout
Gentleman was impatient for his breakfast. He
was evidently a man of importance; well to
do in the world, accustomed to be promptly
waited upon, of a keen appetite, and a little cross
when hungry; perhaps, thought I, he may
be some London alderman; or who knows but
he may be a member of parliament?
The breakfast was sent up, and there was a
short interval of silence; he was doubtless
making
the tea. Presently there was a violent
ringing
,
and before it could be answered, another
ringing still more violent. Bless me! what a
choleric old gentleman! The waiter came
down in a huff. The butter was rancid; the
eggs were overdone; the ham was too salt. The
Stout Gentleman was evidently nice in his eating.
One of those who eat and growl, and keep the
waiter on the trot, and live in a state militant
with the household.
The hostess got into a fume. I should
observe
that she was a brisk, coquettish woman; a
little of a shrew, and something of a
slammer-kin
,
but very pretty withal; with a nincompoop
for a husband, as shrews are apt to have. She
rated the servants roundly for their negligence
in sending up so bad a breakfast; but said not a
word against the Stout Gentleman; by which I
clearly perceived that he must be a man of
consequence
;
entitled to make a noise and to give
trouble at a country inn. Other eggs and ham
and bread and butter were sent. They appeared
to be more graciously received; at least there
was no further complaint.
I had not made many turns about the
traveller's
room when there was another ringing.
Shortly afterwards there was a stir, and an
inquest
about the house. The Stout Gentleman
wanted the Times, or the Chronicle newspaper.
I set him down, therefore, for a whig; or rather,
from his being so absolute and lordly where he
had a chance, I suspected him of being a
radical
.
Hunt I had heard was a large man; who
knows, thought I, but it is Hunt himself?
My curiosity began to be awakened. I
inquired
of the waiter who was this Stout
Gentleman
that was making all this stir; but I could
get no information. Nobody seemed to know
his name. The landlords of bustling inns
seldom
trouble their heads about the names of their
transient guests. The colour of a coat, the
shape or size of the person is enough to suggest a
travelling name. It is either the tall gentleman
or the short gentleman; or the gentleman in
black, or the gentleman in snuff colour, or, as in
the present instance, the Stout Gentleman; a
designation
of the kind once hit on answers every
purpose, and saves all farther inquiry.
Rainrainrain! pitiless, ceaseless rain! no
such thing as putting a foot out of doors, and no
occupation or amusement within. By and bye
I heard some one walking over head. It was in
the Stout Gentleman's room. He evidently was
a large man by the heaviness of his tread; and
an old man from his wearing such creaking soles. He is, doubtless, thought I, some
rich old square toes, of regular habits, and is now
taking exercise after breakfast.
I now read all the advertisements of coaches
and hotels that were stuck about the mantle
piece. The Lady's Magazine had become an
abomination to me; it was as tedious as the day
itself. I wandered out, not knowing what to
do, and ascended again to my room. I had not
been there long when there was a squall from a
neighbouring bed room. A door opened and
slammed violently; a chambermaid that I had
remarked for a ruddy good humoured face, went
down stairs in a violent flurry. The Stout
Gentleman
had been rude to her.
This sent a whole host of my deductions to
the deuce in a moment. This unknown
personage
could not be an old gentleman; for old
gentlemen
are not apt to be so obstreperous to
chambermaids
.
He could not be a young
gentleman
;
for young gentleman are not apt to inspire
such indignation. He must be a middle aged
man, and confoundedly ugly into the bargain, or
the girl would not have taken the matter in such
terrible dudgeon. I confess I was sorely
puzzled
.
In a few minutes I heard the voice of my
landlady. I caught a glance of her as she came
tramping up stairs, her face glowing, her cap
flaring, her tongue wagging the whole way.
She'd have no such doings in her house, she'd
warrant. If gentlemen did spend their money
freely it was no rule. She'd have no servant
maids of her's treated in that way, when they
were about their work, that's what she would'nt.
As I hate squabbles, particularly with women,
and above all with pretty women, I slunk back
into my room and partly closed the door; but
my curiosity was too much excited not to listen.
The landlady marched intrepidly to the enemy's
citadel, and entered it with a storm. The door
closed after her. I heard her voice in high windy
clamour for a moment or two. Then it
gradually
subsided, like a gust of wind in a garret.
Then there was a laugh; then I heard nothing
more. After a little while my landlady came
VOL. I. 18
out with an odd smile on her face, adjusting her
cap, which was a little on one side. As she went
down stairs I heard the landlord ask her what
was the matter; she said, nothing at all
only the girl's a fool. I was more than ever
perplexed what to make of this unaccountable
personage, who could put a good-natured
chambermaid
in a passion, and send away a
termagant
landlady in smiles. He could not be so
old, nor cross, nor ugly either.
I had to go to work at his picture again and
to paint him entirely different. I now set him
down for one of those Stout Gentlemen that are
frequently met with swaggering about the doors
of country inns. Moist, merry fellows, in
Belcher
handkerchiefs; whose bulk is a little assisted
by malt liquors. Men who have seen the world
and been sworn at Highgate. Who are used
to tavern life; up to all the tricks of tapsters,
and knowing in the ways of sinful publicans.
Free livers on a small scale; who are prodigal
within the compass of a guinea; who call all the
waiters by name; tousle the maids; gossip with
the landlady at the bar, and prose over a pint of
port or a glass of negus after dinner.
The morning wore away in forming these and
similar surmises. As fast as I wove one system
of belief, some movement of the unknown would
completely overturn it, and throw all my thoughts
again into confusion. Such are the solitary
operations
of a feverish mind. I was, as I have
said, extremely nervous, and the continual
meditation
on the concerns of this invisible personage
began to have its effectI was getting a fit of
the fidgets.
Dinner time came. I hoped the Stout
Gentleman
might dine in the traveller's room, and that
I might at length get a view of his person; but
nohe had dinner served in his own room.
What could be the meaning of this solitude and
mystery? He could not be a radical; there
was something too aristocratical in thus keeping
himself apart from the rest of the world, and
condemning himself to his own dull company
throughout a rainy day. And then, too, he lived
too well for a discontented politician. He seemed
to expatiate on a variety of dishes, and to sit
over his wine like a jolly friend of good living.
Indeed, my doubts on this head were soon at
an end; for he could not have finished his first
bottle before I could faintly hear him humming
a tune; and on listening I found it to be God
save the King. 'Twas plain then he was no
radical, but a faithful subject; one that grew
loyal over his bottle, and was ready to stand by
king and constitution when he could stand by
nothing else. But who could he be!my
conjectures began to run wildwas he not some
personage of distinction travelling incog?
God knows! said I, at my wit's end, it
may be one of the royal family for aught I
know, for they are all Stout Gentlemen!
The weather continued rainy. The
mysterious
unknown kept his room, and as far as I could
judge, his chair; for I did not hear him move.
In the mean time, as the day advanced, the
traveller's
room began to be frequented. Some
who had just arrived came in buttoned up in
box coats; others came home who had been
dispersed about the town. Some took their
dinners
,
and some their tea. Had I been in a
different
mood, I should have found entertainment
in studying this peculiar class of men. There
were two, especially, who were regular wags of
the road, and up to all the standing jokes of
travellers
.
They had a thousand sly things to say
to the waiting maid, whom they called Louisa,
and Ethelinda, and a dozen other fine names;
changing the name every time, and chuckling
amazingly at their own waggery. My mind,
however, had become completely engrossed by
the Stout Gentleman. He had kept my fancy in
chance during a long day, and it was not now to
be diverted from the scent.
The evening gradually wore away. The
travellers read the papers two or three times over.
Some drew round the fire, and told long stories
about their horses; about their adventures; their
overturns and breakings down. They discussed
the credits of different merchants and different
inns, and the two wags told several choice
anecdotes
of pretty chambermaids and kind landladies.
All this passed as they were quietly taking what
they called their night caps, that is to say,
strong glasses of brandy and water with sugar; or
some other mixture of the kind; after which they
one after another rang for Boots and the
chambermaid
,
and walked up to bed in old shoes, cut
down into marvellously uncomfortable slippers.
There was only one man left; a short legged,
long-bodied plethoric fellow with a very large
sandy head. He sat by himself with a glass of
port wine negus, and a spoon; sipping and
stirring
until nothing was left but the spoon. He
gradually fell asleep, bolt upright in his chair,
with the empty glass standing before him; and
the candle seemed to fall asleep too, for the wick
grew long, and black, and cabbaged at the end,
and dimmed the little light that remained in the
chamber.
The gloom that now prevailed was
contagious
.
Around hung the shapeless and almost
spectral box coats of departed travellers, long
since buried in deep sleep. I only heard the
ticking of the clock, with the deep-drawn
breathings
of the sleeping toper; and the drippings of
the rain, drop-drop-drop, from the eaves of the
house.
The church bells chimed midnight.All at
once the Stout Gentleman began to walk over
head, pacing slowly backwards and forwards.
There was something extremely awful in all this
especially to one in my state of nerves. These
ghastly great coats; these guttural breathings; and
the creaking footsteps of this mysterious being.
His steps grew fainter and fainter; and at length
died away. I could bear it no longer. I was
wound up to the desperation of a hero of
romance
.
Be he who or what he may, said I
to myself, I'll have a sight of him! I seized
a chamber candle and hurried up to No. 13.
The door stood ajar. I hesitatedI enteredthe
room was deserted. There stood a large broad
bottomed elbow chair at a table, on which was
an empty tumbler, and a Times newspaper,
and the room smelt powerfully of Stilton
cheese.
The mysterious stranger had evidently but
just retired. I turned off to my room sorely
disappointed
.
As I went along the corridor, I saw
a large pair of boots with dirty waxed tops
standing at the door of a bed chamber. They
doubtless belonged to the unknown; but it would
not do to disturb so redoubtable a personage in
his den; he might discharge a pistol or
something
worse at my head. I went to bed,
therefore
,
and lay awake half the night in a terribly
nervous state; and even when I fell asleep I was
still haunted in my dreams by the idea of the
stout gentleman and his wax-topped boots.
I slept rather late the next morning; and was
awakened by some stir and bustle in the house,
which I could not at first comprehend; until
getting more awake, I found there was a mail
coach starting from the door. Suddenly there
was a cry from below:
The gentleman has forgot his umbrella!
look for the gentleman's umbrella in No. 13.
I heard an immediate scampering of a
chambermaid
along the passage, and a shrill reply,
as she ran, here it is! here's the gentleman's
umbrella!
The mysterious stranger then was on the
point of setting off. This was the only chance
I should ever have of knowing him. I sprang
out of bed; scrambled to the window; snatched
aside the curtains, and just caught a glimpse of
the rear of a person getting in at the coach door.
The skirts of a brown coat parted behind, and
gave me a full view of the broad disk of a pair
of drab breeches. The door closed; All right,
was the word; the coach whirled offand that
was all I ever saw of the Stout Gentleman!
VOL. I. 19
FOREST TREES.
A living gallery of aged trees.
One
of the favourite themes of boasting with
the Squire is the noble trees on his estate, which
in truth has some of the finest that I have seen
in England.
There is something august and solemn in the
great avenues of stately oaks that gather their
branches together high in the air, and seem to
reduce
the pedestrians between them to mere
pigmies
.
An avenue of oaks or elms, the Squire
observes
,
is the true colonnade that should lead
to a gentleman's house. As to stone and
marble
,
any one can rear them at once, they are the
work of the day; but commend me to the
colonnades
that have grown old and great with the
family; and tell by their grandeur how long the
family has endured.
The Squire has great reverence for certain
venerable trees, gray with moss; which he
considers
as the ancient nobility of his domain.
There is the ruin of an enormous oak, which
has been so much battered by time and tempest,
that scarce any thing is left; though he says
Christy recollects when in his boyhood, it was
healthy and flourishing, until it was struck by
lightning. It is now a mere trunk, with one
twisted bough stretching up into the air, bearing
a green branch at the end of it. This sturdy
wreck is much valued by the Squire. He calls
it his standard bearer, and compares it to a
veteran
warrior, beaten down in the battle, but
bearing
up his banner to the last. He has actually
had a fence built round it, to protect it as much
as possible from farther injury.
It is with great difficulty that the Squire can
be brought to have any tree cut down on his
estate
.
To some he looks with reverence, as
having
been planted by his ancestors; to others with
a kind of paternal affection, as having been
planted by himself; and he feels a degree of awe
in bringing down, with a few strokes of the axe,
what it has cost centuries to build up. I
confess
I cannot but sympathize, in some degree,
with the good Squire on the subject.
Though brought up in a country overrun with
forests, where trees are apt to be considered
mere incumbrances, and to be laid low without
hesitation or remorse, yet I could never see a fine
tree hewn down without concern. The poets,
who are naturally lovers of trees, as they are of
every thing that is beautiful, have artfully
awakened
great interest in their favour, by
representing
them as the habitations of sylvan deities;
insomuch that every great tree had its tutelar
genius, or a nymph whose existence was limited
to its duration. Evelyn, in his Sylva, makes
several
pleasing and fanciful allusions to this
superstition
.
As the fall, says he, of a very
aged oak, giving a crack like thunder, has often
been heard at many miles distance; constrained
as I often am to fell them with reluctancy, I do
not at any time remember to have heard the
groans of those nymphs (grieving to be
dispossessed
of their ancient habitations) without some
emotion and pity. And again, in alluding to a
violent storm that had devastated the woodlands,
he says: methinks I still hear, sure I am that I
still feel, the dismal groans of our forests; the
late dreadful hurricane having subverted so many
thousands of goodly oaks, prostrating the trees,
laying them in ghastly postures, like whole
regiments
fallen in battle by the sword of the
conqueror
,
and crushing all that grew beneath them.
The public accounts, he adds, reckon no less
than three thousand
brave oaks
in one part only
of the forest of Dean blown down.
I have paused more than once in the
wilderness
of America, to contemplate the traces of
some blast of wind, which seemed to have
rushed
down from the clouds, and ripped its way
through the bosom of the woodlands; rooting
up, shivering, and splintering the stoutest trees,
and leaving a long track of desolation.
There was something awful in the vast havoc
made among these gigantic plants; and in
considering
their magnificent remains, so rudely
torn and mangled, and hurled down to perish
prematurely on their native soil, I was conscious
of a strong movement of the sympathy so
feelingly
expressed by Evelyn. I recollect, also,
hearing a traveller of poetical temperament
expressing
the kind of horror which he felt on
beholding
,
on the banks of the Missouri, an oak of
prodigious size, which had been in a manner
overpowered by an enormous wild grape vine.
The vine had clasped its huge folds round the
trunk, and from thence had wound about every
branch and twig, until the mighty tree had
withered in its embrace. It seemed like
Laoco
n
struggling ineffectually in the hideous coils
of the monster Python. It was the lion of trees
perishing in the embraces of a vegetable Boa.
I am fond of listening to the conversation of
English gentlemen on rural concerns, and of
noticing
with what taste and discrimination, and
what strong unaffected interest, they will
discuss
topics which in other countries are
abandoned
to mere woodmen, or rustic cultivators. I
have heard a noble earl descant on park and
forest
scenery with the science and feeling of a
painter. He dwelt on the shape and beauty of
particular trees on his estate, with as much pride
and technical precision as though he had been
discussing the merits of statues in his
collection
.
I found that he had even gone
considerable
distances to examine trees which were
celebrated
among rural amateurs; for it seems that
trees, like houses, have their established points
of excellence; and that there are some in
England
which enjoy very extensive celebrity from
being perfect in their kind.
There is something nobly simple and pure in
such a taste. It argues, I think, a sweet and
generous nature, to have this strong relish for
the beauties of vegetation, and this friendship
for the hardy and glorious sons of the forest.
There is a grandeur of thought connected with
this part of rural economy. It is, if I may be
allowed the figure, the heroic line of husbandry.
It is worthy of liberal, and free born, and
aspiring
men. He who plants an oak looks
forward
to future ages, and plants for posterity.
Nothing can be less selfish than this. He
cannot
expect to sit in its shade nor enjoy its
shelter
;
but he exults in the idea that the acorn
which he has buried in the earth shall grow up
into a lofty pile, and shall keep on flourishing,
and increasing, and benefiting mankind long
after
he shall have ceased to tread his paternal
fields.
Indeed, it is the nature of such occupations
to lift the thought above mere worldliness. As
the leaves of trees are said to absorb all noxious
qualities of the air, and to breathe forth a purer
atmosphere, so it seems to me as if they drew
from us all sordid and angry passions, and
breathed forth peace and philanthropy. There
is a serene and settled majesty in woodland
scenery that enters into the soul, and dilates
and elevates it, and fills it with noble
inclinations
.
The ancient and hereditary groves, too,
that embower this island, are most of them full
of story. They are haunted by the
recollections
of great spirits of past ages who have
sought for relaxation among them from the
tumult of arms or the toils of state, or have
wooed the muse beneath their shade.
Who can walk with soul unmoved among the
stately groves of Penshurst, where the gallant,
the amiable, the elegant Sir Philip Sidney
passed
his boyhood; or can look without fondness
upon the tree that is said to have been planted
on his birth day; or can ramble among the
classic bowers of Hagley, treading in the
footsteps
of a Pope and a Lyttleton; or can pause
among the solitudes of Windsor forest, and look
at the oaks around, huge, gray, and time-worn
like the old castle towers; and not feel as if he
were surrounded by so many monuments of long
enduring glory? It is when viewed in this
light, that planted groves, and stately avenues,
and cultivated parks, have an advantage over
the more luxuriant beauties of unassisted nature.
It is that they teem with moral associations, and
keep up the ever interesting story of human
existence.
VOL. I. 20
It is becoming then for the high and generous
spirits of an ancient nation, to cherish these
sacred groves that surround their ancestral
mansions
,
and to perpetuate them to their
descendants
.
Brought up, as I have been, in
republican
habits and principles, I can feel nothing of
the servile reverence for titled rank merely
because
it is titled. But I trust I am neither
churl nor bigot in my creed. I do see and feel,
how hereditary distinction, when it falls to the
lot of a generous mind, may elevate that mind
into true nobility. It is one of the effects of
hereditary rank, when it falls thus happily, that
it multiplies the duties, and, as it were, extends
the existence of the possessor. He does not
feel himself a mere individual link in creation,
responsible only for his own brief term of being.
He carries back his existence in proud
recollection
,
and he extends it forward in honourable
anticipation. He lives with his ancestry, and
he lives with his posterity. To both does he
consider himself involved in deep responsibilities.
As he has received much from those that have
gone before, so he feels bound to transmit much
to those who are to come after him.
His domestic undertakings seem to imply a
longer existence than those of ordinary men;
none are so apt to build and plant for future
centuries
,
as noble spirited men who have received
their heritages from foregone ages.
I can easily imagine therefore the fondness
and pride with which I have noticed English
gentlemen, of generous temperaments, but high
aristocratic feelings, contemplating those
magnificent
trees, which rise like towers and
pyramids
,
from the midst of their paternal lands.
There is an affinity between all natures, animate
and inanimate: the oak, in the pride and
lustihood
of its growth, seems to me to take its
range with the lion and the eagle, and to
assimilate
in the grandeur of its attributes to heroic
and intellectual man.
With its mighty pillar rising straight and
direct
toward heaven; bearing up its leafy
honours
from the impurities of earth, and
supporting
them aloft in free air and glorious
sun-shine
,
it is an emblem of what a true nobleman
should be:
a refuge for the weaka shelter for
the oppresseda defence for the defenceless;
warding off from them the peltings of the storm,
or the scorching rays of arbitrary power. He
who is
this
, is an ornament and a blessing to
his native land. He who is
otherwise
, abuses
his eminent advantages; abuses the grandeur
and prosperity which he has drawn from the
bosom of his country. Should tempests arise,
and he be laid prostrate by the storm, who
would mourn over his fall? Should he be borne
down by the oppressive hand of power, who
would murmur at his fate? Why cumbereth
he the ground?
HORSEMANSHIP.
Indeede a coach was a strange monster in those days, and the
sight of one, put both horse and man into amazement. Some said it
was a great crab-shell brought out of China, and some imagined it to
be one of the pagan temples, in which the canibals adored the divell.
Taylor the Water Poet
.
I have
made casual mention, more than once,
of one of the Squire's antiquated retainers, old
Christy the huntsman. I find that his crusty,
crabbed humours are a source of much
entertainment
among the young gentlemen of the family,
especially the Oxonian, who takes a mischievous
pleasure, now and then, in slyly rubbing the old
man against the grain, and then amuses himself
with smoothing him down again; for the old
fellow is as ready to bristle up his back as a
porcupine. He rides an old hunter called
Pepper
,
which is a counterpart of himself, a most
wrathful, headstrong animal, that frets the flesh
off of its bones, bites, kicks, and plays all kinds
of villanous tricks.
He is as tough and nearly as old as his rider,
who has ridden him time out of mind, and is
indeed
the only one that can do any thing with
him. Sometimes, however, they have a complete
quarrel and a dispute for mastery, and then I am
told it is as good as a farce to see the heat they
both get into, and the wrong headed contest that
ensues; for they are quite knowing in each other's
ways, and in the art of teasing and fretting
each other. Notwithstanding these doughty
brawls, however, there is nothing that nettles old
Christy sooner than to question the merits of his
horse, which he will uphold as tenaciously as
a faithful husband will vindicate the virtues of
the termagant spouse that gives him a curtain
lecture every night of his life.
The young men call Old Christy their pro
fessor of equitation, and in explaining this
phrase, they let me into some particulars of the
Squire's mode of bringing up his children.
There is an odd mixture of eccentricity any
good sense, in all the opinions of my worthy
host. His mind is like modern Gothic, where
plain brick work is set off with pointed arches
and quaint tracery. Though the main
ground-work
of his opinions is correct, yet he has a
thousand little notions, picked up from old books,
which stand out whimsically on the surface of
his mind.
Thus, in rearing his boys, Peacham,
Markham
,
and such like old English writers were his
manuals. At an early age he took his lads out
of their mother's hands, who was disposed, as
mothers are apt to be, to make fine orderly
children
of them, that should keep out of sun and
rain, and never soil their hands nor tear their
clothes. In place of this the Squire turned them
loose to run free and wild about the park,
without
heeding wind or weather. He was, also,
particularly attentive in making them bold and
expert horsemen; and these were the days when
Old Christy the huntsman enjoyed great
importance
;
as the lads were put under his care to
practise them at the leaping bars, and to keep
an eye upon them in the chase.
The Squire always objected to their riding in
carriages of any kind, and is still a little
tenacious
on this point. He often rails against the
universal use of carriages; and quotes the words
of honest Nashe to that effect. It was thought,
says Nashe in his Quaternio, a kind of
solecism
,
and to savour of effeminacy, for a young
gentleman in the flourishing time of his age to
creep into his coach; and to shroud himself
from wind and weather; our great delight was
to outbrave the blustering boreas upon a great
horse; to arm and prepare ourselves to go with
Mars and Bellona into the field, was our sport
and pastime; coaches and caroches we left unto
them for whom they were first invented, for
ladies
and gentlemen, and decrepid age and
impotent
people.
The Squire insists that the English
gentlemen
have lost much of their hardiness and
manhood
since the introduction of carriages.
Compare
,
he will say, the fine gentleman of
former
times, ever on horseback, booted and
spurred, and travel stained, but open, frank,
manly, and chivalrous, with the fine gentleman
of the present day, full of affectation and
effeminacy
,
rolling along a turnpike in his
voluptuous
vehicle. The young men of those days,
were rendered brave, and lofty, and generous, in
their notions by almost living in their saddles,
and having their foaming steeds like proud
seas under them. There is something, he
adds, in bestriding a fine horse that makes a
man feel more than mortal. He seems to have
doubled his nature; and to have added to his
own courage and sagacity, the power, the speed,
and stateliness of the superb animal on which
he is mounted.
It is a great delight, says old Nashe, to see
a young gentleman with his skill and cunning,
by his voice, rod, and spur, better to manage
and to command the great Bucephalus, than the
strongest Milo, with all his strength; one while
to see him make him tread, trot, and gallop the
ring; and one after to see him make him gather
VOL. I. 21
up roundly; to bear his head steadily; to run a
full career swiftly; to stop a sudden lightly; anon
after to see him make him advance, to yorke, to
go back and sidelong, to turn on either hand;
to gallop the gallop galliard; to do the capriole,
the chambetta, and dance the carvetty.
In conformity to these ideas, the Squire had
them all on horseback at an early age, and made
them ride, slap dash, about the country, without
flinching at hedge or ditch or stone wall, to the
imminent danger of their necks.
Even the fair Julia was partially included in
this system, and, under the instruction of old
Christy, has become one of the best horsewomen
in the county. The Squire says it is better than
all the cosmetics and sweeteners of the breath
that ever were invented. He extols the
horsemanship
of the ladies in former times; when Queen
Elizabeth would scarcely suffer the rain to stop her
accustomed ride; and then think, he will say,
what nobler and sweeter beings it made them.
What a difference must there be, both in mind
and body, between a joyous high spirited dame
of those days, glowing with health and exercise,
freshened by every breeze that blows; seated
loftily and gracefully in her saddle, with plume
on head and hawk on hand;and her descendant
of the present day, the pale victim of modern
routs and ball rooms, sunk languidly in one
corner
of an enervating carriage.
The good Squire's equestrian system has had
a happy effect, for his sons having passed through
the whole course of instruction without
breaking
neck or limb, are now healthful, spirited, and
active, and have the true Englishman's love for
a horse. If their manliness and frankness are
praised in their father's hearing, he quotes the
old Persian maxim, and says, they have been
taught to ride, to shoot, and to speak the
truth.
It is true the Oxonian has now and then
practised
the old gentleman's doctrines a little in the
extreme. He is a wild youngster, rather fonder
of his horse than his book, with a little dash of
the dandy; though the ladies all pronounced
him to be the flower of the flock.
The first year that he was sent to Oxford he
had a private tutor appointed to overlook him;
a dry chip of the University. When he returned
home in the vacation, the Squire made many
inquiries about how he liked his college, and
his studies, and his tutor.
Oh as to my tutor, sir, I've parted with
him!
You have! and pray why so?
Oh sir, hunting was all the go at our college;
so I discharged my tutor, and kept a horse, you
know.
Ah, I was not aware of that, Tom, said the
Squire mildly. When Tom returned to college
his allowance was doubled, to enable him to
keep both horse and tutor.
LOVE SYMPTOMS.
I will now begin to sigh, read poets, look pale, go neatly, and be
most apparently in love.
Marston
.
I SHOULD not be surprised if we should have
another brace of turtles at the Hall, for Master
Simon has informed me, in great confidence, that
he suspects the general of some design upon the
susceptible heart of Lady Lillycraft. I have,
indeed, noticed a growing attention and
courtesy
in the veteran toward her ladyship: he
softens very much in her company; sits by her
at table, and entertains her with long stories
about Seringapatam, and pleasant anecdotes of
the Mulligatawney Club. I have even seen him
present her with a full blown rose from the
hot-house
,
in a style of the most captivating
gallantry
;
and it was accepted with great suavity and
graciousness; for her ladyship delights in
receiving
the homage and attention of the sex.
Indeed, the general was one of the earliest
admirers
that dangled in her train during her short
reign of beauty; and they flirted together for half
a season in London, some thirty or forty years
since. She reminded him lately, in the course
of conversation about former days, of the time
when he used to ride a white horse in Hyde
Park, and to canter so gallantly by the side of
her carriage; whereupon I have remarked that
the veteran has regularly escorted her since,
when she rides out on horseback, and I
suspect
he almost persuades himself that he makes
as captivating an appearance as in his youthful
days.
It would be an amusing event in the history
of faithful love, if this spark of the tender
passion, after lying dormant such a length of
time, should again be fanned into a flame from
among the ashes of two burnt out hearts. It
may, however, be nothing but a little venerable
flirtation, the general being a veteran dangler,
and the good lady habituated to these kind of
attentions. Master Simon, however, thinks the
general, now that he is growing old, is desirous
of getting into warm winter quarters, and I
doubt whether the former, with all his
admiration
of the veteran, would be pleased at his
winning the lady; as he looks upon Lady
Lillycraft's
house as one of his strong holds.
Among other symptoms that look suspicious,
I have observed that the general has lately been
very assiduous in his attentions to her ladyship's
dogs; and has several times exposed his fingers
to imminent jeopardy in attempting to pat
Beauty
on the head. It is to be hoped his advances
to the mistress will be more favourably received,
as all his overtures toward a caress are greeted
by the pestilent little cur with a wary kindling
of the eye and a most venomous growl.
He has moreover been very complaisant
toward
my lady's gentlewoman, the immaculate
Mrs. Hannah, whom he used to speak of in a
way that I do not choose to mention. Whether
she has the same suspicions with Master
Simon
or not I cannot say, but she receives his
civilities with no better grace than the
implacable
Beauty; unscrewing her mouth into the
most acid smile, and looking as though she
could bite a piece out of him. In short, the
poor general seems to have as formidable foes
to contend with as a hero of ancient fairy tale;
who had to fight his way to his enchanted
princess
through ferocious monsters of every kind;
and to encounter the brimstone terrors of some
fiery dragon.
There is still another circumstance which
inclines
me to give very considerable credit to
Master Simon's suspicions. Lady Lillycraft is
very fond of quoting poetry, and the
conversation
often turns upon it; on which occasions
the general is thrown completely out. It
happened
the other day that Spenser's Fairy Queen
was the theme, for the great part of the
morning
;
and the poor general sat perfectly silent.
I found him not long after in the library, with
spectacles on nose, a book in his hand, and
fast asleep. On my approach he awoke, slipped
the spectacles into his pocket, and began to
read very attentively. After a little while he
put a piece of paper in the place and laid the
volume aside, which I perceived was the Fairy
Queen. I had the curiosity to watch how he
got on in his poetical studies; but, though I have
repeatedly seen him with the book in his hand,
yet I find the paper has not advanced above
three or four pages; the general being extremely
apt to fall asleep when he reads.
VOL. I. 22
FALCONRY.
Ne is there hawk which mantleth her on perch,
Whether high tow'ring or accoasting low,
But I the measure of her flight doe search
And all her prey, and all her diet know.
Spenser
.
Among
the many recreations of the good old
times which the Squire has endeavoured to
revive
on his estate, is that of hawking. He
decries
shooting as a skulking solitary treacherous
sport in comparison; but hawking, he says, was
the noble art of hunting carried into the skies.
It was the stately amusement of gentlemen, for
in old times, he says, according to the Welsh
saying
,
you might know a gentleman by his hawk,
horse, and grayhound. Indeed, a cavalier was
seldom seen abroad without his hawk on his fist,
and even a stately dame did not think herself
completely equipped in riding forth, unless she
had her tasseled-hawk held by jesses on her
delicate
hand. It was thought, in those excellent
days, says an old writer, quite sufficient for a
nobleman to wind their horn, and to carry their
hawke fair, and leave study and learning to the
children of mean people.
In pursuance of this notion, the Squire and
his faithful coadjutor Master Simon, have
bestowed
unwearied pains in endeavouring to
reclaim
,
as it is termed, and to train up hawks for
the sport. A bounty has been given for all hawks
that could be brought to them alive, and the hall
has been well stocked with vermin of the kind.
They have studied the book of St. Albans, and
Markham, and various other books that have
treated of falconry, but they have more especially
studied some old tapestry in the house, whereon
is represented a party of ladies and gentlemen in
ancient dresses; with doublets, and caps and
flaunting feathers, mounted on horse, with
attendants
on foot, all in animated pursuit of the
game. They have met, however, continual checks
and disappointments in endeavouring to bring
this project into operation. Their feathered
school has turned out the most untractable and
graceless scholars. And then they have had so
much trouble in drilling the hangers on, who
were to take charge of the hawks. Old Christy
and the game keeper both set their faces against
it for a time, Christy having been nettled at
hearing
what he terms a wild goose chase put on a
par with a fox hunt, and the gamekeeper having
always been accustomed to look upon hawks as
highway robbers, which it was his duty to
shoot down and nail in terrorem against the
outhouses
.
Christy has at length taken the matter in
hand, but has done still more mischief by his
intermeddling. He is as positive and
wrong-headed
as he is about hunting. Master Simon
has continual disputes with him as to feeding
and training the hawks. He reads to him long
passages from the book of St. Albans, but
Christy, who cannot read, has a sovereign
contempt
for all book knowledge; and persists in
treating the hawks as if they were game cocks.
The consequence is, between these jarring
systems
,
the poor birds have had a sad time of it.
Many have fallen victims to Christy's feeding and
to Master Simon's physicking, for the latter has
gone to work secundem artem, and given them
all the vomitings and scowerings laid down in
the books; never were poor hawks so fed and
physicked before. Others have been lost by
being but half reclaimed, for on being taken
into the field they have raked after the game
quite out of all hearing of the call, and never
returned to school.
All these have been petty but sore grievances
to the Squire, and have led him to despond about
success. He has lately, however, been
rejoiced
by the receipt of a fine Welch falcon,
which Master Simon terms a stately high
flyer It is a present from his friend, Sir
Watkyn
Williams Wynne, and has soared many a
time about the pure airs of Snowdon and the
brow of Penmanmaur.
Ever since the Squire has received this
invaluable
present he has been as impatient to sally
forth and make proof of it, as was Don Quixote
to assay his rusty armour. There have been
some demurs as to whether the bird was in
proper
health and training, or whether it was the
proper season for the sport, but all these have
been overruled by the vehement desire to play
with a new toy, and it has been determined,
right or wrong, in season or out of season, to
have a day's sport in hawking to-morrow.
The Hall, as usual whenever the Squire is
about to make some new sally on his hobby,
is all agog with the thing. Miss Templeton,
who is brought up in reverence for all her
guardian's
humours, has proposed to be of the party,
and Lady Lillycraft has determined to ride out
to the scene of action and look on. This has
gratified the old gentleman extremely; he hails
it as an auspicious omen of the revival of
falconry
;
and does not despair but the time will
come, when it again will be the pride of a fine
lady to carry about a noble falcon in preference
to a parrot or a lap dog.
I have amused myself with the bustling
preparations
of that busy spirit, Master Simon,
and the continual thwartings he receives from
the genuine son of a pepper-box, old Christy.
They have had half a dozen consultations about
how the hawk is to be prepared for the
morning's
sport. Old Nimrod, as usual, has always
got in a pet, upon which Master Simon has
invariably
given up the point, observing in a good
humoured tone, Well, well, have it your own
way, Christy, only don't put yourself in a
passion
,a
reply which always nettles the old
man ten times more than ever.
HAWKING.
The soaring hawk from fist that flies,
Her falconer doth constrain
Sometimes to range the ground about,
To find her out again.
And if by sight or sound of bell,
His falcon he may see,
Wo ho! he cries, with cheerful voice,
The gladdest man is he.
Handful of Pleasant Delites
.
At
an early hour this morning the Hall was
in a bustle, preparing for the sport of the day. I
heard Master Simon whistling and singing a
ditty under my window at sunrise, as he was
preparing some jesses for the hawk's legs. A
hearty breakfast, well flanked by cold meats,
was served up in the great Hall. All the
retainers
and hangers on were in motion. The
horses were led up and down before the door;
there was a direful yelping of dogs; some that
were to accompany us eager to set out, and others
that were to stay at home being whipped back
to their kennels. At length there was a general
turning out of the chivalry. The fair Julia was
dressed in a picturesque hunting dress, with a
light plume of feathers in her riding hat. As
she mounted her favourite galloway, I remarked
with pleasure, that old Christy unbent from his
usual crustiness, and hastened to adjust her
saddle
and bridle; he touched his jockey cap as she
smiled on him and thanked him, and then
looking
round at the other attendants, gave a
knowing
motion with his head; in which I read pride
and exultation, at the charming appearance of
his pupil.
Lady Lillycraft had likewise determined to
witness the sport. She was dressed in her
broad white beaver, tied under the chin, and a
riding habit of the last century. She rode her
sleek ambling pony, whose motion was as easy
as a rocking chair; and was gallantly escorted
by the general, who looked not unlike one of
the doughty heroes in the old prints of the
battle
of Blenheim.
VOL. I. 23
The parson likewise accompanied her on the
other side; for this was a learned amusement in
which he took great interest; and, indeed, had
given much counsel, from his knowledge of old
customs. At length every thing was arranged,
and off we set from the Hall.
The exercise on horseback puts one in fine
spirits; and the scene was gay and animating.
The young men of the family accompanied Miss
Templeton. She sat lightly and gracefully in
her saddle, her plumes dancing and waving in
the air; and the group had a charming effect as
they appeared and disappeared among the trees,
cantering along with the bounding animation of
youth.
The Squire and Master Simon rode together,
accompanied by old Christy, mounted on Pepper.
The latter bore the hawk on his fist, as he
insisted
the bird was most accustomed to him. There
was a rabble rout on foot, composed of
retainers
from the Hall, and some idlers from the
village
,
with two or three spaniels, for the purpose
of starting the game.
A kind of corps de reserve came on quietly
in the rear, composed of Lady Lillycraft,
General
Harbottle, the parson, and a fat footman.
Her ladyship ambled gently along on her sleek
pony, while the general, mounted on a tall hunter,
looked down upon her with an air of the most
protecting gallantry. For my part, being no
sportsman, I kept with this last party, or rather
lagged behind, that I might take in the whole
picture, and the parson occasionally slackened
his pace, and jogged on in company with me.
The sport led us at some distance from the
Hall, in a soft meadow reeking with the moist
verdure of spring. A little river ran through it,
bordered by willows, which had put forth their
tender early foliage. The sportsmen were in
quest of herons, which were said to keep about
this stream.
I saw that there was some disputing already
among the leaders of the sport. The Squire,
Master Simon, and old Christy, came every now
and then to a pause, to consult together, like the
field officers of an army; and I saw by certain
motions of the head, that Christy was as
positive
as any old wrong headed German
commander
.
As we were prancing up this quiet meadow,
every sound we made was answered by a
distinct
echo, from the sunny wall of an old
building
that lay on the opposite margin of the stream.
The circumstance brought to my mind, and I
could not help quoting aloud, the description of
an echo, on Webster's Duchess of Malfy:
Yond side o' th' river lies a wall
Piece of cloister, which in my opinion
Gives the best echo that you ever heard;
So plain is the distinction of our words,
That many have supposed it is a spirit
That answers.
Upon hearing this quotation, the parson
mentioned
a beautiful appellation which the Jews
had of old for the echo; which they called
Bath-kool
,
that is to say, the daughter of the
voice.
*
*
Note
. They said it was an oracle, supplying in the second
temple
the want of the Urim and Thummim with which the first temple
was honoured.
Bekker. Le Monde Enchant.
We had not proceeded very far when a flight
of crows that had been regaling themselves in
the meadow, alarmed by the noise we made,
suddenly rose. Old Christy, all in a flurry
from previous disputing and present surprise,
slipped off the hood of the hawk and let her
fly. Immediately there was a bawling, and
shouting, and yelping, and barking, that baffles
all description.
The crows flew screaming in all directions;
while the hawk soared into the air. My
attention
,
however, was attracted for a time to the
party in the meadow, riding along in the
direction
that the bird flew; their bright beaming
faces turned up to the bright skies as they
watched the game; the men on foot scampered
along, looking up and calling out; the dogs
bounding and yelping with joyous sympathy. I
was delighted with the graceful figure of the
fair Julia; her eye beaming as blue as the sky
she was contemplating. Her gallant lover rode
close by her side, and Lady Lillycraft, who
watched them more than the hawk, would every
now and then exclaim Oh the charming
couple
!
I had paused on a rising ground close by her
ladyship, from whence I had a good view of the
sport. The hawk had singled out a quarry from
among the carrion crew. It was in vain Old
Christy called, and whistled, and endeavoured
to lure her downshe paid no regard to him, and
indeed his calls were drowned in the shouts and
yelps of the army of militia that he had brought
into the field.
It was curious to see the efforts of the two
birds to get above each other; one to make the
fatal swoop, the other to avoid it. Now they
crossed athwart a bright feathery cloud, and now
they were against the clear blue sky. I confess,
being no sportsman, I was more interested for
the poor bird that was striving for its life, than
for the hawk that was playing the part of a
mercenary
soldier. At length the hawk got the upper
hand and made a rushing stoop at her quarry,
but the latter made as sudden a surge
downwards
,
and slanting up again evaded the blow,
screaming and making the best of his way for a
dry tree on the brow of a neighbouring hill.
The poor crow, however, began to flag; the
falcon was again getting above him. I felt more
and more interested, when an exclamation from
Lady Lillycraft made me turn my head.
I beheld a complete confusion among the
sportsmen in the little vale below us. They
were gallopping and running towards the edge of
a bank; and I was shocked to see Miss
Templeton's
horse gallopping along without his rider.
I rode to the place to which the others were
hurrying, and when I reached the bank, which
almost overhung the stream, I saw at the foot of
it the fair Julia, pale, bleeding, and apparently
lifeless, supported in the arms of her frantic
lover.
In gallopping heedlessly along, with her eyes
turned upwards, she had unwarily approached
too near the bank; it had given way with her,
and she and her horse had been precipitated to
the pebbled margin of the river.
I never saw greater consternation. The
captain
was distracted, Lady Lillycraft fainting,
the Squire in dismay, and Master Simon at
his wit's ends. The only one that had real
presence
of mind was old Christy, who ran to the
stream, dipped his jockey cap full of water, and
threw some in her face. The beautiful creature
at length showed signs of returning life; she
opened her eyes; looked around her upon the
agonized group, and comprehending in a
moment
the nature of the scene, gave a sweet smile,
and putting her hand in her lover's, exclaimed
feebly, I am not much hurt, Guy! I could
have taken her to my heart for that single
exclamation
.
It was found, indeed, that she had
escaped almost miraculously, with a contusion
of the head, a sprained ancle, and some slight
bruises. After her wound was stanched, she
was taken to a neighbouring cottage until a
carriage
could be summoned to take her home,
when the cavalcade, which had issued forth so
gayly on this enterprize, returned slowly and
pensively to the Hall.
I had been charmed by the generous spirit
shown by this young creature, who, amidst pain
and danger, had been anxious only to relieve
the distress of those around her. I was
gratified
,
therefore, by the universal concern
displayed
by the domestics on our return. They
came crowding down the avenue, each eager
to render some assistance. The butler stood
ready with some curiously delicate cordial.
The old housekeeper was provided with half a
dozen nostrums prepared by her own hands,
according to the family recipe book, while her
niece, the melting Phoebe, having no other way
of assisting, stood wringing her hands and
weeping
aloud.
The most material effect that is likely to
follow
this accident, is a little delay of the
nuptials
,
which were close at hand. Though I
commisserate the impatience of the captain on
that account, yet I shall not otherwise be sorry,
as I shall have a better opportunity of studying
the characters here assembled, with which I
grow more and more entertained.
I cannot but perceive that the Squire is quite
VOL. I. 24
disconcerted at this unlucky result of his hawking
experiment, and this unfortunate illustration of
his eulogy on female equitation. Old Christy,
too, is very waspish; having been sorely twitted
by Master Simon, for having let his hawk fly
at carrion. As to the falcon, in the confusion
occasioned by the fair Julia's disaster, the bird
was totally forgotten. I make no doubt she has
made the best of her way back to the hospitable
hall of Sir Watkyn Williams Wynne; and may
very possibly be pluming her wings, at this
present
writing, among the breezy bowers of
Wynn-stay
.
ST. MARK'S EVE.
O 'tis a fearful thing to be no more.
Or if to be, to wander after death!
To walk as spirits do, in brakes all day,
And when the darkness comes, to glide in paths
That lead to graves; and in the silent vault
Where lies your own pale shroud, to hover o'er it,
Striving to enter your forbidden corpse.
Dryden
.
The
conversation this evening at supper table
took a curious turn on the subject of a
superstition
,
formerly very prevalent in this part of the
country, relative to the present night of the year,
which is the Eve of St. Mark's. It was believed,
the parson informed us, that if any one would
watch in the church porch on this eve, for three
successive years, from eleven till one o'clock at
night, he would see, on the third year, the shades
of those of the parish who were to die in the
course of the year pass by him into the church,
clad in their usual apparel.
Dismal as such a sight would be, he assured
us it was formerly a frequent thing for persons
to make the necessary vigils. He had known
more than one instance in his time. One old
woman who pretended to have seen this
phantom
procession was an object of great awe,
for the whole year afterwards; and caused much
uneasiness and mischief. If she shook her head
mysteriously at a person it was like a death
warrant
,
and she had nearly caused the death of a
sick person by looking ruefully in at the
window
.
There was also an old man, not many years
since, of a sullen, melancholy temperament, who
had kept two vigils, and began to excite some
talk in the village, when fortunately for public
comfort he died shortly after his third watching;
no doubt from a cold which he had taken, as the
night was tempestuous. It was reported about
the village, however, that he had seen his own
phantom pass by him into the church.
This led to the mention of another
superstition
of an equally strange and melancholy kind,
which, however, is chiefly confined to Wales.
It is respecting what are called corpse candles,
little wandering fires of a pale bluish light, that
move about like tapers in the open air, and are
supposed to designate the way some corpse is to
go. One was seen at Lanylar, late at night,
hovering up and down along the bank of the
Istwish
,
and was watched by the neighbours until
they were tired and went to bed. Not long
afterwards there came a comely country lass
from Montgomeryshire, to see her friends, who
dwelt on the opposite side of the river. She
thought to ford the stream at the very place
where the light had been first seen; but was
dissuaded on account of the height of the flood.
She walked to and fro along the bank just where
the candle had moved, waiting for the
subsiding
of the water. She at length endeavoured
to cross; but the poor girl was drowned in the
attempt.
*
*
Aubrey's Misal.
There was something mournful in this little
anecdote of rural superstition that seemed to
affect all the listeners. Indeed, it is curious to
remark how completely a conversation of the
kind will absorb the attention of a circle, and
sober down its gayety, however boisterous. By
degrees I noticed that every one was leaning
forward, over the table, with their eyes fixed
upon the parson, and at the mention of corpse
candles, which had been seen about the
chamber
of a young lady, who died on the eve of
her wedding day, Lady Lillycraft turned pale.
I have witnessed the introduction of stories of
the kind into various evening circles; they were
often commenced in jest, and listened to with
smiles, but I never knew the most gay, or the
most enlightened of audiences, that were not, if
the conversation continued for any length of time,
completely and solemnly interested in it. There
is, I believe, a degree of superstition lurking in
every mind; and I doubt if any one can
thoroughly
examine all his secret notions and impulses
without detecting it, hidden, perhaps, even from
himself. It seems, in fact, to be a part of our
nature, like instinct of animals, acting
independently
of our reason. It is often found existing
in lofty natures, especially those that are poetical
and aspiring. A great and extraordinary poet
of our day, whose life and writings evince a mind
subject to powerful exaltation, is said to believe
in omens and secret intimations. Csar, it is
well known, was greatly under the influence of
such belief; and Napoleon had his good and evil
days, and his presiding star.
I am now alone in my chamber; but these
themes have taken such hold of my imagination
that I cannot sleep. The room in which I sit is
just fitted to foster such a state of mind. The
walls are hung with tapestry, the figures of which
are faded, and look like unsubstantial shapes
melting
away from sight. Over the fireplace is the
portrait of a lady, who, according to the
housekeeper's
tradition, pined to death for the loss of
her lover in the battle of Blenheim. She has a
most pale and plaintive countenance, and seems to
fix her eyes mournfully upon me. The family
have long since retired. I have heard their steps
die away, and the distant doors clap to after them.
The murmur of voices and the peal of remote
laughter no longer reach the ear. The clock
from the church, in which so many of the
former
inhabitants of this house lie buried, has
chimed
the awful hour of midnight.
I have sat by the window, and mused upon
the dusky landscape, watching the lights
disappearing
one by one from the distant village, and
the moon, rising in her silent majesty, and
leading
up all the silver pomp of heaven. As I have
gazed upon these quiet groves and shadowy
lawns, silvered over and imperfectly lighted by
streaks of dewy moonshine, my mind has been
crowded by thick coming fancies, concerning
those spiritual beings which
Walk the earth
Unseen, both when we wake, and when we sleep.
Are there indeed such beings? Is this space
between
us and the Deity filled up by innumerable
orders of spiritual beings, forming the same
gradations
between the human soul and divine
perfection
,
that we see prevailing from humanity
down to the meanest insect? It is a sublime and
beautiful doctrine inculcated by the early fathers,
that there are guardian angels appointed to watch
over cities and nations; to take care of the
welfare
of good men, and to guard and guide the
steps of helpless infancy. Nothing, says St.
Jerome, gives us a greater idea of the dignity
of our souls than that God has given each of us,
at the moment of our birth, an angel to have care
of it.
Even the doctrine of departed spirits returning
to visit the scenes and beings which were dear
to them during the bodies' existence, though it
has been debased by the absurd superstitions of
the vulgar, in itself is awfully solemn and
sublime
.
However lightly it may be ridiculed, yet the
attention involuntarily yielded to it whenever it
is made the subject of serious discussion; its
prevalence
in all ages and countries; and even
among newly discovered nations that have had
VOL. I. 25
no previous interchange of thought with other
parts of the world, prove it to be one of those
mysterious and almost instinctive beliefs, to
which, if left to ourselves, we should naturally
incline.
In spite of all the pride of reason and
philosophy
,
a vague doubt will still lurk in the mind;
and perhaps will never be perfectly eradicated,
as it is a matter that does not admit of positive
demonstration. Who yet has been able to
comprehend
and describe the nature of the soul; its
mysterious connexion with the body; or in
what part of the frame it is situated? We
know merely that it does exist; but whence it
came; and when it entered into us; and how it
is retained; and where it is seated, and how it
operates, are all matters of mere speculation, and
contradictory theories. If, then, we are thus
ignorant
of this spiritual essence, even while it
forms a part of ourselves, and is continually
present
to our consciousness; how can we pretend
to ascertain, or to deny its powers and
operations
,
when released from its fleshy prison house?
Every thing connected with our spiritual nature
is full of doubt and difficulty. We are
fearfully
and wonderfully made: we are surrounded
by mysteries, and we are mysteries even to
ourselves
.
It is more the manner in which this
superstition
has been degraded, than its intrinsic
absurdity, that has brought it into contempt.
Raise it above the frivolous purposes to which it
has been applied; strip it of the gloom and
horror
with which it has been enveloped, and there
is none of the whole circle of visionary creeds
that could more delightfully elevate the
imagination
,
or more tenderly affect the heart. It would
become a sovereign comfort at the bed of death,
soothing the bitter tear wrung from us by the
agony of our mortal separation. What could
be more consoling than the idea that the souls of
those we once loved, were permitted to return
and watch over our welfare? That affectionate
and guardian spirits sat by our pillows when we
slept, keeping a vigil over our most helpless
hours? That beauty and innocence which had
languished into the tomb, yet smiled unseen
around us, revealing themselves in those blest
dreams wherein we live over again the hours of
past endearments? A belief of this kind would,
I should think, be a new incentive to virtue,
rendering
us circumspect even in our most secret
moments, from the idea that those we once
loved and honoured were invisible witnesses of
all our actions.
It would take away, too, from that
loneliness
and destitution which we are apt to feel
more and more, as we get on in our pilgrimage
through the wilderness of this world, and find
that those who set forward with us, lovingly
and cheerily, on the journey, have one by one
dropped away from our side. Place the
superstition
in this light, and I confess I should like to
be a believer in it. I see nothing in it that is
incompatible
with the tender and merciful nature
of our religion, nor revolting to the wishes and
affections of the heart.
There are departed beings that I have loved
as I never again shall love in this world; that
have loved me, as I never again shall be loved.
If such beings do ever retain in their blessed
spheres the attachments which they felt on
earth; if they take an interest in the poor
concerns
of transient mortality, and are permitted
to hold communion with those whom they
have loved on earth, I feel as if now, at this
deep hour of night, in this silence and solitude,
I could receive their visitation with the most
solemn but unalloyed delight.
In truth, such visitations would be too happy
for this world; they would take away from
the bounds and barriers that hem us in and keep
us from each other. Our existence is doomed
to be made up of transient embraces and long
separations. The most intimate friendshipof
what brief and scattered portions of time does
it consist! We take each other by the hand,
and we exchange a few words and looks of
kindness, and we rejoice together for a few short
moments, and then days, months, years,
intervene
,
and we have no intercourse with each
other. Or if we dwell together for a season,
the grave soon closes its gates and cuts off all
further communion; and our spirits must
remain
in separation and widowhood, until they
meet again in that more perfect state of being,
where soul shall dwell with soul, and there
shall be no such thing as death or absence, or
any other interruption of our union.
TRUE GENTLEMEN.
True gentrie standeth in the trade
Of virtuous life, not in the fleshly line;
For bloud is knit, but gentrie is divine.
Mirror for Magist
.
I have
mentioned some peculiarities of the
Squire in the education of his sons; but I would
not have it thought that his instructions were
directed chiefly to their personal
accomplishments
.
He took great pains also to form their
minds, and to inculcate, what he calls, good old
English principles; such as are laid down in the
writings of Peacham and his contemporaries.
There is one author of whom he cannot speak
without indignation; which is Chesterfield. He
avers, that he did much, for a time, to injure the
true national character, and to introduce, instead
of open manly sincerity, a hollow perfidious
courtliness. His maxims, he affirms, were
calculated to chill the delightful enthusiasm of
youth; to make them ashamedof that romance
which is the dawn of generous manhood, and to
impart to them a cold polish, and a premature
worldliness.
Many of Lord Chesterfield's maxims would
make a young man a mere man of pleasure, but
an English gentleman should not be a mere man
of pleasure. He has no right to such selfish
indulgence. His ease, his leisure, his opulence,
are debts due to his country. He should be a
man at all points; simple, frank and courteous;
intelligent, accomplished and informed; upright,
intrepid and disinterested. One that can mingle
among freemen; that can cope with statesmen;
that can champion his country and its rights,
either at home or abroad.
In a country like England, where there is
such free and unbounded scope for the exertion
of intellect, and where opinion and example
have such weight with the people; every
gentleman
of fortune and leisure should feel himself
bound to employ himself in some way towards
promoting the prosperity or glory of the
nation
.
In a country where intellect and action are
trammelled and restrained, men of rank and
fortune
may become idlers and triflers with impunity;
but an English coxcomb is inexcusable; and this
perhaps is the reason why he is the most
offensive
and insupportable coxcomb in the world.
The Squire, as Frank Bracebridge informs me,
would often hold forth in this manner to his sons,
when they were about leaving the paternal roof;
one to travel abroad; one to go to the army, and
one to the university. He used to have them
with him in the library, which is hung with the
portraits of Sydney, Surrey, Raleigh, Wyat, and
others.
Look at those models of true English
gentlemen
,
my sons, he would say with enthusiasm.
Those were men that wreathed the graces of
the most delicate and refined taste around the
hardy virtues of the soldier; that mingled
what was gentle and gracious, with what was
VOL. I. 26
hardy and manly; that possessed the true
chivalry
of spirit, which is the exalted essence of
manhood
.
They are the lights by which the youth
of this country should array themselves. They
were the patterns and the idols of their country
at home; they were the illustrators of its dignity
abroad. `Surrey,' says Camden, `was the first
nobleman that illustrated his high birth with the
beauty of learning. He was acknowledged to
be the gallantest man, the politest lover, and the
completest gentleman of his time.' And as to
Wyat, his friend Surrey most amiably testifies
of him, that his person was majestic and
beautiful
,
his visage `stern and mild;' that he sang
and played the lute with remarkable sweetness;
spoke the foreign languages with grace and
fluency, and possessed an inexhaustible fund of
wit. And see what a high commendation is
passed upon these illustrious friends.
They were the two chieftains, who having
travelled into Italy, and there tasted the sweet
and stately measures and style of Italian poetry,
greatly polished our rude and homely manner
of vulgar poetry from what it had been before,
and therefore may be justly called the reformers
of our English poetry and style; and Sir Philip
Sydney, who has left us such monuments of
elegant thought, and generous sentiment, and
who illustrated his chivalrous spirit so
gloriously
in the field. And Sir Walter Raleigh,
the elegant courtier, the intrepid soldier, the
enterprizing discoverer, the enlightened
philosopher
,
the magnanimous martyr. These are
the men for English gentlemen to study.
Chesterfield
,
with his cold and courtly maxims,
would have chilled and impoverished such
spirits
.
He would have blighted all the budding
romance of their temperaments. Sydney would
never have written his Arcadia; nor Surrey
have challenged the world in vindication of the
beauties of his Geraldina. These are the
men, my sons, the Squire will continue, that
show to what our national character may be
exalted when its strong and powerful qualities
are duly wrought up and refined. The
solidest
bodies are capable of the highest polish;
and there is no character that may be wrought
to a more exquisite and unsullied
brightness
,
than that of the true English
Gentleman
.
When Guy was about to depart for the army,
the Squire again took him aside, and gave him a
long exhortation. He warned him against that
affectation of cool blooded indifference which he
was told was prevalent among the young British
officers, among whom it was a study to sink
the soldier in the mere man of fashion. A
soldier
,
said he, without pride and enthusiasm in
his profession, is a mere sanguinary hireling.
Nothing distinguishes him from the mercenary
bravo but a spirit of patriotism, or a thirst for
glory. It is the fashion now-a-days, my son,
said he, to laugh at the spirit of chivalry;
when that spirit is really extinct, the profession
of the soldier becomes a mere trade of blood.
He then set before him the conduct of Edward
the Black Prince, who is his mirror of chivalry;
valiant, generous, affable, humane; gallant in
the field; but when he came to dwell on his
courtesy towards his prisoner the King of France;
how he received him into his tent rather as a
conqueror
than as a captive, attended on him at table
like one of his retinue; rode uncovered beside
him on his entry into London, mounted on a
common palfrey, while his prisoner was mounted
in state on a white steed of stately beauty, the
tears of enthusiasm stood in the old gentleman's
eyes.
Finally, on taking leave, the good Squire put
in his son's hands, as a manual, one of his
favourite
old volumes, the life of the Chevalier Bayard
by Godefroy; on a blank page of which he had
written an extract from the Morte D'Arthur,
containing the eulogy of Sir Ector over the body
of Sir Launcelot of the lake, which the Squire
considers as comprising the excellencies of a true
soldier.
Ah, Sir Launcelot, thou wert head of all
christain knights; now there thou liest, thou wert
never matched of none earthly knight's hands.
And thou wert the curtiest knight that ever bare
shield; and thou wert the truest friend to thy
lover that ever bestrood horse; and thou wert the
truest lover of a simple man that ever loved
woman
;
and thou wert the kindest man that ever
strook with sword; and thou wert the goodliest
person that ever came among the presse of
knights; and thou wert the meekest man and the
gentlest that ever eate in hall among ladies;
and thou wert the sternest knight to thy mortal
foe that ever put speare in rest.
FORTUNE TELLING.
Each city, each town, and every village,
Affords us either an alms or pillage.
And if the weather be cold and raw
Then in a barn we tumble on straw.
If warm and fair, by yea-cock and nay-cock,
The fields will afford us a hedge or a hay-cock.
Merry Beggars
.
As
I was walking one evening with the
Oxonian
,
Master Simon, and the general, in a
meadow
not far from the village, we heard the sound
of a fiddle, rudely played, and looking in the
direction whence it came, we saw a thread
of smoke curling up from among the trees. The
sound of music is always attractive, for wherever
there is music there is good humour, or good
will. We passed along a foot path, and had a
peep through a break in the hedge, at the
musician
and his party; when the Oxonian gave us a
wink, and told us that if we would follow him
we should have some sport.
It proved to be a gipsy encampment,
consisting
of three or four little cabins or tents, made of
blankets and sail cloth spread over hoops that
were stuck in the ground. It was on one side
of a green lane, close under a hawthorn hedge,
with a broad beech tree spreading above it. A
small rill tinkled along close by, through the
fresh sward, that looked like a carpet.
A tea kettle was hanging by a crooked piece
of iron, over a fire made from dry sticks and
leaves, and two old gipsies in red cloaks sat
crouched on the grass, gossipping over an
evening
cup of tea; for these creatures, though they
live in the open air, have their ideas of fireside
comforts. There were two or three children
sleeping on the straw with which the tents were
littered; a couple of donkeys were grazing in
the lane, and a thievish looking dog was lying
before the fire. Some of the younger gipsies
were dancing to the music of a fiddle, played
by a tall slender stripling, in an old frock coat,
with a peacock's feather stuck in his hatband.
As we approached, a gipsy girl, with a pair of
fine roguish eyes, came up and as usual offered
to tell our fortunes. I could not but admire
a certain degree of slattern elegance about the
baggage. Her long black silken hair was
curiously
plaited in numerous small braids, and
negligently put up in a picturesque style that a
painter might have been proud to have devised.
Her dress was of figured chintz, rather ragged
and not over clean, but of a variety of most
harmonious and agreeable colours; for these
beings have a singularly fine eye for colours.
Her straw hat was in her hand, and a red cloak
thrown over one arm.
The Oxonian offered at once to have his
fortune
told, and the girl began with the usual
volubility
of her race; but he drew her on one
side near the hedge, as he said he had no idea of
having his secrets overheard. I saw he was
talking to her instead of she to him, and by his
glancing toward us now and then, that he was
giving the baggage some private hints.
When they returned to us he assumed a very
serious air. Zounds, said he, it's very
astonishing
VOL. I. 27
how these creatures come by their
knowledge; this girl has told me some things
that I thought no one knew but myself!
The girl now assailed the general; come,
your honour, said she, I see by your face
you're a lucky man; but you're not happy in
your mind, you're not, indeed, sir; but have a
good heart, and give me a good piece of silver,
and I'll tell you a nice fortune.
The general had received all her approaches
with a banter, and had suffered her to get hold
of his hand; but at the mention of the piece of
silver he hemmed, looked grave, and turning to
us, asked if we had not better continue our
walk. Come, my master, said the girl archly,
you'd not be in such a hurry if you knew all
that I could tell you about a fair lady that has a
notion for you. Come, sir, old love burns strong,
there's many a one comes to see weddings that
go away brides themselves! Here the girl
whispered
something in a low voice, at which the
general coloured up; was a little fluttered, and
suffered himself to be drawn aside under the
hedge, where he appeared to listen to her with
great earnestness, and at the end paid her half a
crown, with the air of a man that has got the
worth of his money.
The girl next made her attack upon Master
Simon, who, however, was too old a bird to be
caught, knowing that it would end in an attack
upon his purse; about which he is a little
sensitive
.
As he has a great nation, however, of
being considered a royster, he chucked her under
the chin, played her off with rather broad jokes,
and put on something of the rake helly air that
we see now and then assumed on the stage, by
the sad-boy gentleman of the old school. Ah,
your honour, said the girl with a malicious
leer, you were not in such a tantrum last year
when I told you about the widow you know
who; but if you had taken a friend's advice you'd
never have come away from Doncaster races
with a flea in your ear.
There was a secret sting in this speech that
seemed quite to disconcert Master Simon. He
jerked away his hand in a pet; smacked his
whip, whistled to his dogs, and intimated that
it was high time to go home. The girl,
however
,
was determined not to lose her harvest.
She made an attack upon me, and as I have a
weakness of spirit where there is a pretty face
concerned, she soon wheedled me out of my
money, and in return read me a fortune, which,
if it prove true, and I am determined to believe
it, will make me one of the luckiest men in the
chronicles of Cupid.
I saw that the Oxonian was at the bottom of
all this oracular mystery, and was disposed to
amuse himself with the general, whose tender
approaches to the widow have attracted the
notice of the wag. I was a little curious,
however
,
to know the meaning of the dark hints
which had so suddenly disconcerted Master
Simon
;
and took occasion to fall in the rear with
the Oxonian on our way home, when he laughed
heartily at my questions, and gave me ample
information
on the subject.
The truth of the matter is that Master
Simon
has met with a sad rebuff since my
Christmas
visit to the Hall. He used at that time to
be joked about a widow, a fine dashing woman,
as he privately informed me. I had supposed the
pleasure he betrayed on these occasions resulted
from the usual fondness of old bachelors for
being teased about getting married, and about
flirting, and being fickle and false hearted. I
am assured, however, that Master Simon had
really persuaded himself the widow had a
kindness for him; in consequence of which he
had been at some extraordinary expense in new
clothes, and had actually got Frank Bracebridge
to order him a coat from Stultz. He began to
throw out hints about the importance of a man's
settling himself in life before he grew old; he
would look grave whenever the widow and
matrimony were mentioned in the same
sentence
;
and privately asked the opinion of
the Squire and parson, about the prudence
of marrying a widow with a rich jointure, but
who had several children.
An important member of a great family
connexion
cannot harp much upon the theme of
matrimony, without its taking wind; and it soon
got buzzed about that Mr. Simon Bracebridge
was actually gone to Doncaster races, with a
new horse; but that he meant to return in a
curricle with a lady by his side. Master Simon
did indeed go to the races, and that with a new
horse; and the dashing widow did make her
appearance in her curricle; but it was
unfortunately
driven by a strapping young Irish
dragoon
;
with whom even Master Simon's
self-complacency
would not allow him to venture into
competition; and to whom she was married
shortly
after.
It was a matter of sore chagrin to Master
Simon
,
for several months, having never before
been so fully committed. The dullest head in
the family had a joke upon him; and there is no
one that likes less to be bantered, than an
absolute
joker.
He took refuge for a time at old Lady
Lillycraft's
until the matter should blow over; and
occupied himself by overlooking her accounts,
regulating the village choir, and teaching a
bullfinch
to whistle God Save the King.
He has now pretty nearly recovered from the
mortification; holds up his head and laughs as
much as any one; affects to pity married men,
and is particularly facetious about widows, when
Lady Lillycraft is not by. His only time of
trial is when the general gets hold of him; who
is infinitely heavy and persevering in his
waggery
,
and will interweave a dull joke, through
the various topics of a whole dinner time.
Master
Simon often parries these attacks by a stanza
from his old work of Cupid's Solicitor for
love.
'Tis in vain to woo a widow over long,
In once or twice her mind you may perceive;
Widows are subtle, be they old or young,
And by their wiles young men they will deceive.
LOVE CHARMS.
Come, do not weep my girl,
Forget him, pretty pensiveness; there will
Come others, every day, as good as he.
Sir J. Suckling
.
The
approach of a wedding in a family is
always an event of great importance, but
particularly
so in a household like this, in a retired
part of the country. Master Simon, who is a
pervading spirit, and through means of the
butler
and housekeeper, knows every thing that
goes forward, tells me that the maid servants are
continually trying their fortunes, and that the
servants' hall has of late been quite a scene of
incantation. It is amusing to notice how the
oddities of the head of a family flow down
through all the branches. The Squire, in the
indulgence of his love of every thing that
smacks of old times, has held so many grave
conversations with the parson at table, about
popular superstitions and traditional rites, that
they have been carried from the parlour to the
kitchen by the listening domestics, and, being
apparently sanctioned by such high authority,
the whole house has become infected by them.
The servants are all versed in the common
modes of trying luck, and the charms to ensure
constancy. They read their fortunes by
drawing
strokes in the ashes; or by repeating a form
of words and looking in a pail of water. St.
Mark's Eve, I am told, was a busy time with
them, being an appointed night for certain
mystic
ceremonies. Several of them sowed hemp
seed to be reaped by their true lovers; they
even ventured upon the solemn and fearful
preparation
of the dumb cake. This must be done
fasting, and in silence. The ingredients are
handed down in traditional form. An egg
shell full of salt, an egg shell full of malt, and
an egg shell full of barley meal. When the
cake is ready it is put upon a pan over the fire,
VOL. I. 28
and the future husband will appear, turn the
cake, and retire; but if a word is spoken, or a
fast is broken, during this awful ceremony
there is no knowing what horrible consequences
would ensue! The experiments in the present
instance came to no result; they that sowed the
hemp seed forgot the magic rhyme that they
were to pronounce; so the true lover never
appeared
;
and as to the dumb cake, what between
the awful stillness they had to keep, and the
awfulness of the midnight hour, their hearts
failed them when they had put the cake on the
pan; and seized with a sudden panic, they all
ran out of the room and did not return until
morning, when they found the mystic cake
burnt to a cinder.
The most persevering at these spells,
however
,
is Phoebe Wilkins, the housekeeper's niece.
As she is a kind of privileged personage, and
rather idle, she has more time to occupy herself
with these matters. She has always had her
head full of love and matrimony. She knows
the dream book by heart, and is quite an oracle
among the little girls of the family, who always
come to her to interpret their dreams in the
mornings.
During the present gayety of the house,
however
,
the poor girl has gone about with a face
full of trouble, and to use the housekeeper's
words, has fallen into a sad hystericky way
lately. It seems that she was born and brought
up in the village, where her father was parish
clerk, and she was an early playmate and
sweetheart of young Jack Tibbets. Since she
has come to live at the Hall, however, her head
has been a little turned. Being very pretty
and naturally genteel, she has been much
noticed
and indulged; and being the housekeeper's
niece, she has held an equivocal station between
a servant and a companion. She has learned
something of fashions and notions among the
yooung ladies, which have effected quite a
metamorphosis
;
insomuch that her finery at church
on Sundays has given mortal offence to her
former
intimates in the village. This has
occasioned
the misrepresentations which have
awakened
the implacable family pride of Dame
Tibbets. But what is worse, Phoebe having a
spice of coquetry in her disposition, showed it
on one or two occasions to her lover, which
produced
a downright quarrel, and Jack, being very
proud and fiery, has absolutely turned his back
upon her for several successive Sundays.
The poor girl is full of sorrow and
repentance
,
and would fain make up with her lover;
but he feels his security, and stands aloof. In
this he is doubtless encouraged by his mother;
who is continually reminding him what he owes
to his family: for this same family pride seems
doomed to be the eternal bane of lovers. As I
hate to see a pretty face in trouble, I have felt
quite concerned for poor Phoebe ever since I
have heard her story. I am told that the
coolness
of young Ready Money is very heavy at
her heart. Instead of singing about the house
as formerly, she goes about pale and sighing,
and is very apt to break into tears when her
companions are full of merriment.
Mrs. Hannah, the vestal gentlewoman of my
Lady Lillycraft, has had long talks with Phoebe,
and has endeavoured to squeeze some of her
own verjuice into the other one's milky nature.
She speaks with contempt and abhorrence of the
whole sex, and advises Phoebe to despise all the
men as she does. But Phoebe's loving temper
is not to be curdled. There is no such thing as
hatred or contempt for mankind in her whole
composition. Her only thoughts are how to
conciliate and reclaim her lover.
The spells and love charms which are matters
of sport to the other domestics, are serious
concerns
with this love-stricken lass. She is
continually
trying her fortune in a variety of ways.
I am told that she has absolutely fasted for six
Wednesdays and three Fridays successively,
having understood that it was a sovereign charm
to ensure being married to one's liking within
the year. She carries about, also, a lock of her
sweetheart's hair, and a ribband he once gave
her, being a mode of producing constancy in
love. She even went so far as to try her fortune
by the moon, which has always had much to do
with lovers' dreams and fancies. For this
purpose
she went out in the night of the full moon,
knelt on a stone in the meadow, and repeated the
old traditional rhyme:
All hail to thee moon, all hail to thee:
I pray thee good moon now show to me,
The youth who my future husband shall be
When she came back to the house she was faint
and pale, and went immediately to bed; the next
morning she told her companions that she had
seen some one close by the hedge in the meadow,
which she was sure was young Tibbets; at any
rate she had dreamt of him all night; both of
which, she was assured, were most happy signs.
It has since turned out that the person in the
meadow was old Christy the huntsman, who
was walking his nightly rounds with the great
stag hound; so that Phoebe's faith in the charm
is completely shaken.
THE LIBRARY.
Yesterday
the fair Julia made her first
appearance
down stairs since her accident; and the
sight of her spread a universal cheerfulness
through the household. She was extremely
pale, however, and could not walk without pain
and difficulty. She was assisted therefore to a
sopha in the library, which is pleasant and retired,
looking out among trees; and so quiet that the
liitle birds came hopping upon the windows and
peering curiously into the apartment.
Here several of the family gathered round, and
devised ways to amuse her, and make the day pass
pleasantly. Lady Lillycraft lamented the want
of some new novel to while away the time, and
was almost in a pet, because the Author of
Waverley had not produced a work for the last
three months.
There was a motion made to call on the parson
for some of his old legends or ghost stories; but
to this Lady Lillycraft objected, as they were apt
to give her the vapours. General Harbottle
gave a minute account, for the sixth time, of
the disaster of a friend in India, who had his leg
bitten off by a tiger, which he was hunting;
and was proceeding to menace the company with
a chapter or too about Tippoo Saib.
At length the captain bethought himself, and
said he believed he had a manuscript tale lying
in one corner of his campaigning trunk, which if
he could find, and the company were desirous,
he would read to them. The offer was eagerly
accepted. He retired, and soon returned with a
roll of blotted manuscript, in a very
gentleman-like
,
but nearly illegible hand; and a great part
written on cartridge paper.
It is one of the scribblings, said he, of
my poor friend, Charles Lightly, of the
dragoons
.
He was a curious, romantic, studious,
fanciful fellow. The favourite, and often the
unconscious butt of his fellow officers, who
entertained
themselves with his eccentricities. He
was in some of the hardest service on the
peninsula
,
and distinguished himself by his
gallantry
.
When the intervals of duty permitted he
was fond of roving about the country, visiting
noted places, and was extremely curious about
Moorish ruins. When at his quarters he was a
great scribbler, and passed much of his leisure
with his pen in his hand.
As I was a much younger officer, and a
very young man, he took me in a manner
under his care, and we became close friends. He
used often to read his writings to me; having a
great confidence in my taste, for I always
praised them. Poor fellow! he was shot
down close by me at Waterloo. We lay
wounded
together for some time, during a hard contest
that took place near at hand. As I was least
hurt, I tried to relieve him, and to stanch the
blood which flowed from a wound in his breast.
He lay with his head in my lap and looked up
thankfully in my face, but shook his head
faintly
,
and made a sign that it was all over with
him; and indeed he died a few minutes
afterwards
,
VOL. I. 29
just as our men had repulsed the enemy,
and came to our relief. I have his favourite
dog and his pistols to this day, and several of
his manuscripts, which he gave to me at
different
times. The one I am now going to read,
is a tale which he told me he wrote in Spain,
during the time that he lay ill of a wound
received
at Salamanca.
We now arranged ourselves to hear the story.
The captain seated himself on the sofa, beside
the fair Julia, who I had noticed to be
somewhat
affected by the picture he had carelessly
drawn of wounds and dangers in a field of
battle
.
She now leaned her arm fondly on his
shoulder, and her eye glistened as it rested on
the manuscript of the poor literary dragoon.
Lady Lillycraft had a deep well-cushioned
elbow
chair wheeled up for her accommodation.
Her dogs were nestled on soft mats at her feet;
and the gallant general took his station in an
arm chair at her side, and toyed with her
ladyship's
elegantly ornamented work bag. The
rest of the circle being all equally well
accommodated
,
the captain began his story; a
copy of which I have been permitted to take
for the benefit of the reader.
THE
STUDENT OF SALAMANCA.
What a life doe I lead with my master. Nothing but blowing of
bellowes, beating of spirits, and scraping of croslets! It is a very
secret science, for none almost can understand the language of it.
Sublimation, almigation, calcination, rubification, encorporation,
circination
,
sementation, albification, and fermentation. With as many
terms unpossible to be uttered as they are to be compassed.
Lilly's Gallathea
.
Once
upon a time, in the ancient city of
Granada
,
there sojourned a young student of
Salamanca
,
of the name of Antonio de Castros. He
was pursuing a course of reading in the library
of the university; and at the same time
indulging
his curiosity by examining those remains of
Moorish magnificence, for which Granada is
renowned
.
While occupied in his studies he
frequently
noticed an old man of singular
appearance
,
who was likewise a visiter at the library,
He was lean and withered, apparently more from
study than age. His eyes, though bright and
visionary, were sunk in his head and thrown into
shade by overhanging eyebrows. His dress was
always the same: a black doublet; a short
black cloak, very rusty and threadbare ; red
stockings, a small ruff, and a large
overshadowing
hat.
His appetite for knowledge seemed insatiable.
He would pass whole days in the library,
absorbed
in study; consulting a multiplicity of
authors
; as though he were pursuing some
interesting
subject through all its ramifications; so
that, in general, when evening came, he was
almost buried among books and manuscripts.
The curiosity of Antonio was excited, and he
inquired of the attendants concerning the
stranger
.
No one could give him any information,
excepting that he had been for some time past a
casual frequenter of the library; that his
reading
lay chiefly among works treating of the
occult
sciences, and that he was particularly curious
in his inquiries after Arabian manuscripts. They
aided, that he never held communication with
any one, excepting to ask for particular works;
that after a fit of studious application he would
disappear for several days, and even weeks, and
when he revisited the library he would look more
withered and haggard than ever.
The student felt interested by this account;
he was leading rather a desultory life, and had
all that capricious curiosity which springs up in
idleness. He determined to make himself
acquainted
with this book-worm, and find out who
and what he was.
The next time that he saw the old man at the
library, he commenced his approaches, by
requesting
permission to peruse one of the volumes with
which the unknown appeared to have finished.
The latter merely bowed his head in token of
assent. After pretending to look through the
volume with great attention, he returned it with
many acknowledgments. The stranger made
no reply.
May I ask, Senor, said Antonio, with some
hesitation, may I ask what you are searching
after in all these books?
The old man raised his head, with an
expression
of surprise at having his studies interrupted
for the first time, and by so intrusive a question.
He surveyed the student with a side glance from
head to foot. Wisdom, my son, said he
calmly
;
and the search requires every moment of
my attention. He then cast his eyes upon his
book, and resumed his studies. But, father,
said Antonio, cannot you spare a moment to
point out the road to others. It is to experienced
travellers, like you, that we strangers in the paths
of knowledge must look for directions on our
journey.
The stranger looked disturbed. I have not
time enough, my son, to learn, said he; much
less to teach. I am ignorant myself of the path
of true knowledge; how then can I show it to
others?
Well, but, father
Senor, said the old man mildly, but
earnestly
,
you must see that I have but few steps
more to the grave. In that short space have I
to accomplish the whole business of my existence.
I have no time for words; every word is as one
grain of sand of my glass wasted. Suffer me to
be alone.
There was no replying to so complete a
closing
of the door of intimacy. The student found
himself calmly, but totally repulsed. Though
curious and inquisitive, yet he was naturally
modest, and on after thoughts he blushed at his
own intrusion. His mind soon became occupied
by other objects. He passed several days
wandering
among the mouldering piles of Moorish
architecture, those melancholy monuments of an
elegant and voluptuous people. He paced the
deserted halls of the Alhambra, the paradise of
the Moorish kings. He visited the great court
of the Lions, famous for the perfidious massacre
of the gallant Abencerrages. He gazed with
admiration at its Mosaic cupolas, gorgeously
painted in gold and azure; its basins of marble;
its alabaster vase, supported by lions and storied
with inscriptions.
His imagination kindled as he wandered
among these scenes. They were calculated to
awaken all the enthusiasm of a youthful mind.
Most of the halls have anciently been beautified
by fountains. The fine taste of the Arabs
delighted
in the sparkling purity and reviving
freshness of water, and they erected, as it was,
altars on every side, to that delicate element.
Poetry mingles with architecture in the
Alhambra
.
It breathes along the very walls.
Whereever
Antonio turned his eye, he beheld
inscriptions
in Arabic wherein the perpetuity of
Moorish
power and splendour within these walls was
confidently predicted. Alas! how had the
prophecy
been falsified! many of the basins where
the fountains had once thrown up their
sparkling
showers, were dry and dusty. Some of the
palaces were turned into gloomy convents, and
the barefoot monk paced through those courts
which had once glittered with the array, and
echoed to the music of Moorish chivalry.
In the course of his rambles the student more
than once encountered the old man of the
library
.
He was always alone; and so full of
thought as not to notice any one about him.
He appeared to be intent upon studying those
VOL. I. 30
half buried inscriptions which are found here
and there among the Moorish ruins; and seem
to murmur from the earth the tale of former
greatness. The greater part of these have since
been translated; but they were supposed by
many, at the time, to contain symbolical
revelations
,
and golden maxims of the Arabian sages
and astrologers.
As Antonio saw the stranger apparently
decyphering
these inscriptions, he felt an eager
longing
to make his acquaintance, and to participate
in his curious researches; but the repulse he had
met with at the library deterred him from making
any farther advances.
He had directed his steps one evening to the
sacred mount which overlooks the beautiful
valley
watered by the Darro; the fertile plain of the
Vega, and all that rich diversity of vale and
mountain that surrounds Granada with an earthly
paradise. It was twilight when he found
himself
at the place where, at the present day, are
situated the chapels known by the name of the
Sacred Furnaces. They are so called from
grottoes in which some of the primitive saints
are said to have been burnt. At the time of
Antonio's
visit the place was an object of much
curiosity. In an excavation of these grottoes,
several manuscripts had recently been
discovered
,
engraved on plates of lead; they were
written
in the Arabian language, excepting one, which
was in unknown characters. The pope had
issued a bull, forbidding any one, under pain of
excommunication, to speak of these manuscripts.
The prohibition had only excited the greater
curiosity; and many reports were whispered
about, that these manuscripts contained treasures
of dark and forbidden knowledge.
As Antonio was examining the place from
whence these mysterious manuscripts had been
drawn, he again observed the old man of the
library, wandering among the ruins. His
curiosity
was now fully awakened; the time and
place served to stimulate it; he resolved to watch
this unknown groper after secret and forgotten
lore, and to trace him to his habitation. There
was something like adventure in the thing, that
charmed his romantic disposition. He followed
the stranger, therefore, at a little distance; at
first cautiously; but he soon observed him to be
so wrapped in his own thoughts as to take little
heed of external objects. They passed along
the skirts of the mountain, and then by the shady
banks of the Darro. They pursued their way
for some distance from Granada, along a lonely
road that led among the hills. The gloom of
evening was gathering, and it was quite dark
when the stranger stopped at the portal of a
solitary
mansion.
It appeared to be a mere wing, or ruined
fragment
of what had once been a pile of some
consequence
.
The walls were of great thickness.
The windows narrow, and generally secured by
iron bars. The door was of planks, studded
with iron spikes, and had been of great strength,
though at present it was much decayed. At
one end of the mansion was a ruinous tower, in
the Moorish style of architecture. The edifice
had probably been a country retreat, or castle of
pleasure, during the occupation of Granada by
the Moors; and rendered sufficiently strong to
withstand any casual assault in those warlike
times.
The old man knocked at the portal, a light
appeared
at a small window just above it, and a
female head looked out. It might have served
as a model for one of Raphael's saints. The
hair was beautifully braided and gathered in a
silken net; and the complexion, as well as could
be judged from the light, was that soft rich
brunette
,
so becoming in southern beauty.
It is I, my child, said the old man. The
face instantly disappeared, and soon after a
wicket door in the large portal opened. Antonio,
who had ventured near to the building, caught a
transient sight of a delicate female form. A pair
of fine black eyes darted a look of surprise at
seeing a stranger hovering near, and the door
was precipitately closed.
There was something in this sudden gleam of
beauty that wonderfully struck the imagination
of the student. It was like a brilliant flashing
from its dark casket. He sauntered about,
regarding
the gloomy pile with increasing interest.
A few simple wild notes from among some rocks
and trees at a little distance, attracted his
attention
.
He found there a group of Gitanas; a
vagabond gipsy race that at that time abounded
in Spain, and lived in hovels and caves of the
hills, about the neighbourhood of Granada. Some
were busy about a fire, others were listening to
the uncouth music which one of their
companions
,
seated on a ledge of the rock, was making
with a split reed.
Antonio endeavoured to obtain some
information
of them concerning the old building and its
inhabitants.
The one who appeared to be their spokesman
was a gaunt fellow with a subtle gait, a
whispering
voice, and a sinister roll of the eye. He
shrugged his shoulders on the student's inquiries,
and said that all was not right in that building.
An old man inhabited it, whom nobody knew,
and whose family appeared to be only his
daughter
and a female servant. He and his
companions
,
he added, lived up among the neighbouring
hills; and as they had been about at night, they
had often seen strange lights and heard strange
sounds from the tower. Some of the country
people, who worked in the vineyards among the
hills, believed the old man to be one that dealt in
the black art; and were not over fond of passing
near the tower at night; but for our parts,
said the Gitano, we are not a people that
trouble
ourselves much with fears of that kind.
The student endeavoured to gain more
precise
information, but they had none to furnish
him. They began to be solicitous for a
compensation
for what they had already imparted; and,
recollecting the loneliness of the place and the
vagabond character of his companions, he was
glad to give them a gratuity and to hasten
homewards
.
He sat down to his studies; but his brain was
too full of what he had seen and heard; his eye
was upon the page, but his fancy still returned to
the tower, and he was continually picturing the
little window, with the beautiful head peeping
out, or the door half open, and the nymph-like
form within.
He retired to bed; but the same objects
haunted his dreams. He was young and
susceptible
;
and the excited state of his feelings, from
wandering among the abodes of departed grace
and gallantry, had predisposed him for a sudden
impression from female beauty.
The next morning he strolled again in the
direction
of the tower. It was still more forlorn
by the broad glare of day, than in the gloom of
evening. The walls were crumbling, and weeds
and moss were growing in every crevice. It
had the look of a prison, rather than a dwelling
house. In one angle, however, he remarked a
window which seemed an exception to the
surrounding
squalidness. There was a curtain
drawn within it, and flowers standing on the
window stone. Whilst he was looking at it the
curtain was partially withdrawn, and a delicate
white arm of the most beautiful roundness was
put forth to water the flowers.
The student made a noise to attract the
attention
of the fair florist. He succeeded. The
curtain was farther drawn, and he had a glance
of the same face he had seen the evening
before
;
it was but a mere glance; the curtain
again fell, and the casement closed. All this
was calculated to excite the feelings of a
romantic
youth. Had he seen the unknown under
other circumstances, it is probable that he would
not have been struck with her beauty; but this
appearance of being shut up and kept apart,
gave her the value of a treasured gem. He
passed
and repassed before the house several times
in the course of the day, but saw nothing more.
He was there again in the evening. The whole
aspect of the house was dreary. The narrow
windows emitted no rays of cheerful light to
indicate
that there was social life within. Antonio
listened at the portal; but no sound of voices
reached his ear. Just then he heard the
clapping
to of a distant door, and fearing to be
detected
in the unworthy act of eavesdropping,
he precipitately drew off to the opposite side of
the road and stood in the shadow of a ruined
arch-way.
He now remarked a light from a window in
VOL. I. 31
the tower. It was fitful and changeable;
commonly
feeble and yellowish as if from a lamp,
with an occasional glare of some vivid metallic
colour, followed by a dusky glow. A column
of dense smoke would now and then rise in the
air, and hang, like a canopy, over the tower.
There was altogether such a loneliness and
seeming mystery about the building and its
inhabitants
,
that Antonio was half inclined to indulge
the country people's notions, and to fancy it the
den of some powerful sorcerer, and the fair
damsel
he had seen some spell-bound beauty.
After some time had elapsed a light appeared
in the window where he had seen the beautiful
arm. The curtain was down; but it was so
thin that he could perceive the shadow of some
one passing and repassing between it and the
light. He fancied that he could distinguish
that the form was delicate; and from the
alacrity
of its movements it was evidently youthful.
He had not a doubt but this was the bed
chamber
of his beautiful unknown.
Presently he heard the sound of a guitar, and
a female voice singing. He drew near
cautiously
,
and listened. It was a plaintive
Moorish
ballad, and he recognized in it the
lamentations
of one of the Abencerrages on leaving the
walls of lovely Granada. It was full of
passion
and tenderness. It spoke of the delights
of early life; the hours of love it had enjoyed
on the banks of the Darro, and among the
blissful abodes of the Alhambra. It bewailed
the fallen honours of the Abencerrages, and
imprecated
vengeance on their oppressors.
Antonio
was affected by the music. It singularly
coincided with the place. It was like the voice
of past times echoed in the present, and
breathing
among the monuments of its departed
glories
.
The voice ceased; after a time the light
disappeared
,
and all was still. She sleeps, said
Antonio fondly. He lingered about the
building
with the devotion with which a lover lingers
about the bower of sleeping beauty. The
rising
moon threw its silver beams on the gray
walls, and glittered on the casement. The
late gloomy landscape gradually became
flooded
with its radiance. Finding therefore that he
could no longer move about in obscurity, and
fearful that his loiterings might be observed, he
reluctantly retired.
The curiosity which had at first drawn the
young man to the tower, was now seconded by
feelings of a more romantic kind. His studies
were almost entirely abandoned. He maintained
a kind of blockade of the old mansion. He
would take a book with him and pass a great
part of the day under the trees in its vicinity;
keeping a vigilant eye upon it, and endeavouring
to ascertain what were the walks of his
mysterious
charmer. He found, however, that she
never went out except to mass; when she was
accompanied by her father. He waited at the
door of the church, and offered her the holy
water, in the hopes of touching her hand; a little
office of gallantry common in catholic countries.
She, however, modestly declined without raising
her eyes to see who made the offer, and always
took it herself from the font. She was attentive
in her devotion; her eyes were never taken from
the altar or the priest, and on returning home,
her countenance was almost entirely concealed
by her mantilla.
Antonio had now carried on the pursuit for
several days, and was hourly getting more and
more interested in the pursuit, but never a step
nearer to the game. His lurkings about the
house had probably been noticed; for he no longer
saw the fair face at the window, nor the white
arm put forth to water the flowers.
His only consolation was to repair nightly to
his post of observation, listen to her warbling,
and if by chance he could catch a sight of her
shadow passing and repassing before the window,
he thought himself most fortunate.
As he was indulging in one of these evening
vigils, which were complete revels of the
imagination
,
the sound of approaching footsteps made
him withdraw into the deep shadow of the
ruined
archway, opposite to the tower. A cavalier
approached, wrapped in a large Spanish cloak.
He paused under the window of the tower,
and after a little while began a serenade,
accompanied
by his guitar, in the usual style of Spanish
gallantry. His voice was rich and manly; he
touched the instrument with skill, and sang
with amorous and impassioned eloquence.
The plume of his hat was buckled by jewels
that sparkled in the moon beams; and as he
played on the guitar, his cloak falling off from
one shoulder, showed him to be richly dressed.
It was evident that he was a person of rank.
The idea now flashed across Antonio's mind
that the affections of his unknown beauty might
be engaged. She was young, and doubtless
susceptible
,
and it was not in the nature of Spanish
females to be deaf and insensible to music and
admiration. The surmise brought with it a
feeling of dreariness. There was a pleasant
dream of several days suddenly dispelled. He
had never before experienced any thing of the
tender passion, and, as its morning dreams are
always delightful, he would fain have continued
in the delusion.
But what have I to do with her
attachments
?
thought he. I have no claim on her
heart, nor even on her acquaintance. How do
I know that she is worthy of affection? or if
she is, must not so gallant a lover as this, with
his jewels, his rank, and his detestable music,
have completely captivated her? What idle
humour is this that I have fallen into? I must
again to my books. Study, study, will soon
chase away all these idle fancies.
The more he thought, however, the more he
became entangled in the spell which his lively
imagination had woven round him; and now
that a rival had appeared, in addition to the
other obstacles that environed this enchanted
beauty, she appeared ten times more lovely and
desirable. It was some slight consolation to
him to perceive that the gallantry of the
unknown
met with no apparent return from the
tower. The light at the window was
extinguished
;
the curtain remained undrawn, and
none of the customary signals were given to
intimate that the serenade was accepted.
The cavalier lingered for some time about the
place, and sang several other tender airs, with a
taste and feeling that made Antonio's heart
ache; at length he slowly retired. The student
remained with folded arms leaning against the
ruined arch; endeavouring to summon up
resolution
enough to depart, but there was a
romantic
fascination that still enchained him to the
place. It is the last time, said he, willing to
compromise between his feelings and his
judgment
,
it is the last time; then let me enjoy
the dream a few moments longer.
As his eye ranged about the old building to
take a farewell look, he observed the strange
light in the tower, which he had noticed on a
former occasion. It kept beaming up, and
declining
as before. A pillar of smoke rose in the
air, and hung in sable volumes. It was evident
the old man was busied in some of those
operations
that had gained him the reputation of a
sorcerer throughout the neighbourhood.
Suddenly an intense and brilliant glare shone
through the casement, followed by a loud report,
and then a fierce and ruddy glow. A figure
appeared
at the window uttering cries of agony or
alarm, but immediately disappeared, and a body
of smoke and flame whirled out of the narrow
aperture. Antonio rushed to the portal and
knocked at it with vehemence. He was only
answered by loud shrieks, and found that the
females were already in helpless consternation.
With an exertion of desperate strength he forced
the wicket from its hinges and rushed into the
house.
He found himself in a small vaulted hall, and
by the light of the moon which entered at the
door he saw a stairs to the left. He hurried up
it to a narrow corridor, through which was
roling
a volume of smoke. He found here the
two females in a frantic state of alarm; one of
them clasped her hands, and implored him to save
her father.
The corridor terminated in a small spiral
staircase
leading up to the tower. He sprang up it,
to a small door through the chinks of which
came a glow of light, and smoke was spuming
out. He burst it open, and found himself in an
VOL. I. 32
antique vaulted chamber, furnished with furnace
and various chemical apparatus. A shattered
retort lay on the stone floor; a quantity of
combustibles
,
nearly consumed, with various half
burnt books and papers, were sending up an
expiring
flame, and filling the chamber with stifling
smoke. Just within the threshold lay the
reputed
conjurer. He was bleeding; his clothes
were scorched, and he appeared lifeless.
Antonio
caught him up, and bore him down the
stairs to a chamber in which there was a light,
and laid him on a bed.
The female domestic was despatched for such
appliances as the house afforded; but the
daughter
threw herself frantically beside her parent,
and could not be reasoned out of her alarm. Her
dress was all in disorder; her dishevelled hair
hung in rich confusion about her neck and
bosom
;
and never was there beheld a lovelier
picture
of terror and affliction.
The skilful assiduities of the scholar soon
produced
signs of returning animation in his
patient
.
The old man's wounds, though severe,
were not dangerous. They had evidently been
produced by the bursting of the retort; in his
bewilderment he had been enveloped in the
stifling
metallic vapours, which had overpowered
his feeble frame, and had not Antonio arrived to
his assistance, it is probable he would never have
recovered.
By slow degrees he came to his senses. He
looked about, with a bewildered air, at the
chamber
the
agitated group aroundand the
student
who was leaning over him.
Where am I? said he wildly. At the
sound of his voice his daughter uttered a faint
exclamation of delight. My poor Inez! said
he, embracing her; then putting his hand to his
head, and taking it away stained with blood, he
seemed suddenly to recollect himself, and to be
overcome with emotion.
Aye! cried he, all is over with me! all
gone! all vanished! gone in a moment! the
labour of a lifetime lost!
His daughter attempted to soothe him, but he
became slightly delirious, and raved incoherently
about malignant demons, and about the
habitation
of the green lion being destroyed. His
wounds being dressed, and such other remedies
administered as his situation required, he sank
into a state of quiet. Antonio now turned his
attention to the daughter, whose sufferings had
been little inferior to those of her father.
Having
with great difficulty succeeded in
tranquillizing
her fears, he endeavoured to prevail upon
her to retire, and seek the repose so necessary to
her frame; proffering to remain by her father
until morning. I am a stranger, said he, it is
true, and my offer may appear intrusive; but
I see you are lonely and helpless, and I cannot
help venturing over the limits of mere ceremony.
Should you feel any scruple or doubt, however,
say but a word and I will instantly retire.
There was a frankness, a kindness, and a
modesty mingled in Antonio's deportment that
inspired instant confidence; and his simple
scholar's
garb was a recommendation in the house
of poverty. The females consented to resign the
sufferer to his care, as they would be the better
able to attend to him on the morrow.
On retiring, the old domestic was profuse in
her benedictions; the daughter only looked her
thanks; but as they shone through the tears
that filled her fine black eyes, the student
thought them a thousand times the most
eloquent
.
Here then he was, by a singular turn of
chance, completely housed within this mysterious
mansion. When left to himself, and the bustle
of the scene was over, his heart throbbed as he
looked round the chamber in which he was
sitting
.
It was the daughter's room; the promised
land towards which he had cast so many a
longing
gaze. The furniture was old, and had
probably
belonged to the building in its prosperous
days; but every thing was arranged with propriety.
The flowers that he had seen her attend stood
in the window; a guitar leaned against a table,
on which stood a crucifix, and before it lay a
missal and a rosary. There reigned an air of
purity and serenity about this little nestling place
of innocence; it was the emblem of a chaste
and quiet mind. Some few articles of female
dress lay on the chairs; and there was the very
bed on which she had slept; the pillow on which
her soft cheek had reclined! The poor scholar
was treading enchanted ground; for what fairy
land has more of magic in it, than the bed
chamber
of innocence and beauty?
From various expressions of the old man in
his ravings, and from what he had noticed on a
subsequent visit to the tower to see that the fire
was extinguished, Antonio had gathered that
his patient was an alchymist. The philosopher's
stone was an object eagerly sought after by
visionaries
in those days; but in consequence of
the superstitious prejudices of the times, and the
frequent persecutions of its votaries, they were
apt to pursue their experiments in secret; in
lonely houses, in caverns, and ruins, or in the
privacy of cloistered cells.
In the course of the night the old man had
several fits of restlessness and delirium; he would
call out upon Theophrastus, and Geber, and
Albertus Magnus, and other sages of his art;
and anon would murmur about fermentation
and projection; until towards daylight he once
more sank into a salutary sleep.
When the morning sun darted his rays into
the casement, the fair Inez, attended by the
female
domestic, came blushing into the chamber.
The student now took his leave, having himself
need of repose, but obtained ready permission to
return and inquire after the sufferer. When he
called again, he found the alchymist languid
and in pain, but apparently suffering more in
mind than in body. His delirium had left him,
and he had been informed of the particulars of
his deliverance, and of the subsequent attentions
of the scholar. He could do little more than
look his thanks; but Antonio did not require
them; his own heart repaid him for all that he
had done; and he almost rejoiced in the disaster
that had gained him an entrance into this
mysterious
habitation.
The alchymist was so helpless as to need
much assistance; Antonio remained with him
therefore the greater part of the day. He
repeated
his visit the next day, and the next.
Every day his company seemed more pleasing
to the invalid; and every day he felt his
interest
in the latter increasing. Perhaps the
presence
of the daughter might have been at the
bottom of this solicitude.
He had frequent and long conversations with
the alchymist. He found him, as men of his
pursuits were apt to be, a mixture of
enthusiasm
and simplicity; of curious and extensive
reading on points of little utility; with great
inattention to the every day occurrences of life,
and profound ignorance of the world. He was
deeply versed in singular and obscure branches
of knowledge, and much given to visionary
speculations. Antonio, whose mind was of a
romantic cast, had himself given some
attention
to the occult sciences, and entered upon
those themes with an ardour that delighted the
philosopher. Their conversations frequently
turned upon astrology, divination, and the great
secret. The old man would forget his aches
and wounds, rise up like a spectre in his bed,
and kindle into eloquence on his favourite
topics
.
When gently admonished of his
situation
,
it would but prompt him to another sally
of thought. Alas, my son! he would say,
is not this very decrepitude and suffering
another proof of the importance of those
secrets
with which we are surrounded? Why
are we trammelled by disease; withered by old
age, and our spirits quenched as it were within
us, but because we have lost those secrets of
life and youth which were known to our parents
before their fall? To regain these have
philosophers
been ever since aspiring; but just as
they are on the point of securing the precious
secrets for ever, the brief period of life is at an
end; they die, and with them, all their wisdom
and experience. Nothing, as De Nuysment
observes, nothing is wanting for man's
perfection
but a longer life, less crost with
sorrows
and maladies; to the attaining of the full
and perfect knowledge of things.
At length Antonio so far gained on the heart
of his patient as to draw from him the outlines
of his story.
VOL. I. 33
Felix de Vasquez, the alchymist, was a
native
of Castile, and of an ancient and
honourable
line. Early in life he had married a
beautiful
female, the descendant of one of the Moorish
families. The marriage displeased his father,
who considered the pure Spanish blood
contaminated
by this foreign mixture. It is true,
the lady traced her descent from one of the
Abencerrages, the most gallant of Moorish
cavaliers
,
who had embraced the Christian faith
on being exiled from the walls of Granada.
The injured pride of the father, however, was
not to be appeased. He never saw his son
afterwards; and on dying left him but a scanty
portion of his estate, bequeathing the residue,
in the piety and bitterness of his heart, to the
erection of convents and the performance of
masses for souls in purgatory. Don Felix
resided
for a long time in the neighbourhood of
Valladolid in a state of embarrassment and
obscurity
.
He devoted himself to intense study;
having, while at the university of Salamanca,
imbibed a taste for the secret sciences. He was
enthusiastic and speculative; he went on from
one branch of knowledge to another until he
became zealous in the search after the grand
arcanum.
He had at first engaged in the pursuit with the
hopes of raising himself from his present
obscurity
,
and resuming the rank and dignity to which
his birth entitled him; but, as usual, it ended in
absorbing every thought, and becoming the
business
of his existence. He was at length aroused
from this mental abstraction by the calamities of
his household. A malignant fever swept off his
wife and all his children, excepting an infant
daughter. These losses for a time overwhelmed
and stupified him. His home had in a manner
died away from around him, and he felt lonely
and forlorn. When his spirit revived within him
he determined to abandon the scene of his
humiliation
and disaster; to bear away the child
that was still left him, beyond the scene of
contagion
;
and never to return to Castile until he
should be enabled to reclaim the honour of his
line.
He had ever since been wandering and
unsettled
in his abode; sometimes the resident of
populous
cities, at other times of absolute solitudes.
He had searched libraries; meditated on
inscriptions
;
visited adepts of different countries; and
sought to gather and concentrate the rays which
had been thrown by various minds upon the
secrets
of alchymy. He had at one time travelled
quite to Padua to search for the manuscripts of
Pietro D'Abano, and to inspect an urn which
had been dug up near Este; supposed to have
been buried by Maximus Olibius, and to have
contained the great elixir.
*
*
Note
. This urn was found in 1533. It contained a lesser one,
in which was a burning lamp betwixt two small vials, the one of
gold, the other of silver, both of them full of a very clear liquor. On
the largest was an inscription stating that Maximus Olibius shut up in
this small vessel elements which he had prepared with great toil.
There were many disquisitions among the learned on the subject. It
was the most received opinion, that this Maximus Olibius was an
inhabitant
of Padua; that he had discovered the great secret, and that
these vessels contained liquor, one to transmute metals to gold, the
other to silver. The peasants who found these urns, imagining this
precious liquor to be common water, spilt every drop, so that the art
of transmuting metals remains as much a secret as ever.
While at Padua, he had met with an adept,
versed in Arabian lore, who talked of the
invaluable
manuscripts that must remain in the
Spanish
libraries preserved from the spoils of the
Moorish academies and universities; of the
probability
of meeting with precious unpublished
writings of Geber, and Alfarabius, and Avicenna,
the great physicians of the Arabian schools, who
it was well known had treated much of
alchymy
;
but above all, he spoke of the Arabian
tablets of lead which had recently been dug up
in the neighbourhood of Granada, and which
contained the lost secrets of the art.
The indefatigable alchymist once more bent
his steps for Spain, full of renovated hope. He
had made his way to Granada; he had wearied
himself in the study of Arabic; in decyphering
inscriptions; in rummaging libraries, and
exploring
every possible trace left by the Arabian
sages.
In all his wanderings he had been accompanied
by Inez; through the rough and the smooth; the
pleasant and the adverse; never complaining, but
rather seeking to sooth his cares by her innocent
and playful caresses. Her instruction had been
the employment and the delight of his hours of
relaxation.She had grown up while they were
wandering, and had scarcely ever known any
home but by his side. He was family, friends,
home, every thing to her. He had carried her
in his arms when they first began their wayfaring;
had nestled her, as an eagle does its young,
among the rocky heights of the Sierra Morena.
She had sported about him in childhood in the
solitudes of the Bateucas; had followed him, as
a lamb does the shepherd, over the rugged
Pyrenees
,
and into the fair plains of Languedoc; and
now she was grown up to support his feeble steps
among the ruined abodes of her maternal
ancestors
.
His property had gradually wasted away in
the course of his travels and his experiments.
Still hope, the constant attendant of the
alchymist
,
led him on; ever on the point of reaping
the reward of his labours, and ever disappointed.
With the credulity that often attended his art,
he attributed many of his disappointments to the
machinations of the malignant spirits that beset
the path of the alchymist, and torment him in his
solitary labours.
It is their constant endeavour, he observed, to
close up every avenue to those sublime truths
which would enable man to rise above the abject
state into which he had fallen, and to return to
his original perfection. To the evil offices of
these demons he attributed his late disaster. He
had been on the very verge of the glorious
discovery
;
never were the indications more
completely
auspicious; all was going on
prosperously
,
when, at the critical moment which should
have crowned all his labours with success, and
have placed him at the very summit of human
power and felicity, the bursting of a retort had
reduced his laboratory and himself to ruin.
I must now, said he, give up at the very
threshold of success. My books and papers are
burnt; my apparatus is broken. I am too old
to bear up against these evils. The ardour that
once inspired me is gone; my poor frame is
exhausted
by study and watchfulness, and this last
misfortune has hurried me towards the grave.
He concluded in a tone of deep dejection.
Antonio endeavoured to comfort and reassure
him; but the poor alchymist had for once
awakened to a consciousness of the worldly ills
that were gathering around him, and had sunk
into despondency. After a pause, and some
thoughtfulness and perplexity of brow, Antonio
ventured to make a proposal.
I have long, said he, been filled with a
love for the secret sciences, but have felt too
ignorant
and diffident to give myself up to them.
You have acquired experience; you have
amassed
the knowledge of a lifetime; it were a pity
it should be thrown away. You say you are too
old to renew the toils of the laboratory; suffer
me to undertake them. Add your knowledge
to my youth and activity, and what shall we not
accomplish? As a probationary fee, and a fund
on which to proceed, I will bring into the
common
stock a sum of gold, the residue of a legacy,
which has enabled me to complete my
education
.
A poor scholar cannot boast much, but I
trust we shall soon put ourselves beyond the
reach of want; and if we should fail, why, I
must depend, like other scholars, upon my brains
to carry me through the world.
The philosopher's spirits were, however,
more depressed than the student had imagined.
This last shock, following in the rear of so
many disappointments, had almost destroyed
the reaction of his mind; the fire of an
enthusiast
,
however, is never so low but that it may
be blown again into a flame. By degrees the
old man was cheered and reanimated by the
buoyancy and ardour of his sanguine companion.
He at length agreed to accept of the services of
the student, and once more to renew his
experiments
.
He objected, however, to using the
student's gold, notwithstanding that his own
was nearly exhausted; but this objection was
soon overcome; the student insisted on making
it a common stock and common cause; and
then how absurd was any delicacy about such
a trifle, with men who looked forward to
discovering
the philosopher's stone.
While, therefore, the alchymist was slowly
VOL. I. 34
recovering, the student busied himself in getting
the laboratory once more in order. It was
strewed with the wrecks of retorts and
alembics
;
with old crucibles; boxes and phials of
powders, and tinctures, and half burnt books
and manscripts.
As soon as the old man was sufficiently
recovered
,
the studies and experiments were
renewed
.
The student became a privileged and
frequent visiter, and was indefatigable in his
toils in the laboratory. The philosopher daily
derived new zeal and spirits from the animation
of his disciple. He was now enabled to
prosecute
the enterprize with continued exertion,
having so active a coadjutor to divide the toil.
While he was poring over the writings of
Sandivogius
,
and Philalethes and Dominus de
Nuysment
,
and endeavouring to comprehend the
symbolical
language in which they have locked up
their inscrutable mysteries, Antonio would
occupy
himself among the retorts and crucibles,
and keep the furnace in a perpetual glow.
With all his zeal, however, for the discovery
of the golden art, the feelings of the student had
not cooled, as to the object that first drew him
to this ruinous mansion. During the old man's
illness, he had frequent opportunities of being
near the daughter; and every day made him
more sensible to her charms. There was a pure
simplicity, and an almost passive gentleness in
her manners, yet with all this was mingled
something
,
whether mere maiden shyness, or a
consciousness
of high descent, or a dash of Castilian
pride, or perhaps all united, which prevented
undue familiarity, and made her difficult of
approach
.
The danger of her father, and the measures to
be taken for his relief, had at first overcome this
coyness and reserve; but as he recovered, and her
alarm subsided, she seemed to shrink from the
familiarity she had indulged with the youthful
stranger, and to become every day more shy
and silent.
Antonio had read many books, but this was
the first volume of woman kind that he had
ever studied. He had been captivated with the
very title page; but the farther he read the
more he was delighted. She seemed formed to
love; her soft black eye rolled languidly under
its long silken lashes, and wherever it turned, it
would linger and repose; there was tenderness
in every beam. To him alone she was reserved
and distant. Now that the common cares of
the sick room were at an end, he saw little
more of her than before his admission to the
house. Sometimes he met her on his way to
and from the laboratory, and at such times there
was ever a smile and a blush; but after a
simple
salutation, she glided on and disappeared.
'Tis plain, thought Antonio, my
presence
is indifferent if not irksome to her. She
has noticed my admiration, and is determined to
discourage it; nothing but a feeling of
gratitude
prevents her treating me with marked
distaste
:
and then, has she not another lover; rich,
gallant, splendid, musical; how can I suppose
she would turn her eyes from so brilliant a
cavalier
,
to a poor obscure student, raking among the
cinders of her father's laboratory?
Indeed, the idea of the amorous serenader
continually haunted his mind. He felt
convinced
that he was a favoured lover; yet, if so,
why did he not frequent the tower? why did
he not make his approaches by noon-day?
There was mystery in this eavesdropping and
musical courtship. Surely Inez could not be
encouraging a secret intrigue. Oh no! she was
too artless, too pure, too ingenuous. But then
the Spanish females were so prone to love and
intrigue; and music and moonlight were so
seductive
;
and Inez had such a tender soul,
languishing
in every look.Oh! would the
poor scholar exclaim, clasping his hands, if I
could but once behold those lovely eyes
beaming
on me with affection!
It is incredible to those who have not
experienced
it, on what scanty aliment human life and
human love may be supported. A dry crust,
thrown now and then to a starving man, will
give him a new lease of existence; and a faint
smile, or a kind look, bestowed at casual
intervals
,
will keep a lover loving on, when a man in
his sober senses would despair.
When Antonio found himself alone in the
laboratory
,
his mind would be haunted by one of
these looks, or smiles, which he had received in
passing. He would set it in every possible light,
and argue on it with all the self-pleasing
self-teasing
logic of a lover.
The country around him was enough to
awaken that voluptuousness of feeling so
favourable
to the growth of passion. The
window
of the tower rose above the trees of the
romantic
valley of the Darro, and looked down
upon some of the loveliest scenery of the Vega;
where the groves of citrons and orange were
refreshed
by cool springs and brooks of the purest
water. The Xenel and the Darro wound their
shining streams along the plain, and gleamed
from among its bowers. The surrounding hills
were covered with vineyards, and the mountains
crowned with snow seemed to melt into the blue
sky. The delicate airs that played about the
tower were perfumed by the fragrance of myrtle
and orange blossoms, and the ear was charmed
with the fond warbling of the nightingale, which,
in these happy regions, sings the whole day
long. Sometimes, too, there was the idle song
of the muleteer, sauntering along the solitary
road; or the notes of the guitar from some
group of peasants dancing in the shade. All
these were enough to fill the head of a young
lover with poetic fancies; and Antonio would
picture to himself how he could live among those
happy groves, and wander by those gentle
rivers
,
and love away his life with Inez.
He felt at times impatient at his own
weakness
,
and would endeavour to brush away these
cobwebs of the mind. He would turn his
thoughts with sudden effort, to his occult
studies
;
or occupy himself in some perplexing
process
;
but often when he had partially succeeded
in fixing his attention, the sound of Inez' lute,
or the soft notes of her voice would come
stealing
upon the stillness of the chamber, and, as it
were, floating round the tower. There was no
great art in her performance; but Antonio thought
he had never heard music comparable to this.
It was perfect witchcraft to hear her warble forth
some of her national melodies; those little
Spanish
romances and Moorish ballads that
transport
the hearer, in idea, to the banks of the
Guadalquiver or the walls of Alhambra, and
make him dream of beauties, and balconies, and
moonlight serenades.
Never was poor student more sadly beset than
Antonio. Love is a troublesome companion in
a study at the best of times; but in the
laboratory
of an alchymist his intrusion is terribly
disastrous
.
Instead of attending to the retorts and
crucibles, and watching the process of some
experiment
entrusted to his charge, the student
would get entranced in one of these love dreams,
from which he would often be aroused by some
fatal catastrophe. The philosopher, on
returning
from his researches in the libraries, would
find every thing gone wrong, and Antonio in
despair
over the ruins of the whole day's work.
The old man, however, took all quietly; for his
had been a life of experiments and failure.
We must have patience, my son, would he
say, as all the great masters that have gone
before
us have had. Errors, and accidents, and
delays, are what we have to contend with. Did
not Pontanus err two hundred times before he
could obtain even the matter on which to found
his experiments? The great Flamel too, did
he not labour four and twenty years, before he
ascertained the first agent? What difficulties
and hardships did not Cartilaceus encounter
at the very threshold of his discoveries? And
Bernard de Treves; even after he had attained
a knowledge of all the requisites, was he not
delayed full three years? What you consider
accidents, my son, are the machinations of our
invisible enemies. The treasures and golden
secrets of nature are surrounded by spirits
hostile
to man. The air about us teems with them.
They lurk in the fire of the furnace, in the
bottom
of the crucible and the alembic, and are
ever on the alert to take advantage of those
moments when our minds are wandering from
the intense meditation on the great truths that
we are seeking. We must only strive the more
to purify ourselves from those gross and earthly
VOL. I. 35
feelings which becloud the soul, and prevent
her from piercing into nature's arcana.
Alas, thought Antonio, if to be purified
from all earthly feeling requires that I should
cease to love Inez, I fear I shall never discover
the philosopher's stone!
In this way matters went on for some time at
the alchymist's. Day after day was sending the
student's gold in vapour up the chimney; every
blast of the furnace made him a ducat the
poorer, without apparently helping him a jot
nearer the golden secret. Still the young man
stood by, and saw piece after piece disappearing
without a murmur; he had daily an opportunity
of seeing Inez; he felt as if her favour would
be better than silver or gold, and that every smile
was worth a ducat.
Sometimes in the cool of the evening, when
the toils of the laboratory happened to be
suspended
,
he would walk with the alchymist, in
what had once been a garden, belonging to the
mansion. There were still the remains of
terraces
and ballustrades; and here and there a
marble urn or mutilated statue overturned, and
buried among weeds and flowers run wild.
It was the favourite resort of the alchymist in
his hours of relaxation; where he would give full
scope to his visionary flights. His mind was
tinctured with the Rosycrucian doctrines. He
believed in elementary beings; some favourable,
others adverse to his pursuits; and in the
exaltation
of his fancy, had often imagined that he
held communion with them in his solitary walks
about the whispering groves and echoing walls
of this old garden. When accompanied by
Antonio
,
he would prolong these evening recreations.
Indeed, he sometimes did it out of consideration
for his disciple, for he feared his too close
application
,
and his incessant seclusion in the tower,
would be injurious to his health. He was
delighted
and surprised by this extraordinary zeal
and perseverance in so young a tyro, and looked
upon him as destined to be one of the great
luminaries
of the art. Lest the student should
repine at the time lost in these relaxations, the
good alchymist would fill them up with
wholesome
knowledge in matters connected with their
pursuit, and would walk up and down the alleys
with his disciple, imparting oral instruction, like
an ancient philosopher.
In all his visionary schemes there breathed a
spirit of lofty though chimerical
philanthropy
that won the admiration of the scholar
Nothing sordid, nothing sensual, nothing petty
or selfish seemed to enter into his views, in
respect
to the grand discoveries he was
anticipating
.
On the contrary, his imagination kindled
with conceptions of widely dispensated
happiness
.
He looked forward to the time when he
should be able to go about the earth relieving the
indigent, comforting the distressed, and, by his
unlimited means, devising and executing plans
for the complete extirpation of poverty, and all its
attendant sufferings and crimes. Never were
grander schemes for universal good, for the
distribution
of boundless wealth and universal
competence
devised, than by this poor indigent
alchymist
in his ruined tower.
Antonio would attend these peripatetic
lectures
with all the ardour of a devotee; but there
was another circumstance which may have given
a secret charm to them. The garden was the
resort also of Inez, where she took her walks of
recreation; the only exercise that her secluded
life permitted.
As Antonio was duteously pacing by the side
of his instructor, he would often catch a glimpse
of the daughter walking pensively about the
alleys
,
in the soft twilight. Sometimes they would
meet her unexpectedly; and the heart of the
student would throb with agitation. A blush
too would crimson the cheek of Inez; but still
she passed on, and never joined them.
He had remained one evening until rather a
late hour, with the alchymist in this favourite
resort. It was a delightful night, after a sultry
day; and the balmy air of the garden was
peculiarly
reviving. The old man was seated on a
fragment of a pedestal; looking like a part of
the ruin on which he sat. He was edifying his
pupil by reading long lessons of wisdom from
the stars, as they shone out with brilliant lustre
in the dark blue vault of a southern sky; and
by quoting by memory from Behmen and other
of the Rosycrucians, concerning the signature of
earthly things and passing events, which may be
discerned in the heavens; of the power of the
stars over corporeal beings, and their influence
in the fortunes of the sons of men.
By degrees the moon arose, and shed her
gleaming light among the chequered groves.
Antonio apparently listened with fixed attention
to the sage, but his ear was drinking in the
melody
of Inez' voice, who was singing to her lute
in one of the moonlight glades of the garden.
The old man having exhausted his theme, sat
gazing in silent reverie at the heavens. Antonio
could not resist an inclination to steal a look at
this coy beauty that was playing the part of the
nightingale, so sequestered and musical.
Leaving
the alchymist in his celestial reverie, he stole
gently along one of the alleys. The music had
ceased, and he thought he heard the sound of
voices. He came to an angle of a copse that
had screened a kind of green recess, ornamented
by a marble fountain. The moon shone full
upon the place, and by its light he beheld his
unknown
serenading rival at the feet of Inez. He
was detaining her by the hand, which he covered
with kisses; but at the sight of Antonio he
started
up, and half drew his sword, while Inez,
disengaged
,
fled back to the house.
All the jealous doubts and fears of Antonio
were now confirmed. He did not remain to
encounter
the resentment of his happy rival, at
being thus interrupted; but turned from the place
with sudden wretchedness of heart. That Inez
should love another would have been misery
enough; but that she should be capable of a
dishonourable amour, shocked him in the
extreme
.
The idea of deception in so young and
apparently artless a being, brought with it that
sudden distrust in human nature, so sickening to
a youthful and ingenuous mind; but when he
thought of the kind simple parent she was
deceiving
,
whose affections all centered in her, he
felt for a moment a sentiment of indignation.
and almost of aversion.
He found the alchymist still seated in
visionary
contemplation of the moon; come hither,
my son, said he, with his usual enthusiasm,
come read with me this vast volume of
wisdom
,
thus nightly unfolded before us. Wisely
did the Chaldean sages affirm that the heaven
is as a mystic page, uttering speech to those
who can rightly understand; warning them of
good and evil, and instructing them in the
secret decrees of fate.
The student's heart ached for his venerable
master, and for a time he felt the futility of all
his occult wisdom. Alas! poor old man,
thought he, little dost thou dream, while
busied
in airy speculations among the stars, what a
treason against thy happiness is going on under
thine eye; as it were in thy very bosom.Oh
Inez! Inez! where shall we look for truth and
innocence; where shall we repose in confidence
in woman, if even you can deceive?
It was a trite apostrophe, such as every lover
makes when he finds his mistress not quite
such a goddess as he had painted her. With
the student, however, it sprang from honest
anguish of heart. He returned to his lodgings
in pitiable confusion of mind. He now
deplored
the infatuation that had led him on until
his feelings were so thoroughly engaged. He
resolved to abandon his pursuits at the tower,
and trust to absence to dispel the fascination by
which he had been spell bound. He no longer
thirsted after the discovery of the grand elixir;
the dream of Alchymy was over; for without
Inez, what was the value of the philosopher's
stone?
He rose after a sleepless night, with the
determination
of taking his leave of the
alchymist
,
and tearing himself from Granada. For
several days did he rise with the same
resolution
,
and every night saw him come back
to his pillow, to repine at his want of
resolution
,
and to make fresh determinations for the
morrow. In the meanwhile he saw less of Inez
than ever. She no longer walked in the
garden
,
but remained almost entirely in her
apartment
.
When she met him she blushed more
VOL. I. 36
than usual; and once hesitated, as if she would
have spoken; but after a temporary
embarrassment
,
and still deeper blushes, she made some
casual observation, and retired. Antonio read
in this confusion a consciousness of fault, and
of that fault's being discovered. What could
she have wished to communicate? Perhaps to
account for the scene in the garden; but how
can she account for itor why should she
account
for it to me? What am I to her?or,
rather, what is she to me?exclaimed he
impatiently
,
with a new resolution to break through
these entanglements of the heart, and fly from
this enchanted spot for ever.
He was returning that very night to his
lodgings
,
full of these excellent determinations,
when, in a shadowy part of the road, he
passed a person whom he recognized, by his
height and form, for his rival. He was going
in the direction of the tower. If any lingering
doubts remained, here was an opportunity of
settling them completely. He determined to
follow this unknown cavalier, and, under
favour
of the darkness, observe his movements.
If he obtained access to the tower, or in any
way a favourable reception, Antonio felt as if it
would be a relief to his mind, and would
enable
him to fix his wavering resolution.
The unknown, as he came near the tower,
was more cautious and stealthy in his
approaches
.
He was joined under a clump of trees by
another person, and they had much whispering
together. A light was burning in the chamber
of Inez, the curtain was drawn, but the
casement
was left open, as the night was warm. After
some time the light was extinguished. A
considerable
interval elapsed. The cavalier and his
companion remained under covert of the trees,
as if keeping watch. At length they approached
the tower with silent and cautious steps. The
cavalier received a dark lanthorn from his
companion
,
and threw off his cloak. The other then
softly brought something from the clump of trees,
which Antonio perceived to be a light ladder.
He placed it against the wall, and the serenader
gently ascended. A sickening sensation came
over Antonio. Here was, indeed, a
confirmation
of every fear. He was about to leave the
place, never to return, when he heard a stifled
shriek from Inez' chamber.
In an instant the fellow that stood at the foot
of the ladder lay prostrate on the ground.
Antonio
wrested a stiletto from his nerveless hand,
and hurried up the ladder. He sprang in at the
window and found Inez struggling in the grasp
of his fancied rival. The latter, disturbed from
his prey, caught up his lanthorn, turned its light
full upon Antonio, and drawing his sword, made
a furious assault; luckily the student saw the
light gleam along the blade, and parried the
thrust with the stiletto. A fierce but unequal
combat ensued. Antonio fought exposed to the
full glare of the light, while his antagonist was
in shadow. His stiletto too was but a poor
defence
against a rapier; he saw that nothing
would save him but closing with his adversary
and getting within his weapon; he rushed
furiously
upon him, and gave him a severe blow with
the stiletto; but received a wound in return from
the shortened sword. At the same moment a
blow was inflicted from behind by the
confederate
,
who had ascended the ladder. It felled
him to the floor; and his antagonists made their
escape.
By this time the cries of Inez had brought
her father and the domestic to the room.
Antonio
was found weltering in his blood, and
senseless. He was conveyed to the chamber
of the alchymist, who now repaid, in kind,
the attentions which the student had once
bestowed
upon him. Among his varied knowledge
he possessed some skill in surgery, which at
this moment was of more value than even his
chymical lore. He stanched and dressed the
wounds of his disciple; which on examination
proved less desperate than he had at first
apprehended
.
For a few days, however, his case was
anxious
,
and attended with danger. The old man
watched over him with the affection of a
parent
.
He felt a double debt of gratitude
towards
him on account of his daughter and
himself
;
he loved him too as a faithful and zealous
disciple; and he dreaded lest the world should
be deprived of the promising talents of so
aspiring
an alchymist.
An excellent constitution soon medicined his
wounds; and there was a balsam in the looks
and words of Inez that had a healing effect on
still severer wounds, which he carried in his
heart. She displayed the strongest interest in
his safety; she called him her delivererher
preserver. It seemed as if her grateful
disposition
sought in the warmth of its
acknowledgments
to repay him for past coldness.
But what most contributed to Antonio's
recovery
,
was her explanation concerning his
supposed
rival. It was some time since he had
first beheld her at church; and he had ever since
persecuted her with his attentions.
He had beset her in her walks until she had
been obliged to confine herself to the house,
except
when accompanied by her father. He had
besieged her with letters, serenades, and every
art by which he could urge a vehement but
clandestine and dishonourable suit. The scene
in the garden was as much a surprise to her as
to Antonio. Her persecutor had been attracted
by her voice, and had found his way over a
ruined part of the wall. He had come upon her
unawares; was detaining her by force, and
pleading
his insulting passion, when the appearance
of the student interrupted him, and enabled her
to make her escape. She had forborne to
mention
to her father the persecution which she
suffered; she wished to spare him unavailing
anxiety and distress, and had determined to
confine
herself more rigorously to the house; though
it appeared that even here she had not been
safe from his daring enterprize.
Antonio inquired whether she knew the name
of this impetuous admirer. She replied that he
had made his advances under a fictitious name,
but that she had heard him once called by the
name of Don Ambrosio de Loxa.
Antonio knew him by report for one of the
most determined and dangerous libertines in all
Granada. Artful, accomplished, and if he chose
to be so, insinuating; but daring and headlong
in the pursuit of his pleasures; violent and
implacable
in his resentments. He rejoiced to find
that Inez had been proof against his seductions,
and had been inspired with loathing by his
splendid
profligacy; but he trembled to think of the
dangers she had run; and he felt solicitude about
the dangers that must yet environ her.
At present, however, it was probable the enemy
had a temporary quietus. The traces of blood
had been found for some distance from the
ladder
,
until they were lost among thickets; and as
nothing had been heard or seen of him since,
it was concluded that he had been seriously
wounded.
As the student recovered from his wounds, he
was enabled to join Inez and her father in their
domestic intercourse. The chamber in which
they usually met had probably been a saloon of
state in former times. The floor was of
marble
;
the walls partially covered with the remains
of tapestry; the chairs richly carved, and covered
with tarnished and tattered brocade. Against
the wall hung a long rusty rapier, the only
relique
that the old man retained of the chivalry of
his ancestors. There might have been something
to provoke a smile in the contrast between the
mansion and its inhabitants; between present
poverty and the traces of departed grandeur;
but the fancy of the student had thrown so
much romance about the edifice and its inmates,
that every thing was clothed with charms. The
philosopher, with his broken down pride, and his
strange pursuits, seemed to comport with the
melancholy ruin he inhabited; and there was a
native elegance of spirit about the daughter, that
showed she would have graced the mansion in
its happier days.
What delicious moments were these to the
student. Inez was no longer coy and reserved.
She was naturally artless and confiding: though
the kind of persecution she had experienced,
from one admirer, had rendered her for a time
suspicious and circumspect. She now felt an
entire confidence in the sincerity and worth of
Antonio, mingled with an overflowing gratitude.
When her eyes met his they beamed with sym
VOL. I. 37
pathy and kindness; and Antonio, no longer
haunted by the idea of a favoured rival, once
more aspired to success.
At these domestic meetings, however, he had
little opportunity of paying his court except by
looks: The alchymist, supposing him, like
himself
,
absorbed in the study of alchymy,
endeavoured
to cheer the tediousness of his recovery
by long conversations on the art. He even
brought several of his half burnt volumes, that
the student had once rescued from the flames,
and entertained him by the hour by reading
copious
chapters. The old man delighted in the
mystic phrases and symbolical jargon in which
the writers that have treated of alchymy have
wrapped their communications, rendering them
unintelligible except to the initiated. With
what rapture would he elevate his voice at a
triumphant passage announcing the grand
discovery
.
Thou shalt see, would he exclaim in
the words of Henry Kuhnrade,
*
*
Amphitheatre of the Eternal Wisdom.
the stone of the
philosophers (our king) go forth of the
bed-chamber
of his glassy sepulchre into the theatre of this
world; that is to say, regenerated and made
perfect
,
a shining carbuncle, a most temperate
splendour
,
whose most subtle and depurated parts
are inseparable, united into one with a
concordial
mixture, exceeding equal, transparent as
chrystal, shining red like a ruby, permanently
colouring or ringing, fixt in all temptations or
tryals; yea, in the examination of the burning
sulphur itself, and the devouring waters, and in
the most vehement persecution of the fire
always
incombustible and permanent, as a
salamander
!
The student had a high veneration for the
fathers of alchymy, and a profound respect for
his instructor; but what was Henry Kuhnrade,
Geber, Lully, or even Albertus Magnus
himself
,
compared to the countenance of Inez,
which presented such a page of beauty to his
perusal? While, therefore, the good alchymist
was doling out knowledge by the hour, his
disciple
would forget books, alchymy, every thing
but the lovely object before him.
Inez, too, unpractised in the science of the
heart, was gradually becoming fascinated by
the silent attentions of her lover. Day by day
she seemed more and more perplexed by the
kindling and strangely pleasing emotions of her
bosom. Her eye was often cast down in
thought. Blushes stole to her cheek without
any apparent cause; and light, half suppressed
sighs would follow these short fits of musing.
Her little ballads, though the same that she had
always sung, yet breathed a more tender spirit.
Either the tones of her voice were most soft and
touching; or some passages were delivered with
a feeling which she had never before given them.
Antonio, beside his love for the abstruse sciences,
had a pretty turn for music; and never did
philosopher
touch the guitar more tastefully. As
by degrees he conquered the mutual
embarrassment
that kept them asunder, he ventured to
accompany her in some of her songs. He had
a voice full of fire and tenderness; as he sang
one would have thought, from the kindling
blushes of his companion, that he had been
pleading his own passion in her ear. Let those
who would keep two youthful hearts asunder
beware of musicOh! this leaning over chairs,
and conning the same music book, and
entwining
of voices, and melting away in harmonies;
the German waltz is nothing to it. The worthy
alchymist saw nothing of all this. His mind
could admit of no idea that was not connected
with the discovery of the grand Arcanum; and
he supposed his youthful coadjutor equally
devoted
.
He was a mere child as to human
nature
;
and, as to the passion of love, whatever
he might once have felt of it, he had long since
forgotten that there was such an idle passion
in existence. But while he dreamed, the silent
amour went on. The very quiet and seclusion
of the place was favourable to the growth of
romatic passion. The opening bud of love
was able to put forth leaf by leaf, without an
adverse wind to check its growth. There was
neither officious friendship to chill by its advice,
nor insidious envy to wither by its sneers, nor
an observing world to look on and stare it out
of countenance. There was neither declaration,
nor vow, nor any other form of Cupid's canting
school. Their hearts mingled together, and
understood
each other without the aid of language.
They lapsed into the full current of affection,
unconscious of its depth, and thoughtless of the
rocks that might lurk beneath its surface.
Happy
lovers! who wanted nothing to make their
felicity complete, but the discovery of the
philosopher's
stone!
At length Antonio's health was sufficiently
restored
to enable him to return to his lodgings in
Granada. He felt uneasy, however, at leaving
the tower, while lurking danger might surround
its almost defenceless inmates. He dreaded lest
Don Ambrosio, recovered from his wounds,
might plot some new attempt, by secret art or
open violence. From all that he had heard, he
knew him to be too implacable to suffer his
defeat
to pass unrevenged, and too rash and
fearless
,
when his arts were unavailing, to stop at
any daring deed in the accomplishment of his
purposes. He urged his apprehensions to the
alchymist and his daughter, and proposed that
they should abandon the dangerous vicinity of
Granada.
I have relations, said he, in Valentia,
poor indeed, but worthy and affectionate. Among
them you will find friendship and quiet; and we
may there pursue our labours unmolested. He
went on to paint the beauties and delights of
Valentia
with all the eloquence with which a lover
paints the fields and groves which he is picturing
as the future scenes of his happiness. His
eloquence
,
backed by the apprehensions of Inez,
was successful with the alchymist; who, indeed,
had led too unsettled a life to be particular about
the place of his residence, and it was determined,
that as soon as Antonio's health was perfectly
restored, they should abandon the tower and
seek the neighbourhood of Valentia.
To recruit his strength the student suspended
his toils in the laboratory, and spent the few
remaining
days before departure, in taking a
farewell
look at the enchanting environs of Granada.
He felt returning health and vigour as he
inhaled
the pure temperate breezes that play
about its hills; and the happy state of his mind
contributed to his rapid recovery. Inez was often
the companion of his walks. Her descent by the
mother's side, from one of the ancient Moorish
families, gave her an interest in this once
favourite
seat of Arabian power. She gazed
with enthusiasm upon its magnificent
monuments
,
and her memory was filled with the
traditional
tales and ballads of Moorish chivalry.
Indeed, the solitary life she had led, and the
visionary turn of her father's mind had produced
an effect upon her character, and given it a tinge
of what in modern days would be called
romance
.
All this was called into full force by
this new passion; for when a woman first
begins
to love, life is all romance to her.
In one of their evening strolls they had
ascended
to the mountain of the sun, where is
situated the Generaliffe, the palace of pleasure
in the days of Moorish dominion, but now,
a gloomy convent of Capuchins. They had
wandered about its garden, among groves of
orange, citron, and cypresses; where the
waters
,
leaping in torrents, or gushing in
fountains
,
or tossed aloft in sparkling jets, fill the
air with music and freshness. Still there is a
melancholy mingled with all the beauties of this
garden, that gradually stole over the feelings
of the lovers. The place is full of the sad
story of past times. It was the favourite abode
of the lovely Queen of Granada, where she
was surrounded by the delights of a gay and
voluptuous court. It was here, too, amidst her
own bowers of roses, that her slanderers laid
the base story of her dishonour, and struck a
fatal blow to the line of the gallant
Abencerrages
.
The whole garden has a look of ruin and
neglect
.
Many of the fountains are dry and
broken; the streams have wandered from their
marble channels, and are choked by weeds and
yellow leaves; the reed whistles to the wind
where it had once sported among roses and
shaken perfume from the orange blossom; the
convent bell flings its sullen sound; or the
drow-She
VOL. I. 38
sy vesper hymn floats along these solitudes,
which once resounded with the song and the
dance and the lover's serenade. Well may
the Moors lament over the loss of this earthly
paradise ; well may they remember it in their
prayers, and beseech heaven to restore it to the
faithful ; well may their ambassadors smite their
breasts when they wander among these
monuments
of their race, and sit down and weep
among the fading glories of Granada!
It is impossible to wander among these scenes
of departed love and gayety and not feel the
tenderness of the heart awakened. It was then
that Antonio first ventured to breathe his
passion
,
and to express by words what his eyes had
long since so eloquently revealed. He made
his avowal with fervour, but with frankness.
He had no gay prospects to hold out; he was a
poor scholar, dependent on his "good spirits to
feed and clothe him." But a woman in love is
no interested calculator. Inez listened to him
with downcast eyes, but in them was a
humid
gleam, that showed her heart was with him.
had no prudery in her nature; and she had
not been sufficiently in society to acquire it.
She loved him with all the absence of
worldliness
of a genuine woman; and amidst timid
smiles and blushes he drew from her a modest
acknowledgment of her affection. They
wandered
about the garden with sweet intoxication
of the soul, which none but happy lovers know.
The world about them was all fairy land, and
indeed it spread forth one of its fairest scenes
before their eyes, as if to fulfil their dream of
earthly happiness. They looked out from
between
groves of orange upon the towers of
Granada
below them; the magnificent plain of the
Vega beyond, streaked with evening sunshine,
and the distant hills tinted with rosy and purple
hues; it seemed an emblem of the happy future
that love and hope was decking out for them.
As if to make the scene complete, a group of
Andalusians struck up a dance in one of the
vistas of the garden, to the notes of the guitars
of two wandering musicians. The Spanish
music is wild and plaintive, yet the people dance
to it with enthusiasm. The picturesque figures
of the dancers; the girls with their hair in silken
nets, that hung in knots and tassels down their
backs; their mantillas floating round their airy
figures; their slender feet and ankles peeping
from under their basquines; their arms thrown
up in the air to play the castanets; had a
beautiful
effect on this airy height, with the rich
evening landscape spreading out below them.
In a little while the dance ceased; two of the
parties approached Antonio and Inez, and began
a soft and tender Moorish ballad, accompanied
by the lute. It alluded to the story of the
garden
;
the wrongs of the fair Queen of Granada,
and the misfortunes of the Abencerrages. It
was one of those old ballads that abound in
Andalusia, and seem to live like echoes about
the ruins of Moorish greatness. The tears rose
into the eyes of Inez as she listened to the tale;
her heart was open to every tender impression.
The singer approached her, and suddenly
varying her manner, sang of impending danger
and treachery; the manner, the look, the
gesticulation
of the singer was such as to make it
pointed and startling. She was about to ask
the meaning of this evidently personal
application
of the song, when she was interrupted by
Antonio, who gently drew her from the place.
While she had been lost in attention to the
music
,
he had remarked a group of men in the
shadow of the trees, whispering together. They
were enveloped in the broad hats and great
cloaks so much worn by the Spanish, and while
they were regarding himself and Inez
attentively
,
seemed anxious to avoid observation.
Not knowing what might be their character or
intention, he hastened to quit a place where the
gathering shadows of evening might expose
them to intrusion and insult. On their way
down the hill, as they passed through the woods
of elms, mingled with poplars and oleanders,
that skirt the road leading from the Alhambra,
he again saw these men, apparently following
at a distance; and he afterwards caught sight of
them among the trees on the banks of the
Darro
.
He said nothing on the subject to Inez nor
her father; for he would not awaken
unnecessary
alarm; but he felt at a loss how to
ascertain
or to avert any machinations that might
be devising againt the helpless inhabitants of the
tower.
He took his leave of them at night, full of this
perplexity. As he left the dreary old pile, he
saw some one lurking in the shadow of the wall,
apparently watching his movements. He
hastened
after the figure, but it glided away, and
disappeared among some ruins. Shortly after he
heard a low whistle, which was answered from a
little distance. He had no longer a doubt but
that some mischief was on foot, and turned to
hasten back to the tower and put its inmates on
their guard. He had scarcely turned, however,
before he found himself suddenly seized from
behind by some one of Herculean strength. His
struggles were in vain; he was surrounded by
armed men. One threw a mantle over him, that
stifled his cries and enveloped him in its folds,
and he was hurried off with irresistible rapidity.
The next day passed without the appearance
of Antonio at the alchymist's. Another, and
another day succeeded, and yet he did not come,
nor had any thing been heard of him at his
lodgings
.
His absence caused, at first, surprise and
conjecture, and at length alarm. Inez
recollected
the singular intimations of the ballad
singer upon the mountain, which seemed to warn
her of impending danger, and her mind was full
of vague forebodings. She sat listening to every
sound at the gate, or tread on the stairs. She
would take up her guitar and strike a few notes,
but it would not do, her heart was sickening with
suspense and anxiety. She had never before
felt what it was to be really lonely. She now
was conscious of the force of that attachment
which had taken possession of her breast; for
never do we know how much we love; never do
we know how necessary the object of our love
is to our happiness, until we experience the
weary void of separation.
The philosopher, too, felt the absence of his
disciple, almost as sensibly as did his daughter.
The animating buoyancy of the youth had
inspired
him with new ardour; and had given to
his labours the charm of full companionship.
However, he had resources and consolations of
which his daughter was destitute. His pursuits
were of a nature to occupy every thought, and
keep the spirits in a state of continual excitement.
Certain indications, too, had lately manifested
themselves, of the most favourable nature.
Forty days and forty nights had the process gone
on successfully; the old man's hopes were
constantly
rising, and he now considered the
glorious
moment once more at hand, when he should
obtain not merely the Major Lunaria, but
likewise
the Tinctura Solaris, the means of
multiplying
gold, and of prolonging existence. He
remained, therefore, continually shut up in his
laboratory, watching his furnace; for a moment's
inadvertency might once more defeat all his
expectations
.
He was sitting one evening at one of his
solitary
vigils, wrapped up in meditation; the hour
was late, and his neighbour, the owl, was
hooting
from the battlements of the tower, when he
heard the door open behind him. Supposing
it to be his daughter coming to take her leave of
him for the night, as was her frequent practice,
he called her by name, but a harsh voice met his
ear in reply; he was grasped by the arms, and
looking up, perceived three strange men in the
chamber. He attemped to shake them off, but
in vain. He called for help, but they scoffed
at his cries.
Peace, dotard! cried one, think'st thou
the servants of the most holy inquisition are to
be daunted by thy clamours! comrades, away
with him!
Without heeding his remonstrances and
entreaties
,
they seized upon his books and papers,
took some note of the apartment and the
utensils
,
and then bore him off a prisoner.
Inez, left to herself, had passed a sad and
lonely evening; by a casement which looked into
a garden, she had pensively watched star after
star sparkle out of the blue depths of the sky,
and was indulging a crowd of anxious thoughts
about her lover, until the rising tears began to
VOL. I. 39
flow. She was suddenly alarmed by the sound
of voices that seemed to come from a distant
part of the mansion. There was, not long after,
a noise of several persons descending the stairs;
surprised at these unusual sounds in their lonely
habitation, she remained for a few moments in a
state of trembling, yet indistinct apprehension;
when the servant rushed into the room with
terror
in her countenance, and informed her that
her father was carried off by armed men. Inez
did not stop to hear farther, but flew down stairs
to overtake them. She had scarcely passed the
threshold when she found herself in the grasp of
strangers.
Away! away! cried she wildly; do not
stop me; let me follow my father.
We are come to conduct you to him,
Senora
,
said one of the men, respectfully.
Where is he then?
He is gone to Granada, replied the man,
an unexpected circumstance requires his
presence
there immediately; but he is among
friends.
We have no friends in Granada, said Inez,
drawing back; but then the idea of Antonio
rushed to her mind; something relating to him
might have called her father thither. Is Senor
Antonio de Castros with him? demanded she
with agitation.
I know not, Senora, replied the man, it is
very possible. I only know that he is among
friends, and is anxious for you to follow him.
Let us go then, cried she eagerly; the men
led her a little distance to where a mule was
waiting; and assisting her to mount, they
conducted
her slowly towards the city.
Granada was on that evening a scene of
fanciful
revel. It was one of the festivals of the
Maestranzaan association of the nobility to
keep up some of the gallant customs of ancient
chivalry. There had been a representation of
a tournament in one of the squares; the streets
would still occasionally resound with the beat
of a solitary drum, or the bray of a trumpet,
from some straggling party of revellers.
Sometimes
they were met by cavaliers richly dressed
in ancient costumes, attended by their squires,
and at one time they passed in sight of a
palace brilliantly illuminated, from whence
came the mingled sounds of music and the
dance. Shortly after they came to the square,
where the mock tournament had been held. It
was thronged by the populace, recreating
themselves
among booths and stalls where
refreshments
were sold; and the glare of torches
showed the temporary galleries, and gay
coloured
awnings and armorial trophies, and other
paraphernalia of the show. The conductors of
Inez endeavoured to keep out of observation, and
to traverse a gloomy part of the square; but they
were detained at one place by the pressure of a
crowd surrounding a party of wandering
musicians
,
singing one of those ballads of which the
Spanish populace are so passionately fond. The
torches which were held by some of the crowd
threw a strong mass of light upon Inez, and the
sight of so beautiful a being, without mantilla
or veil, looking so bewildered, and conducted
by men who seemed to take no gratification in
the surrounding gayety, occasioned expressions
of curiosity. One of the ballad singers
approached
,
and striking her guitar with peculiar
earnestness, began to sing a doleful air, full of
sinister forebodings. Inez started with surprise.
It was the same ballad singer that had addressed
her in the gardens of Generaliffe. She was
young and beautiful, with an air of wildness and
melancholy.
It was the same air that she had then sung.
It spoke of impending dangers. They seemed
indeed to be thickening around her. She was
anxious to speak with this girl, and to ascertain
whether indeed she had a knowledge of any
definite
evil that was threatening her; but as she
attempted to address her, the mule on which she
rode was suddenly seized and led forcibly through
the throng by one of her conductors, while she
saw another addressing menacing words to the
ballad singer. The latter raised her hand with
a warning gesture as Inez lost sight of her.
While Inez was yet lost in perplexity, caused
by this singular occurrence, they stopped at the
gate of a large mansion. One of her attendants
knocked, the door was opened, and they entered
a paved court. Where are we? demanded
Inez with anxiety. At the house of a friend,
Senora, replied the man. Ascend this
staircase
with me, and in a moment you will meet
your father. They ascended the staircase that
led to a suite of splendid apartments. They
passed through several until they came to an
inner chamber. The door opened; some one
approached; but what was her terror at
perceiving
,
not her father, but Don Ambrosio. The
men who had seized upon the alchymist had at
least been more honest in their professions. They
were, indeed, familiars of the inquisition. He
was conducted in silence to the gloomy prison of
that terrible tribunal. It was a mansion whose
every aspect withered joy, and almost shut out
hope. It was one of those hideous abodes which
the bad passions of men conjure up in this fair
world to rival the fancied dens of demons and
the accursed.
Day after day went heavily by without any
thing to mark the lapse of time but the decline
and reappearance of the light that feebly
glimmered
through the narrow window of the
dungeon
in which the unfortunate alchymist was
buried, rather than confined. His mind was
harassed
with uncertainties and fears about his
daughter, so helpless and inexperienced. He
endeavoured to gather tidings of her from the
man who brought his daily portion of food. The
fellow stared, as if astonished at being asked a
question in that mansion of silence and mystery;
but departed without saying a word. Every
succeeding attempt was equally fruitless.
The poor alchymist was oppressed by many
griefs, and it was not the least that he had been
again interrupted in his labours on the very point
of success. Never was alchymist so near
attaining
the golden secret; a little longer, and all his
hopes would have been realized. The thoughts
of these disappointments afflicted him more even
than the fear of all that he might suffer from the
merciless inquisition. His waking thoughts
would follow him into his dreams. He would be
transported in fancy to his laboratory, busied
again among retorts and alembics, and surrounded
by Lully, by D'Abano, by Olibius, and the other
masters of the sublime art. The moment of
projection would arrive; a seraphic form would
arise out of the furnace, holding forth a vessel
containing the precious elixir; but before he
could grasp the prize, he would awake, and find
himself in a dungeon.
All the devices of inquisitorial ingenuity were
employed to ensnare the old man, and to draw
from him evidence that might be brought against
himself, and might corroborate certain secret
information
that had been given against him. He
had been accused of practising necromancy, and
judicial astrology, and a cloud of evidence had
been secretly brought forward to substantiate
the charge. It would be tedious to enumerate
all the circumstances, apparently corroborative,
which had been industriously cited by the secret
accuser. The silence which prevailed about the
tower; its desolateness; the very quiet of its
inhabitants
had been adduced as proofs that
something
sinister was perpetrated within.
The alchymist's conversations and soliloquies
in the garden had been overheard and
misrepresented
.
The lights and strange appearances at
night in the tower were given with violent
exaggerations
.
Shrieks and yells were said to have
been heard from thence at midnight, when, it
was confidently asserted, the old man raised
familiar spirits by his incantations; and even
compelled the dead to rise from their graves and
answer to his questionings.
The alchymist, according to the custom of the
inquisition, was kept in complete ignorance of
his accuser; of the witnesses produced against
him; even of the crimes of which he was accused.
He was examined generally; whether he knew
why he was arrested; and was conscious of any
guilt that might deserve the notice of the holy
office? He was examimed as to his country;
his life; his habits; his pursuits; his actions and
opinions.
The old man was frank and simple in his
replies
;
he was conscious of no guilt; capable of no
art, practised in no dissimulation. After receiving
VOL. I. 40
a general admonition to bethink himself whether
he had not committed any act deserving of
punishment
,
and to prepare by confession to secure the
well-known mercy of the tribunal, he was
remanded
to his cell.
He was now visited in his dungeon by crafty
familiars of the inquisition, who under pretence
of sympathy and kindness came to beguile the
tediousness of his imprisonment with friendly
conversation. They casually introduced the
subject of alchymy, on which they touched with
great caution and pretended indifference. There
was no need of such craftiness. The honest
enthusiast
had no suspicion in his nature; the
moment
they touched upon his favourite theme, he
forgot his misfortunes and imprisonment, and
broke forth into rhapsodies about the divine
science.
The conversation was artfully turned to the
discussion of elementary beings. The
alchymist
readily avowed his belief in them, and
that there had been instances of their attending
upon philosophers, and administering to their
wishes. He related many miracles said to
have been performed by Apollonius Thianeus
through the aid of spirits or demons; insomuch
that he was set up by the heathens in opposition
to the Messiah; and was even regarded with
reverence by many Christians. The familiars
eagerly demanded whether he believed
Apollonius
to be a true and worthy philosopher. The
unaffected piety of the alchymist protected him
even in the midst of his simplicity, for he
condemned
Apollonius as a sorcerer and an
impostor
.
No art could ever draw from him an
admission
that he had ever employed or invoked
spiritual agencies in the prosecution of his
pursuits
;
though he believed himself to have been
frequently impeded by them.
The inquisitors were baffled and disappointed
in not being able to inveigle him into a
confession
of a criminal nature; they attributed it to
craft; to obstinacy; to every cause but the right
one, namely, that the harmless visionary had
nothing guilty to confess.
They had abundant proof of a secret nature
against him; but it was the practice of the
inquisition
to endeavour to procure confession
from the prisoners.
An auto-da-f was at hand; the worthy fathers
were eager for his conviction, for they were
always
anxious to have a good number of
culprits
condemned to the stake, to grace their
solemn triumphs. He was at length brought
to a final examination.
The chamber of trial was spacious and
gloomy. At one end was a huge crucifix, the
standard of the inquisition. A long table
extended
through the centre of the room, at which
sat the inquisitors and their secretary; at the
other end a stool was placed for the prisoner.
He was brought in, according to custom, bare
headed and bare legged. He was enfeebled by
confinement and affliction, by constantly
brooding
over the unknown fate of his child, and the
disastrous interruption of his experiments. He
sat bowed down and listless; his head sunk
upon his breast: his whole appearance that of
one past hope, abandoned, and by himself
given over.
The accusation alleged against him was now
brought forward in a specific form; he was
called upon by name, Felix de Vasquez,
formerly
of Castile, to answer to the charges of
necromancy and demonology; he was told that
the charges were amply substantiated, and
was asked whether he was ready, by ample
confession
,
to throw himself upon the well-known
mercy of the holy inquisition.
The philosopher testified some slight surprise
at the accusation, but simply replied, I am
innocent.
What proof have you to give of your
innocence
?
It rather remains for you to prove
your charges, cried the old man; I am a
stranger and a sojourner in the land, and know
no one out of the doors of my dwelling. I can
give nothing in my vindication but the word of
a nobleman and a Castilian.
The inquisitor shook his head, and went on
to repeat the various inquiries that had before
been made as to his mode of life and pursuit.
The poor alchymist was too feeble and weary
at heart to make any but brief replies. He
requested
that some man of science might
examine
his laboratory and all his books and papers;
by which it would be made abundantly evident
that he was merely engaged in the study of
alchymy
.
To this the inquisitor observed that alchymy
had become a mere covert for secret and deadly
sins. That the practisers of it were known to
scruple at no means to satisfy their inordinate
greediness of gold. Some had been known to
use spells and impious ceremonies; to conjure
the aid of evil spirits; nay even to sell their souls
to the enemy of mankind, so that they might
riot in boundless wealth while living.
The poor alchymist had heard all patiently, or
at least passively. He had disdained to
vindicate
his name otherwise than by his word; he
had smiled at the accusations of sorcery, when
applied merely to himself; but, when the sublime
art which had been the study and passion of his
life was assailed, he could no longer listen in
silence. His head gradually rose from his bosom.
A hectic colour came in faint streaks to his
cheeks; played about there; disappeared;
returned
;
and at length kindled into a burning glow.
The clammy dampness dried from his forehead;
his eyes, which had been nearly extinguished,
lighted up again, and burned with their wonted
and visionary fires.
He entered into a vindication of his favourite
art. His voice at first was feeble and broken,
but it gathered strength as he proceeded until
it rolled in a deep and sonorous volume. He
gradually rose from his seat as he rose with his
subject; he threw back the scanty black mantle
which had hitherto wrapped his limbs; the very
uncouthness of his form and looks gave an
impressive
effect to what he uttered; it was as
though a corpse had become suddenly animated.
He repelled with scorn the aspersions cast upon
alchymy by the ignorant and vulgar. He
assumed
it to be the mother of all art and science,
citing
the opinions of Paracelsus, Sandivogius,
Raymond Lully, and others, in support of his
assertions. He maintained that it was pure, and
innocent, and honourable, both in its purposes
and means. What were its objects? The
perpetuation
of life and youth, and the production of
gold. The Elixir Vit, said he is no
charmed potion, but merely a concentration of
those elements of vitality which nature has
scattered
through her works. The philosopher's
stone, or tincture, or powder, as it is variously
called, is no necromantic talisman, but consists
simply of those particles which gold contains
within itself, for its reproduction; for gold, like
other things, has its seed within itself, though
bound up with inconceivable firmness, from the
vigour of innate fixed salts and sulphurs.
In seeking to discover the elixir of life, then,
continued he, we seek only to apply some of
nature's own specifics against the disease and
decay to which our bodies are subjected; and
what else does the physician, when he tasks his
art and uses subtle compounds and cunning
distillations
to revive our languishing powers, and
avert the stroke of death for a season?
In seeking to multiply the precious metals,
also, we seek but to germinate and multiply, by
natural means, a particular species of nature's
productions; and what else does the
husbandman
,
who consults times and seasons, and, by
what might be deemed a natural magic, from the
mere scattering of his hand, covers a whole
plain with golden vegetation? The mysteries of
our art, it is true, are deeply and darkly hidden;
but it requires so much the more innocence and
purity of thought to penetrate unto them. No,
father, the true alchymist must be pure in mind
and body; he must be temperate, patient, chaste,
watchful, meek, humble, devout. `My son,'
says Hermes Trismegestes, the great master of
our art, `My son, I recommend you above all
things to fear God.' And, indeed, it is only by
devout castigation of the senses, and purification
of the soul, that he is enabled to enter into the
sacred chambers of truth. `Labour, pray, and
read,' is the motto of our science. As De
Nuysment well observes, `these high and
singular
favours are granted unto none save only
unto the sons of God, (that is to say, the
virtuous
and devout,) who, under his paternal
benediction
,
VOL. I. 41
have obtained the opening of the same,
by the helping hand of the queen of arts,
profound
philosophy.' Indeed, so sacred has the
nature of this knowledge been considered, that
we are told it has four times been expressly
communicated
by God to man; having made a part
of that cabalistical wisdom, which was revealed
to Adam to console him for the loss of paradise,
and to Moses in the bush, and to Solomon in a
dream, and to Esdras by the angel.
So far from demons and malignant spirits
being the friends and abettors of the alchymist,
they are the continual foes with which he has to
contend. It is their constant endeavour to shut
up the avenues to those truths, which would
enable him to rise above the abject state into
which he has fallen, and to return to that
excellence
which was his original birth-right. For
what would be the effect of this length of days,
and this abundant wealth, but to enable the
possessor
to go on from art to art, from science to
science, with energies unimpaired by sickness,
uninterrupted by death. For this have
philosophers
shut themselves up in cells and solitudes;
buried themselves in caves and dens of the earth;
turning from the joys of life and the pleasance of
the world; enduring scorn, poverty, persecution.
For this was Raymond Lully stoned to death
in Mauritania; for this did the immortal Pietro
D'Abano suffer persecution at Padua; and when
he escaped from his oppressors by death, was
pitifully burnt in effigy. For this have
illustrious
men of all nations intrepidly suffered
martyrdom
.
For this, if unmolested, have they
assiduously
employed the latest hour of their life,
the last throb of existence. Hoping, that even
with the last gasp of expiring life, they might
seize upon the prize for which they
struggled
,
and pluck themselves back even from the
jaws of the grave. For, when once the
alchymist
shall have attained the object of his toils;
when the sublime secret shall be revealed to his
gaze, what a glorious reverse will there be in
his condition. How will he emerge from his
solitary retreat, like the sun breaking forth from
the darksome chamber of the night, and darting
his beams throughout the earth. Gifted with
perpetual youth and boundless riches, to what
heights of wisdom may he attain. How may
he carry on, uninterrupted, the thread of
knowledge
which has hitherto been snapped at the
death of each philosopher. And as the increase
of wisdom is the increase of virtue, how will
he become the benefactor of his fellow men;
dispensing with liberal, but cautious and
discriminating
hand, that inexhaustible wealth which
is at his disposal. Banishing poverty, which is
the cause of so much sorrow and wickedness;
encouraging the arts; promoting discoveries,
and enlarging the means of enjoyment. His
life will be the connecting band of generations.
History will live in his recollection; distant ages
will speak with his tongue. The nations of the
earth will look to him as their preceptor, and
kings will sit at his feet and learn wisdom. Oh
glorious! Oh celestial alchymy!
Here he was interrupted by the inquisitor,
who had suffered him to go on thus far, in hopes of
gathering something from his unguarded
enthusiasm
.
Senor, said he, this is all rambling,
visionary talk. You are charged with sorcery,
and in defence you give us a rhapsody about
alchymy
.
Have you nothing better than this to
offer in your defence?
The old man slowly resumed his seat, but did
not deign a reply. The fire that had beamed
in his eye gradually expired. His cheek
resumed
its wonted paleness; but he did not relapse
into inanity. He sat with a serene, steady,
patient
look, like one prepared not to contend, but
to suffer.
His trial continued for a long time, with cruel
mockery of justice, for no witnesses were ever in
this court confronted with the accused, and the
latter had continually to defend himself in the
dark. Some unknown and powerful enemy
had alleged charges against the unfortunate
alchymist
,
but who he could not imagine.
Stranger
and sojourner as he was in the land, solitary
and harmless in his pursuits, how could he have
provoked such hostility! The tide of secret
testimony
,
however, was too strong against him; he
was convicted of the crime of magic, and
condemned
to expiate his sins at the stake, at the
approaching auto-da f.
While the alchymist was undergoing his trial
at the inquisition, his unhappy daughter was
exposed to trials no less severe. Don Ambrosio,
into whose hands she had fallen, was, as has
before been intimated, one of the most daring and
lawless profligates in all Granada. He was a
man of hot blood and headlong passions, that
stopped at nothing in pursuit of his desires; yet
with all these he possessed manners, address, and
accomplishments, that had made him eminently
successful with the sex. He was sated, however,
with easy conquests, and wearied with a life of
continual and prompt gratification. There had
been a degree of difficulty and enterprize in the
pursuit of Inez that he had never before
experienced
.
It had aroused him from the
monotony
of mere sensual life, and stimulated him
with all the charm of adventure. Now that he
had her in his power he was determined to
protract
the pleasure of pursuit. He was vain of
his person and address, and it was a kind of trial
of skill to endeavour to gain by art and ingenuity
what he could at any time obtain by violence.
He affected to treat her with respect and
kindness. He endeavoured to soothe her alarms
concerning her father by assurances of his
safety
,
and that she should soon be restored to him.
Every means was lavished to calm and soften
her; and, if possible, to dispose her mind to
favourable
impressions. The house resounded
with soft music; the apartments breathed
perfumes
;
all about her enticed to pleasure and
voluptuousness
;
but the heart of Inez turned with
distaste from the cruel mockery; and if ever
Don Ambrosio, deceived by the mute dejection
into which she would sometimes sink, would
attempt
to plead his passion, she recoiled from
him with loathing and detestation.
The vanity of Don Ambrosio was at length
incensed at this inflexible scorn from one whom
he considered so far beneath him; and who
ought to have felt honoured by his admiration.
Still he was determined that his triumph should
be by artifice, and that she should be in a
manner
accessary to her own dishonour. Since all
his arts of seduction were of no avail, he
endeavoured
to conquer her through her fears.
He now informed her of her father's
confinement
in the prison of the inquisition; that his
case was desperate; that it depended upon the
evidence of Don Ambrosio, and others who were
at his beck, either to save or destroy him; but
I am wrong, added he, it is with you,
beautiful
Inez, to say the word of life or death.
One kind word, and you will behold me at your
feet; your father at liberty and in affluence, and
we shall all be happy.
Inez listened to him with scorn and disbelief;
she looked upon it as another of his deceptions.
My father, exclaimed she, is too inoffensive
to attract persecution; he is too innocent and
good to be suspected of crime; 'tis a base, a
cruel artifice! Don Ambrosio repeated what he
had said, with solemn protestations of its truth,
but she turned from him with indignation; and
he felt awed and surprised at the pride and
loftiness of her demeanour. He had now gone
too far to retrace his steps and resume the
affectation
of kindness. A few days after he brought
her the proclamation of the approaching
auto-da-f
,
in which the prisoners were enumerated.
She glanced her eye over it, and saw her
father's
name, condemned to the stake for sorcery.
For a moment her brain reeled; she stood
transfixed
with horror. The artful Ambrosio seized
upon the transient calm. Think now,
beautiful
Inez, said he, with a tone of affected
tenderness
;
his life is yet in your hands; one word
from you, and I can save him.
Monster! wretch! murderer! exclaimed
she, recoiling with shuddering abhorrence.
Then clasping her hands with frantic violence,
Oh my father! my father! cried she, in a
tone of frantic agony.
The perfidious Ambrosio saw the torture of
her soul, and anticipated from it a triumph. He
saw she was in no mood, during her present
paroxysm
,
to listen to his words; but he trusted
that a night of agony would subdue her
stubborn
resolution.
VOL. I. 42
To-morrow, said he, as he left the room,
is to be the auto-da-f. One night more have
you to reflect. To-morrow you will hear the
very tumult of the procession that carries your
father to his death; you will almost hear the
groans from his funeral pile. I leave you to
yourself; think whether you can stand all this
without shrinking. Think whether you can
endure the reflection that you were the cause of
his death, and that merely from a perversity in
refusing proffered happiness.
What a night was it to Inez! Her heart
already harassed, and almost broken by repeated
and protracted anxieties and terrors; her form
wasted, and nearly exhausted. On every side
horrors surrounded her; there seemed to be no
escape from misery and perdition. Is there no
relief from man! no pity in heaven! exclaimed
she. Whatwhat have we done that we should
be thus wretched? All night long she paced
her chamber, her mind in a whirl of anguish and
dismay. As the dawn approached, she heard
the distant tread of footsteps in the street, and the
confused murmur of voices. She fancied it the
early stir of the populace, always eager in Spain
for this horrid ceremony. At sunrise the great
bell of the cathedral began to toll its awful notes
of funeral preparation. Every stroke seemed to
beat upon her heart, and inflict an absolute
corporeal
pang. Her blood grew hot in her veins;
her tongue was parched; she panted and gasped
rather than breathed. Blessed virgin!
exclaimed
she, clasping her hands, and turning up
her strained eyes, look down with pity, and
support me in this hour of agony!
All Granada was in agitation on the morning
of this dismal day. The heavy bell of the
cathedral
continued to utter its clanging tones, that
pervaded every part of the city, summoning all
persons to the tremendous spectacle that was
about to be exhibited. The streets through
which the procession was to pass were crowded
with the populace. The windows, the roofs,
every place that would admit a face or a
foot-hold
,
was alive with spectators. In the great
square a spacious scaffolding, like an
amphitheatre
,
was erected, where the sentences of the
prisoners
were to be read, and the sermon of faith
to be preached; and close by were the stakes
prepared, where the condemned were to be
burnt to death. Seats were arranged for the
great, the gay, the beautiful; for such is the
horrible curiosity of human nature, that this
cruel sacrifice was attended with more eagerness
than a theatre, or even a ball feast.
As the day advanced, the scaffolds and
balconies
were filled with expecting multitudes; the
sun shone brightly upon fair faces and gallant
dresses; one would have thought it some scene
of elegant festivity, instead of an exhibition of
human agony and death. But what a different
spectacle and ceremony was this, from those
which Granada exhibited in the days of her
Moorish splendour. Her galas, her
tournaments
,
her sports of the ring, her ftes of St.
John, her music, her Zambras, and admirable
tilts with canes! Her serenades, her concerts,
her songs in Generaliffe! The costly liveries
of the Abencerrages; their exquisite inventions;
the skill and valour of the Alabeces; the superb
dresses of the Zegries, Mazas, and Gomelez!
*
*
Rodd's Civil Wars of Granada.
All these were at an end. The days of chivalry
were over. Instead of the prancing cavalcade,
with neighing steed and lively trumpet; with
burnished lance, and helm, and buckler; with
rich confusion of plume, and scarf, and banner,
where purple, and scarlet, and green, and orange,
and every gay colour were mingled with cloth
of gold and fair embroidery; instead of this
crept on the gloomy pageant of superstition, in
cowl and sackcloth, with cross and coffin, and
frightful symbols of human suffering. In place
of the frank, hardy knight, open and brave, with
his lady's favour in his casque, and amorous
motto on his shield, looking by gallant deeds to
the smile of beauty, came the shaven, unmanly
monk, with down-cast eyes, and head and heart
bleached in the cold cloister, secretly exulting
in this bigot triumph.
The sound of the bells gave notice that the
dismal procession was advancing. It passed
slowly through the principal streets of the city,
bearing in advance the awful banner of the holy
office. The prisoners walked singly, attended
by confessors, and guarded by familiars of the
inquisition. They were clad in different
garments
,
according to the nature of their
punishments
;
those who were to suffer death wore
the hideous samarra, painted with flames and
demons. The procession was swelled by choirs
of boys, by different religious orders and
public
dignitaries, and above all, by the fathers of
the faith, moving with slow pace and
profound
gravity, truly triumphing, as becomes the
principal generals of that great victory.
*
*
Gonsalvius, p. 135.
As the much dreaded banner of the
inquisition
advanced, the countless throng sunk on
their knees before it; they bowed their faces to
the very earth as it passed, and then slowly rose
again, like a great undulating billow. A
murmur
of tongues prevailed as the prisoners
approached
;
and eager eyes were strained, and
fingers pointed, to distinguish the different
orders
of penitents whose habits denoted the
degree
of punishment they were to undergo. But
as those drew near whose frightful garb marked
them as destined to the flames, the noise of the
rabble subsided; they seemed almost to hold in
their breaths; filled with that strange and
dismal
interest with which we contemplate a
human
being on the verge of suffering and death.
It is an awful thing, a voiceless, noiseless,
multitude. The hushed and gazing stillness of
the surrounding thousands, heaped on walls,
and gates, and roofs, and hanging as it were in
clusters, heightened the effect of the pageant that
moved drearily on. The low murmuring of the
priests could now be heard in prayer and
exhortation
,
with the faint responses of the prisoners,
and now and then the voices of the choir at a
distance chanting the litanies of the saints.
The faces of the prisoners were ghastly and
disconsolate. Even those who had been
pardoned
,
and wore the sanbenito or penitential
garment
,
bare traces of the horrors they had
under-gone
.
Some were feeble and tottering from long
confinement; some crippled and distorted by
various
tortures; every countenance was a dismal
page on which might be read the secrets of their
prison house. But in the looks of those
condemned
to death, there was something fierce and
eager. They seemed men harrowed up by
the past, and desperate as to the future. They
were anticipating, with spirits fevered by
despair
and fixed and clenched determination, the
vehement struggle with agony and death which
they were shortly to undergo. Some cast now
and then a wild and anguished look about them,
upon the shining day; the sunbright palaces;
the gay, the beautiful world which they were
soon to quit for ever; or a glance of sudden
indignation
at the thronging thousands, happy in
liberty and life, who seemed, in contemplating
their frightful situation, to exult in their own
comparative security.
One among the condemned, however, was
an exception to these remarks. He was an
aged man somewhat bowed down, with a serene
though dejected countenance, and a beaming
melancholy eye. It was the alchymist. The
populace looked upon him with a degree of
compassion
,
which they were not prone to feel
towards
criminals condemned by the inquisition;
but when they were told he was convicted of the
crime of magic, they drew back with awe and
abhorrence.
The procession had reached the grand square.
The first part had already mounted the scaffold,
and the condemned were approaching. The
press of the populace became excessive, and was
repelled, as it were in billows, by the guards.
Just as the condemned were entering the square,
a shrieking was heard among the crowd. A
female, pale, frantic, dishevelled, was seen
struggling
through the multitude. My father! my
father! was all the cry she uttered; but it
thrilled through every heart. The crowd
instinctively
drew back, and made way for her as she
advanced.
The poor alchymist had made his peace with
Heaven, and by hard struggle had closed his
VOL. I. 43
heart upon the world, when the voice of his
child called him once more back to worldly
thought and agony. He turned towards the
well-known voice; his knees smote together; he
endeavoured to stretch forth his pinioned arms,
and felt himself clasped in the embraces of his
child. The emotions of both were too agonizing
for utterance; convulsive sobs and broken
exclamations
,
and embraces more of anguish than
tenderness, were all that passed between them.
The procession was interrupted for a moment.
The astonished monks and familiars were filled
with involuntary respect at this agony of natural
affection. Ejaculations of pity broke from the
crowd, touched by the filial piety, the
extraordinary
and hopeless anguish, of so young and
beautiful a being.
Every attempt to soothe her, and prevail on
her to retire, was unheeded; at length they
endeavoured
to separate her from her father by
force. The movement roused her from her
temporary
abandonment.
With a sudden paroxysm of fury she snatched
a sword from one of the familiars. Her late
pale countenance was flushed with rage, and fire
flashed from her once soft and languishing eyes.
The guards shrunk back with awe. There
was something in this filial frenzy, this feminine
tenderness wrought up to desperation, that
touched even their hardened hearts. They
endeavoured
to pacify her, but in vain. Her eye
was eager and quick as the she wolf's guarding
her young; with one arm she pressed her father
to her bosom, with the other she menaced every
one that approached.
The patience of the guards was very soon
exhausted
.
They had held back in awe, but not
in fear. With all her desperation, the weapon
was soon wrested from her feeble hand, and she
was borne shrieking and struggling among the
crowd. The rabble murmured compassion; but
such was the dread inspired by the inquisition,
that no one attempted to interfere.
The procession again resumed its march. Inez
was ineffectually struggling to release herself
from the hands of the familiars that detained
her, when suddenly she saw Don Ambrosio
before
her. Wretched girl, exclaimed he with
fury, why have you fled from your friends?
Deliver her, said he to the familiars, to my
domestics; she is under my protection.
His creatures advanced to seize her. Oh
no! Oh no! cried she with new terrors, and
clinging to the familiars, I have fled from no
friends. He is not my protector! He is the
murderer of my father!
The familiars were perplexed; the crowd
pressed on with eager curiosity. Stand off!
cried the fiery Ambrosio, dashing the throng
from around him. Then turning to the
familiars
with sudden moderationmy friends,
said he, deliver this poor girl to me. Her
distress
has turned her brain; she has escaped from
her friends and protectors this morning, during
the confusion of the house as the procession
went by. A little quiet and kind treatment
will restore her to tranquillity.
I am not mad! I am not mad! cried she
vehemently. Oh save me, save me, from
these men; I have no protector on earth but my
father, and him they are murdering!
The familiars shook their heads; her wildness
corroborated the assertions of Don Ambrosio,
and his apparent rank commanded respect and
belief. They relinquished their charge to him,
and he was consigning the struggling Inez to
his creatures. Let go your hold, villain!
cried a voice from among the crowd, and
Antonio
was seen eagerly tearing his way through
the press of people.
Seize him! seize him! cried Don
Ambrosio
to the familiars. 'Tis an accomplice of
the sorcerer.
Liar! retorted Antonio, as he thrust the
mob to the right and left, and forced himself to
the spot.
The sword of Don Ambrosio flashed in an
instant from the scabbard; the student was
armed, and equally alert. There was a fierce
clash of weapons; the crowd made way for
them as they fought, and closed again, so as
to hide them from the view of Inez. All was
tumult and confusion for a moment; when there
was a kind of shout from the spectators, and
the mob again opening, she beheld, as she
thought, Antonio weltering in his blood.
This new shock was too great for her
already
overstrained intellects. A giddiness seized
upon her; every thing seemed to whirl before
her eyes; she gasped some incoherent words,
and sunk senseless upon the ground.
Days, weeks, elapsed before Inez returned to
consciousness. At length she opened her eyes
as if out of a troubled sleep. She was lying
upon a magnificent bed, in a chamber richly
furnished with pier glasses and massive tables
inlaid with silver of exquisite workmanship.
The walls were covered with tapestry; the
cornices
richly gilded; through the door, which
stood open, she perceived a superb saloon, with
statues and chrystal lustres, and a magnificent
suite of apartments beyond. The casements of
the room were open to admit the soft breath of
summer, which stole in laden with perfumes
from a neighbouring garden; from whence,
also, the refreshing sounds of fountains, and the
sweet notes of birds came in mingled music to
her ears. Female attendants were moving with
noiseless step about the apartment; but as she
gazed around in silent wonder, her eye rested
upon a new object of interest. In a chair at
the head of her bed, sat a venerable form,
watching over her with a look of fond anxiety.
It was her father. I will not attempt to
describe
the scene that ensued, nor the moments
of rapture which more than repaid all the
sufferings
her affectionate heart had undergone. As
soon as their feelings had become more calm,
the alchymist stepped out of the room to
introduce
a stranger to whom they were indebted
for their lives and liberties. He returned
leading
in Antonio, no longer in his poor scholar's
garb, but in the rich dress of a nobleman.
The feelings of Inez were nearly overpowered
by the sudden reverses; and it was some time
before she was sufficiently calm to
comprehend
the explanation of this seeming romance.
It appeared that the lover who had sought her
affections in the lowly guise of a student, was
only son and heir of a powerful grandee of
Valentia
.
Some youthful irregularities had drawn
on him the displeasure of his father. He had
absented himself from home and remained
incognito
at Granada; with a full resolve by study
and self regulation to reinstate himself in his
father's favour. How hard he had studied
does not remain on record. All that we know
is his romantic adventure of the tower.
It was at first a mere youthful caprice, excited
by a glimpse of a beautiful face. In becoming a
disciple of the alchymist he probably thought of
nothing more than pursuing a light love
adventure
.
Farther acquaintance, however,
completely
fixed his affections. In the mean time
he had been traced to his concealment. His
father had recieved intelligence, doubtless from
Don Ambrosio, of his being entangled in the
snares of a mysterious adventurer and his
daughter
.
Trusty emissaries had been sent to seize
upon him and convey him by force to the
paternal
home.
What eloquence he used with his father to
convince him of the perfect innocence and noble
descent of the alchymist and of the exalted worth
of his daughter, does not appear. All that we
know is that the father, though a very
passionate
,
was a very reasonable man, as appears by
his consenting that his son should return to
Granada
,
and conduct Inez, as his affianced bride, to
Valentia. On his arrival he had been shocked
at finding the tower deserted, and reading the
alchymist's name on the list of the condemned
at the auto-da-f. He arrived just in time to
save him from the flames. It was Don
Ambrosio
that had fallen in their contest. Being
severely wounded, and thinking his end
approaching
,
he had confessed to one of the fathers
of the inquisition that he was the sole cause of
the alchymist's condemnation, and that the
evidence
on which it was founded was altogether
false. The testimony of Don Antonio came
in corroboration of his innocence, and as he was
a relation of the grand inquisitor's, it perhaps had
more than usual weight. Thus the poor
alchymist
VOL. I. 44
was in a manner snatched from the very
flames, and so great had been the sympathy
excited
in his case, that for once the populace
rejoiced in being disappointed of an execution.
The residue of this story may readily be
imagined
by any one versed in this valuable kind of
history. Don Antonio married the lovely Inez,
and took her and her father with him to
Valentia
.
As she had been a loving and dutiful
daughter
,
so she proved a true and tender wife. It was
not long before he succeeded to his father's titles
and estates, and he and his fair spouse were
renowned
for being the handsomest and happiest
couple in all Valentia.
As to Don Ambrosio, he partially recovered
to the enjoyment of a broken constitution and a
blasted name, and hid his remorse and disgraces
in a convent.
The worthy alchymist took up his abode with
his children. A pavilion in their garden was
assigned to him as a laboratory, where he
resumed
his researches after the grand secret. He
was now and then assisted by his son-in-law,
but the latter slackened grievously in his zeal and
diligence, after marriage; still he would listen
with profound gravity and attention to the old
man's quotations from Paracelsus, Sandivogius,
and Peter D'Abano, which daily grew longer
and longer. In this way the good alchymist
lived on quietly and comfortably, to what is
called
a good old age, that is to say, an age that is
good for nothing; and, unfortunately for
mankind
,
was hurried out of life in his ninetieth
year, just as he was on the point of discovering
the philosopher's stone.
Such
was the story of the captain's friend;
which whiled away the whole morning very
tolerably. The captain was every now and then
interrupted by questions and remarks, which I
have not mentioned lest I should break the
continuity
of the tale.
He was also a little disturbed once or twice
by the general, who fell asleep and breathed
rather hard, to the great horror and annoyance
of Lady Lillycraft. In a long and tender love
passage, also, which was particularly to her
ladyship's taste, the unlucky general having his
head a little sunk upon his breast, kept making
a sound at regular intervals, very much like the
word
pish
, long drawn out. At length he made
an odd guttural sound that suddenly woke him;
he hemmed, looked about with a slight degree
of consternation, and then began to play with
her ladyship's work bag, which, however, she
rather pettishly withdrew. The steady sound
of the captain's voice, however, was too potent
a soporific for the poor general; he kept
gleaming
up, and sinking in the socket, until the
cessation
of the tale again roused him, when he
started awake, put his foot down upon Lady
Lillycraft's cur, the sleeping Beauty, which
yelled
and seized him by the leg, and in a moment
the whole library resounded with yelpings and
exclamations. Never did a man more
completely
mar his fortunes while he was asleep.
Silence was at length restored, all the company
expressed their thanks to the captain, and gave
various opinions of the story. The parson said
he should have liked to have heard more of the
leaden manuscript dug up at Granada. The
general
said he could not well make out the drift
of the story; he thought it a little confused. I
am glad, however, said he, that they burnt the
old chap of the tower, for I have no doubt he
was a notorious impostor.
END OF VOL. I.